
--**--**--
 of Chillon.
 
 I hardly know whether it was the analogies or the differences that were
 uppermost in the mind of a young American, who, two or three years ago,
 sat in the garden of the "Trois Couronnes," looking about him, rather
 idly, at some of the graceful objects I have mentioned. It was a
 beautiful summer morning, and in whatever fashion the young American
 looked at things, they must have seemed to him charming. He had come
 from Geneva the day before by the little steamer, to see his aunt, who
 was staying at the hotel--Geneva having been for a long time his place
 of residence. But his aunt had a headache--his aunt had almost always a
 headache--and now she was shut up in her room, smelling camphor, so that
 he was at liberty to wander about. He was some seven-and-twenty years
 of age; when his friends spoke of him, they usually said that he was at
 Geneva "studying." When his enemies spoke of him, they said--but,
 after all, he had no enemies; he was an extremely amiable fellow, and
 universally liked. What I should say is, simply, that when certain
 persons spoke of him they affirmed that the reason of his spending so
 much time at Geneva was that he was extremely devoted to a lady who
 lived there--a foreign lady--a person older than himself. Very few
 Americans--indeed, I think none--had ever seen this lady, about whom
 there were some singular stories. But Winterbourne had an old attachment
 for the little metropolis of Calvinism; he had been put to school there
 as a boy, and he had afterward gone to college there--circumstances
 which had led to his forming a great many youthful friendships. Many of
 these he had kept, and they were a source of great satisfaction to him.
--**--**--
 knickerbockers, depositing the other as promptly in another place. He
 poked his alpenstock, lance-fashion, into Winterbourne's bench and tried
 to crack the lump of sugar with his teeth.
 
 "Oh, blazes; it's har-r-d!" he exclaimed, pronouncing the adjective in a
 peculiar manner.
 
 Winterbourne had immediately perceived that he might have the honor
 of claiming him as a fellow countryman. "Take care you don't hurt your
 teeth," he said, paternally.
 
 "I haven't got any teeth to hurt. They have all come out. I have only
 got seven teeth. My mother counted them last night, and one came out
 right afterward. She said she'd slap me if any more came out. I can't
 help it. It's this old Europe. It's the climate that makes them come
 out. In America they didn't come out. It's these hotels."
 
 Winterbourne was much amused. "If you eat three lumps of sugar, your
 mother will certainly slap you," he said.
 
 "She's got to give me some candy, then," rejoined his young
 interlocutor. "I can't get any candy here--any American candy. American
 candy's the best candy."
 
 "And are American little boys the best little boys?" asked Winterbourne.
 
 "I don't know. I'm an American boy," said the child.
 
 "I see you are one of the best!" laughed Winterbourne.
 
 "Are you an American man?" pursued this vivacious infant. And then,
 on Winterbourne's affirmative reply--"American men are the best," he
 declared.
 
 His companion thanked him for the compliment, and the child, who had
 now got astride of his alpenstock, stood looking about him, while he
 attacked a second lump of sugar. Winterbourne wondered if he himself
 had been like this in his infancy, for he had been brought to Europe at
 about this age.
 
 "Here comes my sister!" cried the child in a moment. "She's an American
 girl."
 
 Winterbourne looked along the path and saw a beautiful young lady
--**--**--
 
 The young lady gave no heed to this announcement, but looked straight
 at her brother. "Well, I guess you had better be quiet," she simply
 observed.
 
 It seemed to Winterbourne that he had been in a manner presented. He
 got up and stepped slowly toward the young girl, throwing away his
 cigarette. "This little boy and I have made acquaintance," he said, with
 great civility. In Geneva, as he had been perfectly aware, a young
 man was not at liberty to speak to a young unmarried lady except under
 certain rarely occurring conditions; but here at Vevey, what conditions
 could be better than these?--a pretty American girl coming and standing
 in front of you in a garden. This pretty American girl, however, on
 hearing Winterbourne's observation, simply glanced at him; she then
 turned her head and looked over the parapet, at the lake and the
 opposite mountains. He wondered whether he had gone too far, but he
 decided that he must advance farther, rather than retreat. While he was
 thinking of something else to say, the young lady turned to the little
 boy again.
 
 "I should like to know where you got that pole," she said.
 
 "I bought it," responded Randolph.
 
 "You don't mean to say you're going to take it to Italy?"
 
 "Yes, I am going to take it to Italy," the child declared.
 
 The young girl glanced over the front of her dress and smoothed out a
 knot or two of ribbon. Then she rested her eyes upon the prospect again.
 "Well, I guess you had better leave it somewhere," she said after a
 moment.
 
 "Are you going to Italy?" Winterbourne inquired in a tone of great
 respect.
 
 The young lady glanced at him again. "Yes, sir," she replied. And she
 said nothing more.
 
 "Are you--a--going over the Simplon?" Winterbourne pursued, a little
--**--**--
 habit, her manner. Yet, as he talked a little more and pointed out some
 of the objects of interest in the view, with which she appeared quite
 unacquainted, she gradually gave him more of the benefit of her glance;
 and then he saw that this glance was perfectly direct and unshrinking.
 It was not, however, what would have been called an immodest glance,
 for the young girl's eyes were singularly honest and fresh. They were
 wonderfully pretty eyes; and, indeed, Winterbourne had not seen for
 a long time anything prettier than his fair countrywoman's various
 features--her complexion, her nose, her ears, her teeth. He had a great
 relish for feminine beauty; he was addicted to observing and analyzing
 it; and as regards this young lady's face he made several observations.
 It was not at all insipid, but it was not exactly expressive; and
 though it was eminently delicate, Winterbourne mentally accused it--very
 forgivingly--of a want of finish. He thought it very possible that
 Master Randolph's sister was a coquette; he was sure she had a spirit of
 her own; but in her bright, sweet, superficial little visage there was
 no mockery, no irony. Before long it became obvious that she was much
 disposed toward conversation. She told him that they were going to Rome
 for the winter--she and her mother and Randolph. She asked him if he was
 a "real American"; she shouldn't have taken him for one; he seemed more
 like a German--this was said after a little hesitation--especially when
 he spoke. Winterbourne, laughing, answered that he had met Germans who
 spoke like Americans, but that he had not, so far as he remembered, met
 an American who spoke like a German. Then he asked her if she should not
 be more comfortable in sitting upon the bench which he had just quitted.
--**--**--
 the sphere of celestial reward. But Randolph immediately added, "My
 father's in Schenectady. He's got a big business. My father's rich, you
 bet!"
 
 "Well!" ejaculated Miss Miller, lowering her parasol and looking at
 the embroidered border. Winterbourne presently released the child,
 who departed, dragging his alpenstock along the path. "He doesn't like
 Europe," said the young girl. "He wants to go back."
 
 "To Schenectady, you mean?"
 
 "Yes; he wants to go right home. He hasn't got any boys here. There is
 one boy here, but he always goes round with a teacher; they won't let
 him play."
 
 "And your brother hasn't any teacher?" Winterbourne inquired.
 
 "Mother thought of getting him one, to travel round with us. There was a
 lady told her of a very good teacher; an American lady--perhaps you know
 her--Mrs. Sanders. I think she came from Boston. She told her of this
 teacher, and we thought of getting him to travel round with us. But
 Randolph said he didn't want a teacher traveling round with us. He said
 he wouldn't have lessons when he was in the cars. And we ARE in the cars
 about half the time. There was an English lady we met in the cars--I
 think her name was Miss Featherstone; perhaps you know her. She wanted
 to know why I didn't give Randolph lessons--give him 'instruction,' she
 called it. I guess he could give me more instruction than I could give
 him. He's very smart."
 
 "Yes," said Winterbourne; "he seems very smart."
 
 "Mother's going to get a teacher for him as soon as we get to Italy. Can
 you get good teachers in Italy?"
 
 "Very good, I should think," said Winterbourne.
 
 "Or else she's going to find some school. He ought to learn some more.
 He's only nine. He's going to college." And in this way Miss Miller
--**--**--
 too," she resumed in a moment. She paused again for an instant; she was
 looking at Winterbourne with all her prettiness in her lively eyes and
 in her light, slightly monotonous smile. "I have always had," she said,
 "a great deal of gentlemen's society."
 
 Poor Winterbourne was amused, perplexed, and decidedly charmed. He
 had never yet heard a young girl express herself in just this fashion;
 never, at least, save in cases where to say such things seemed a kind of
 demonstrative evidence of a certain laxity of deportment. And yet was he
 to accuse Miss Daisy Miller of actual or potential inconduite, as they
 said at Geneva? He felt that he had lived at Geneva so long that he
 had lost a good deal; he had become dishabituated to the American tone.
 Never, indeed, since he had grown old enough to appreciate things, had
 he encountered a young American girl of so pronounced a type as this.
 Certainly she was very charming, but how deucedly sociable! Was she
 simply a pretty girl from New York State? Were they all like that, the
 pretty girls who had a good deal of gentlemen's society? Or was she also
 a designing, an audacious, an unscrupulous young person? Winterbourne
 had lost his instinct in this matter, and his reason could not help him.
 Miss Daisy Miller looked extremely innocent. Some people had told him
 that, after all, American girls were exceedingly innocent; and others
 had told him that, after all, they were not. He was inclined to think
 Miss Daisy Miller was a flirt--a pretty American flirt. He had never, as
 yet, had any relations with young ladies of this category. He had
 known, here in Europe, two or three women--persons older than Miss Daisy
 Miller, and provided, for respectability's sake, with husbands--who were
--**--**--
 "He says he don't care much about old castles. He's only nine. He
 wants to stay at the hotel. Mother's afraid to leave him alone, and the
 courier won't stay with him; so we haven't been to many places. But it
 will be too bad if we don't go up there." And Miss Miller pointed again
 at the Chateau de Chillon.
 
 "I should think it might be arranged," said Winterbourne. "Couldn't you
 get some one to stay for the afternoon with Randolph?"
 
 Miss Miller looked at him a moment, and then, very placidly, "I wish YOU
 would stay with him!" she said.
 
 Winterbourne hesitated a moment. "I should much rather go to Chillon
 with you."
 
 "With me?" asked the young girl with the same placidity.
 
 She didn't rise, blushing, as a young girl at Geneva would have done;
 and yet Winterbourne, conscious that he had been very bold, thought
 it possible she was offended. "With your mother," he answered very
 respectfully.
 
 But it seemed that both his audacity and his respect were lost upon Miss
 Daisy Miller. "I guess my mother won't go, after all," she said. "She
 don't like to ride round in the afternoon. But did you really mean what
 you said just now--that you would like to go up there?"
 
 "Most earnestly," Winterbourne declared.
 
 "Then we may arrange it. If mother will stay with Randolph, I guess
 Eugenio will."
 
 "Eugenio?" the young man inquired.
 
 "Eugenio's our courier. He doesn't like to stay with Randolph; he's the
 most fastidious man I ever saw. But he's a splendid courier. I guess
 he'll stay at home with Randolph if mother does, and then we can go to
 the castle."
 
 Winterbourne reflected for an instant as lucidly as possible--"we" could
 only mean Miss Daisy Miller and himself. This program seemed almost too
--**--**--
 
 He had, however, engaged to do more than proved feasible, in promising
 to present his aunt, Mrs. Costello, to Miss Daisy Miller. As soon as the
 former lady had got better of her headache, he waited upon her in her
 apartment; and, after the proper inquiries in regard to her health, he
 asked her if she had observed in the hotel an American family--a mamma,
 a daughter, and a little boy.
 
 "And a courier?" said Mrs. Costello. "Oh yes, I have observed them. Seen
 them--heard them--and kept out of their way." Mrs. Costello was a widow
 with a fortune; a person of much distinction, who frequently intimated
 that, if she were not so dreadfully liable to sick headaches, she would
 probably have left a deeper impress upon her time. She had a long, pale
 face, a high nose, and a great deal of very striking white hair, which
 she wore in large puffs and rouleaux over the top of her head. She had
 two sons married in New York and another who was now in Europe. This
 young man was amusing himself at Hamburg, and, though he was on his
 travels, was rarely perceived to visit any particular city at the moment
 selected by his mother for her own appearance there. Her nephew, who had
 come up to Vevey expressly to see her, was therefore more attentive than
 those who, as she said, were nearer to her. He had imbibed at Geneva the
 idea that one must always be attentive to one's aunt. Mrs. Costello
 had not seen him for many years, and she was greatly pleased with him,
 manifesting her approbation by initiating him into many of the secrets
 of that social sway which, as she gave him to understand, she exerted in
 the American capital. She admitted that she was very exclusive; but, if
--**--**--
 "She is a young lady," said Mrs. Costello, "who has an intimacy with her
 mamma's courier."
 
 "An intimacy with the courier?" the young man demanded.
 
 "Oh, the mother is just as bad! They treat the courier like a familiar
 friend--like a gentleman. I shouldn't wonder if he dines with them.
 Very likely they have never seen a man with such good manners, such
 fine clothes, so like a gentleman. He probably corresponds to the young
 lady's idea of a count. He sits with them in the garden in the evening.
 I think he smokes."
 
 Winterbourne listened with interest to these disclosures; they helped
 him to make up his mind about Miss Daisy. Evidently she was rather wild.
 "Well," he said, "I am not a courier, and yet she was very charming to
 me."
 
 "You had better have said at first," said Mrs. Costello with dignity,
 "that you had made her acquaintance."
 
 "We simply met in the garden, and we talked a bit."
 
 "Tout bonnement! And pray what did you say?"
 
 "I said I should take the liberty of introducing her to my admirable
 aunt."
 
 "I am much obliged to you."
 
 "It was to guarantee my respectability," said Winterbourne.
 
 "And pray who is to guarantee hers?"
 
 "Ah, you are cruel!" said the young man. "She's a very nice young girl."
 
 "You don't say that as if you believed it," Mrs. Costello observed.
 
 "She is completely uncultivated," Winterbourne went on. "But she is
 wonderfully pretty, and, in short, she is very nice. To prove that I
 believe it, I am going to take her to the Chateau de Chillon."
 
 "You two are going off there together? I should say it proved just the
 contrary. How long had you known her, may I ask, when this interesting
 project was formed? You haven't been twenty-four hours in the house."
--**--**--
 
 "Then, my dear Frederick," said Mrs. Costello, "I must decline the honor
 of her acquaintance. I am an old woman, but I am not too old, thank
 Heaven, to be shocked!"
 
 "But don't they all do these things--the young girls in America?"
 Winterbourne inquired.
 
 Mrs. Costello stared a moment. "I should like to see my granddaughters
 do them!" she declared grimly.
 
 This seemed to throw some light upon the matter, for Winterbourne
 remembered to have heard that his pretty cousins in New York were
 "tremendous flirts." If, therefore, Miss Daisy Miller exceeded the
 liberal margin allowed to these young ladies, it was probable that
 anything might be expected of her. Winterbourne was impatient to see her
 again, and he was vexed with himself that, by instinct, he should not
 appreciate her justly.
 
 Though he was impatient to see her, he hardly knew what he should say
 to her about his aunt's refusal to become acquainted with her; but he
 discovered, promptly enough, that with Miss Daisy Miller there was
 no great need of walking on tiptoe. He found her that evening in the
 garden, wandering about in the warm starlight like an indolent sylph,
 and swinging to and fro the largest fan he had ever beheld. It was ten
 o'clock. He had dined with his aunt, had been sitting with her since
 dinner, and had just taken leave of her till the morrow. Miss Daisy
 Miller seemed very glad to see him; she declared it was the longest
 evening she had ever passed.
 
 "Have you been all alone?" he asked.
 
 "I have been walking round with mother. But mother gets tired walking
 round," she answered.
 
 "Has she gone to bed?"
 
 "No; she doesn't like to go to bed," said the young girl. "She doesn't
 sleep--not three hours. She says she doesn't know how she lives. She's
--**--**--
 
 Winterbourne was silent a moment. "She tells me she does," he answered
 at last, not knowing what to say.
 
 Miss Daisy Miller stopped and stood looking at him. Her prettiness was
 still visible in the darkness; she was opening and closing her enormous
 fan. "She doesn't want to know me!" she said suddenly. "Why don't you
 say so? You needn't be afraid. I'm not afraid!" And she gave a little
 laugh.
 
 Winterbourne fancied there was a tremor in her voice; he was touched,
 shocked, mortified by it. "My dear young lady," he protested, "she knows
 no one. It's her wretched health."
 
 The young girl walked on a few steps, laughing still. "You needn't be
 afraid," she repeated. "Why should she want to know me?" Then she paused
 again; she was close to the parapet of the garden, and in front of her
 was the starlit lake. There was a vague sheen upon its surface, and in
 the distance were dimly seen mountain forms. Daisy Miller looked out
 upon the mysterious prospect and then she gave another little laugh.
 "Gracious! she IS exclusive!" she said. Winterbourne wondered whether
 she was seriously wounded, and for a moment almost wished that her sense
 of injury might be such as to make it becoming in him to attempt to
 reassure and comfort her. He had a pleasant sense that she would be very
 approachable for consolatory purposes. He felt then, for the instant,
 quite ready to sacrifice his aunt, conversationally; to admit that she
 was a proud, rude woman, and to declare that they needn't mind her.
 But before he had time to commit himself to this perilous mixture
 of gallantry and impiety, the young lady, resuming her walk, gave an
 exclamation in quite another tone. "Well, here's Mother! I guess she
 hasn't got Randolph to go to bed." The figure of a lady appeared at a
--**--**--
 proceeded to pronounce it.
 
 "Oh, dear, I can't say all that!" said his companion with a laugh. But
 by this time they had come up to Mrs. Miller, who, as they drew near,
 walked to the parapet of the garden and leaned upon it, looking intently
 at the lake and turning her back to them. "Mother!" said the young
 girl in a tone of decision. Upon this the elder lady turned round. "Mr.
 Winterbourne," said Miss Daisy Miller, introducing the young man very
 frankly and prettily. "Common," she was, as Mrs. Costello had pronounced
 her; yet it was a wonder to Winterbourne that, with her commonness, she
 had a singularly delicate grace.
 
 Her mother was a small, spare, light person, with a wandering eye,
 a very exiguous nose, and a large forehead, decorated with a certain
 amount of thin, much frizzled hair. Like her daughter, Mrs. Miller was
 dressed with extreme elegance; she had enormous diamonds in her ears.
 So far as Winterbourne could observe, she gave him no greeting--she
 certainly was not looking at him. Daisy was near her, pulling her shawl
 straight. "What are you doing, poking round here?" this young lady
 inquired, but by no means with that harshness of accent which her choice
 of words may imply.
 
 "I don't know," said her mother, turning toward the lake again.
 
 "I shouldn't think you'd want that shawl!" Daisy exclaimed.
 
 "Well I do!" her mother answered with a little laugh.
 
 "Did you get Randolph to go to bed?" asked the young girl.
 
 "No; I couldn't induce him," said Mrs. Miller very gently. "He wants to
 talk to the waiter. He likes to talk to that waiter."
 
 "I was telling Mr. Winterbourne," the young girl went on; and to the
 young man's ear her tone might have indicated that she had been uttering
--**--**--
 there with Mr. Winterbourne."
 
 To this announcement, very placidly made, Daisy's mamma offered no
 response. Winterbourne took for granted that she deeply disapproved of
 the projected excursion; but he said to himself that she was a simple,
 easily managed person, and that a few deferential protestations would
 take the edge from her displeasure. "Yes," he began; "your daughter has
 kindly allowed me the honor of being her guide."
 
 Mrs. Miller's wandering eyes attached themselves, with a sort of
 appealing air, to Daisy, who, however, strolled a few steps farther,
 gently humming to herself. "I presume you will go in the cars," said her
 mother.
 
 "Yes, or in the boat," said Winterbourne.
 
 "Well, of course, I don't know," Mrs. Miller rejoined. "I have never
 been to that castle."
 
 "It is a pity you shouldn't go," said Winterbourne, beginning to feel
 reassured as to her opposition. And yet he was quite prepared to find
 that, as a matter of course, she meant to accompany her daughter.
 
 "We've been thinking ever so much about going," she pursued; "but it
 seems as if we couldn't. Of course Daisy--she wants to go round. But
 there's a lady here--I don't know her name--she says she shouldn't think
 we'd want to go to see castles HERE; she should think we'd want to wait
 till we got to Italy. It seems as if there would be so many there,"
 continued Mrs. Miller with an air of increasing confidence. "Of course
 we only want to see the principal ones. We visited several in England,"
 she presently added.
 
 "Ah yes! in England there are beautiful castles," said Winterbourne.
 "But Chillon here, is very well worth seeing."
 
 "Well, if Daisy feels up to it--" said Mrs. Miller, in a tone
 impregnated with a sense of the magnitude of the enterprise. "It seems
--**--**--
 "I will row you over to Chillon in the starlight."
 
 "I don't believe it!" said Daisy.
 
 "Well!" ejaculated the elder lady again.
 
 "You haven't spoken to me for half an hour," her daughter went on.
 
 "I have been having some very pleasant conversation with your mother,"
 said Winterbourne.
 
 "Well, I want you to take me out in a boat!" Daisy repeated. They had
 all stopped, and she had turned round and was looking at Winterbourne.
 Her face wore a charming smile, her pretty eyes were gleaming, she was
 swinging her great fan about. No; it's impossible to be prettier than
 that, thought Winterbourne.
 
 "There are half a dozen boats moored at that landing place," he said,
 pointing to certain steps which descended from the garden to the lake.
 "If you will do me the honor to accept my arm, we will go and select one
 of them."
 
 Daisy stood there smiling; she threw back her head and gave a little,
 light laugh. "I like a gentleman to be formal!" she declared.
 
 "I assure you it's a formal offer."
 
 "I was bound I would make you say something," Daisy went on.
 
 "You see, it's not very difficult," said Winterbourne. "But I am afraid
 you are chaffing me."
 
 "I think not, sir," remarked Mrs. Miller very gently.
 
 "Do, then, let me give you a row," he said to the young girl.
 
 "It's quite lovely, the way you say that!" cried Daisy.
 
 "It will be still more lovely to do it."
 
 "Yes, it would be lovely!" said Daisy. But she made no movement to
 accompany him; she only stood there laughing.
 
 "I should think you had better find out what time it is," interposed her
 mother.
 
 "It is eleven o'clock, madam," said a voice, with a foreign accent, out
 of the neighboring darkness; and Winterbourne, turning, perceived the
--**--**--
 was smiling--and then, solemnly, with a bow, "As mademoiselle pleases!"
 he said.
 
 "Oh, I hoped you would make a fuss!" said Daisy. "I don't care to go
 now."
 
 "I myself shall make a fuss if you don't go," said Winterbourne.
 
 "That's all I want--a little fuss!" And the young girl began to laugh
 again.
 
 "Mr. Randolph has gone to bed!" the courier announced frigidly.
 
 "Oh, Daisy; now we can go!" said Mrs. Miller.
 
 Daisy turned away from Winterbourne, looking at him, smiling and fanning
 herself. "Good night," she said; "I hope you are disappointed, or
 disgusted, or something!"
 
 He looked at her, taking the hand she offered him. "I am puzzled," he
 answered.
 
 "Well, I hope it won't keep you awake!" she said very smartly; and,
 under the escort of the privileged Eugenio, the two ladies passed toward
 the house.
 
 Winterbourne stood looking after them; he was indeed puzzled. He
 lingered beside the lake for a quarter of an hour, turning over the
 mystery of the young girl's sudden familiarities and caprices. But
 the only very definite conclusion he came to was that he should enjoy
 deucedly "going off" with her somewhere.
 
 Two days afterward he went off with her to the Castle of Chillon. He
 waited for her in the large hall of the hotel, where the couriers, the
 servants, the foreign tourists, were lounging about and staring. It was
 not the place he should have chosen, but she had appointed it. She came
 tripping downstairs, buttoning her long gloves, squeezing her folded
 parasol against her pretty figure, dressed in the perfection of a
 soberly elegant traveling costume. Winterbourne was a man of imagination
 and, as our ancestors used to say, sensibility; as he looked at her
 dress and, on the great staircase, her little rapid, confiding step, he
--**--**--
 that she was "common"; but was she so, after all, or was he simply
 getting used to her commonness? Her conversation was chiefly of what
 metaphysicians term the objective cast, but every now and then it took a
 subjective turn.
 
 "What on EARTH are you so grave about?" she suddenly demanded, fixing
 her agreeable eyes upon Winterbourne's.
 
 "Am I grave?" he asked. "I had an idea I was grinning from ear to ear."
 
 "You look as if you were taking me to a funeral. If that's a grin, your
 ears are very near together."
 
 "Should you like me to dance a hornpipe on the deck?"
 
 "Pray do, and I'll carry round your hat. It will pay the expenses of our
 journey."
 
 "I never was better pleased in my life," murmured Winterbourne.
 
 She looked at him a moment and then burst into a little laugh. "I like
 to make you say those things! You're a queer mixture!"
 
 In the castle, after they had landed, the subjective element decidedly
 prevailed. Daisy tripped about the vaulted chambers, rustled her skirts
 in the corkscrew staircases, flirted back with a pretty little cry and
 a shudder from the edge of the oubliettes, and turned a singularly
 well-shaped ear to everything that Winterbourne told her about the
 place. But he saw that she cared very little for feudal antiquities and
 that the dusky traditions of Chillon made but a slight impression upon
 her. They had the good fortune to have been able to walk about without
 other companionship than that of the custodian; and Winterbourne
 arranged with this functionary that they should not be hurried--that
 they should linger and pause wherever they chose. The custodian
 interpreted the bargain generously--Winterbourne, on his side, had been
 generous--and ended by leaving them quite to themselves. Miss Miller's
 observations were not remarkable for logical consistency; for anything
--**--**--
 granted that he was hurrying back to see. How did Miss Daisy Miller
 know that there was a charmer in Geneva? Winterbourne, who denied the
 existence of such a person, was quite unable to discover, and he was
 divided between amazement at the rapidity of her induction and amusement
 at the frankness of her persiflage. She seemed to him, in all this, an
 extraordinary mixture of innocence and crudity. "Does she never allow
 you more than three days at a time?" asked Daisy ironically. "Doesn't
 she give you a vacation in summer? There's no one so hard worked but
 they can get leave to go off somewhere at this season. I suppose, if you
 stay another day, she'll come after you in the boat. Do wait over
 till Friday, and I will go down to the landing to see her arrive!"
 Winterbourne began to think he had been wrong to feel disappointed in
 the temper in which the young lady had embarked. If he had missed the
 personal accent, the personal accent was now making its appearance.
 It sounded very distinctly, at last, in her telling him she would stop
 "teasing" him if he would promise her solemnly to come down to Rome in
 the winter.
 
 "That's not a difficult promise to make," said Winterbourne. "My aunt
 has taken an apartment in Rome for the winter and has already asked me
 to come and see her."
 
 "I don't want you to come for your aunt," said Daisy; "I want you to
 come for me." And this was the only allusion that the young man was ever
 to hear her make to his invidious kinswoman. He declared that, at
 any rate, he would certainly come. After this Daisy stopped teasing.
 Winterbourne took a carriage, and they drove back to Vevey in the dusk;
--**--**--
 In the natural course of events, Winterbourne, on arriving in Rome,
 would presently have ascertained Mrs. Miller's address at the American
 banker's and have gone to pay his compliments to Miss Daisy. "After what
 happened at Vevey, I think I may certainly call upon them," he said to
 Mrs. Costello.
 
 "If, after what happens--at Vevey and everywhere--you desire to keep
 up the acquaintance, you are very welcome. Of course a man may know
 everyone. Men are welcome to the privilege!"
 
 "Pray what is it that happens--here, for instance?" Winterbourne
 demanded.
 
 "The girl goes about alone with her foreigners. As to what happens
 further, you must apply elsewhere for information. She has picked up
 half a dozen of the regular Roman fortune hunters, and she takes them
 about to people's houses. When she comes to a party she brings with her
 a gentleman with a good deal of manner and a wonderful mustache."
 
 "And where is the mother?"
 
 "I haven't the least idea. They are very dreadful people."
 
 Winterbourne meditated a moment. "They are very ignorant--very innocent
 only. Depend upon it they are not bad."
 
 "They are hopelessly vulgar," said Mrs. Costello. "Whether or no being
 hopelessly vulgar is being 'bad' is a question for the metaphysicians.
 They are bad enough to dislike, at any rate; and for this short life
 that is quite enough."
 
 The news that Daisy Miller was surrounded by half a dozen wonderful
 mustaches checked Winterbourne's impulse to go straightway to see her.
 He had, perhaps, not definitely flattered himself that he had made an
 ineffaceable impression upon her heart, but he was annoyed at hearing
 of a state of affairs so little in harmony with an image that had lately
 flitted in and out of his own meditations; the image of a very pretty
 girl looking out of an old Roman window and asking herself urgently
--**--**--
 "I don't believe that!" the young girl declared.
 
 Winterbourne turned with a protesting smile to her mother, but this lady
 evaded his glance, and, seating herself, fixed her eyes upon her son.
 "We've got a bigger place than this," said Randolph. "It's all gold on
 the walls."
 
 Mrs. Miller turned uneasily in her chair. "I told you if I were to bring
 you, you would say something!" she murmured.
 
 "I told YOU!" Randolph exclaimed. "I tell YOU, sir!" he added jocosely,
 giving Winterbourne a thump on the knee. "It IS bigger, too!"
 
 Daisy had entered upon a lively conversation with her hostess;
 Winterbourne judged it becoming to address a few words to her mother. "I
 hope you have been well since we parted at Vevey," he said.
 
 Mrs. Miller now certainly looked at him--at his chin. "Not very well,
 sir," she answered.
 
 "She's got the dyspepsia," said Randolph. "I've got it too. Father's got
 it. I've got it most!"
 
 This announcement, instead of embarrassing Mrs. Miller, seemed to
 relieve her. "I suffer from the liver," she said. "I think it's this
 climate; it's less bracing than Schenectady, especially in the winter
 season. I don't know whether you know we reside at Schenectady. I was
 saying to Daisy that I certainly hadn't found any one like Dr. Davis,
 and I didn't believe I should. Oh, at Schenectady he stands first; they
 think everything of him. He has so much to do, and yet there was nothing
 he wouldn't do for me. He said he never saw anything like my dyspepsia,
 but he was bound to cure it. I'm sure there was nothing he wouldn't
 try. He was just going to try something new when we came off. Mr. Miller
 wanted Daisy to see Europe for herself. But I wrote to Mr. Miller that
--**--**--
 splendid. She goes round everywhere; she has made a great number of
 acquaintances. Of course she goes round more than I do. I must say they
 have been very sociable; they have taken her right in. And then she
 knows a great many gentlemen. Oh, she thinks there's nothing like Rome.
 Of course, it's a great deal pleasanter for a young lady if she knows
 plenty of gentlemen."
 
 By this time Daisy had turned her attention again to Winterbourne. "I've
 been telling Mrs. Walker how mean you were!" the young girl announced.
 
 "And what is the evidence you have offered?" asked Winterbourne, rather
 annoyed at Miss Miller's want of appreciation of the zeal of an admirer
 who on his way down to Rome had stopped neither at Bologna nor at
 Florence, simply because of a certain sentimental impatience. He
 remembered that a cynical compatriot had once told him that American
 women--the pretty ones, and this gave a largeness to the axiom--were at
 once the most exacting in the world and the least endowed with a sense
 of indebtedness.
 
 "Why, you were awfully mean at Vevey," said Daisy. "You wouldn't do
 anything. You wouldn't stay there when I asked you."
 
 "My dearest young lady," cried Winterbourne, with eloquence, "have I
 come all the way to Rome to encounter your reproaches?"
 
 "Just hear him say that!" said Daisy to her hostess, giving a twist to a
 bow on this lady's dress. "Did you ever hear anything so quaint?"
 
 "So quaint, my dear?" murmured Mrs. Walker in the tone of a partisan of
 Winterbourne.
 
 "Well, I don't know," said Daisy, fingering Mrs. Walker's ribbons. "Mrs.
 Walker, I want to tell you something."
 
 "Mother-r," interposed Randolph, with his rough ends to his words, "I
 tell you you've got to go. Eugenio'll raise--something!"
 
 "I'm not afraid of Eugenio," said Daisy with a toss of her head. "Look
--**--**--
 guess we'll go back to the hotel," she said.
 
 "You may go back to the hotel, Mother, but I'm going to take a walk,"
 said Daisy.
 
 "She's going to walk with Mr. Giovanelli," Randolph proclaimed.
 
 "I am going to the Pincio," said Daisy, smiling.
 
 "Alone, my dear--at this hour?" Mrs. Walker asked. The afternoon was
 drawing to a close--it was the hour for the throng of carriages and of
 contemplative pedestrians. "I don't think it's safe, my dear," said Mrs.
 Walker.
 
 "Neither do I," subjoined Mrs. Miller. "You'll get the fever, as sure as
 you live. Remember what Dr. Davis told you!"
 
 "Give her some medicine before she goes," said Randolph.
 
 The company had risen to its feet; Daisy, still showing her pretty
 teeth, bent over and kissed her hostess. "Mrs. Walker, you are too
 perfect," she said. "I'm not going alone; I am going to meet a friend."
 
 "Your friend won't keep you from getting the fever," Mrs. Miller
 observed.
 
 "Is it Mr. Giovanelli?" asked the hostess.
 
 Winterbourne was watching the young girl; at this question his attention
 quickened. She stood there, smiling and smoothing her bonnet ribbons;
 she glanced at Winterbourne. Then, while she glanced and smiled, she
 answered, without a shade of hesitation, "Mr. Giovanelli--the beautiful
 Giovanelli."
 
 "My dear young friend," said Mrs. Walker, taking her hand pleadingly,
 "don't walk off to the Pincio at this hour to meet a beautiful Italian."
 
 "Well, he speaks English," said Mrs. Miller.
 
 "Gracious me!" Daisy exclaimed, "I don't to do anything improper.
 There's an easy way to settle it." She continued to glance at
 Winterbourne. "The Pincio is only a hundred yards distant; and if Mr.
 Winterbourne were as polite as he pretends, he would offer to walk with
 me!"
 
 Winterbourne's politeness hastened to affirm itself, and the young girl
--**--**--
 and Germans, and Italians. I think I like the English best. I like their
 style of conversation. But there are some lovely Americans. I never saw
 anything so hospitable. There's something or other every day. There's
 not much dancing; but I must say I never thought dancing was everything.
 I was always fond of conversation. I guess I shall have plenty at Mrs.
 Walker's, her rooms are so small." When they had passed the gate of the
 Pincian Gardens, Miss Miller began to wonder where Mr. Giovanelli might
 be. "We had better go straight to that place in front," she said, "where
 you look at the view."
 
 "I certainly shall not help you to find him," Winterbourne declared.
 
 "Then I shall find him without you," cried Miss Daisy.
 
 "You certainly won't leave me!" cried Winterbourne.
 
 She burst into her little laugh. "Are you afraid you'll get lost--or run
 over? But there's Giovanelli, leaning against that tree. He's staring at
 the women in the carriages: did you ever see anything so cool?"
 
 Winterbourne perceived at some distance a little man standing with
 folded arms nursing his cane. He had a handsome face, an artfully poised
 hat, a glass in one eye, and a nosegay in his buttonhole. Winterbourne
 looked at him a moment and then said, "Do you mean to speak to that
 man?"
 
 "Do I mean to speak to him? Why, you don't suppose I mean to communicate
 by signs?"
 
 "Pray understand, then," said Winterbourne, "that I intend to remain
 with you."
 
 Daisy stopped and looked at him, without a sign of troubled
 consciousness in her face, with nothing but the presence of her charming
 eyes and her happy dimples. "Well, she's a cool one!" thought the young
 man.
 
 "I don't like the way you say that," said Daisy. "It's too imperious."
--**--**--
 practiced the idiom upon a great many American heiresses--addressed her
 a great deal of very polite nonsense; he was extremely urbane, and the
 young American, who said nothing, reflected upon that profundity of
 Italian cleverness which enables people to appear more gracious in
 proportion as they are more acutely disappointed. Giovanelli, of course,
 had counted upon something more intimate; he had not bargained for
 a party of three. But he kept his temper in a manner which suggested
 far-stretching intentions. Winterbourne flattered himself that he had
 taken his measure. "He is not a gentleman," said the young American;
 "he is only a clever imitation of one. He is a music master, or a
 penny-a-liner, or a third-rate artist. D__n his good looks!" Mr.
 Giovanelli had certainly a very pretty face; but Winterbourne felt a
 superior indignation at his own lovely fellow countrywoman's not knowing
 the difference between a spurious gentleman and a real one. Giovanelli
 chattered and jested and made himself wonderfully agreeable. It was
 true that, if he was an imitation, the imitation was brilliant.
 "Nevertheless," Winterbourne said to himself, "a nice girl ought to
 know!" And then he came back to the question whether this was, in fact,
 a nice girl. Would a nice girl, even allowing for her being a little
 American flirt, make a rendezvous with a presumably low-lived foreigner?
 The rendezvous in this case, indeed, had been in broad daylight and in
 the most crowded corner of Rome, but was it not impossible to regard the
 choice of these circumstances as a proof of extreme cynicism? Singular
 though it may seem, Winterbourne was vexed that the young girl, in
 joining her amoroso, should not appear more impatient of his own
 company, and he was vexed because of his inclination. It was impossible
 to regard her as a perfectly well-conducted young lady; she was wanting
--**--**--
 Mrs. Walker tried. The young man went in pursuit of Miss Miller, who
 had simply nodded and smiled at his interlocutor in the carriage and
 had gone her way with her companion. Daisy, on learning that Mrs. Walker
 wished to speak to her, retraced her steps with a perfect good grace and
 with Mr. Giovanelli at her side. She declared that she was delighted to
 have a chance to present this gentleman to Mrs. Walker. She immediately
 achieved the introduction, and declared that she had never in her life
 seen anything so lovely as Mrs. Walker's carriage rug.
 
 "I am glad you admire it," said this lady, smiling sweetly. "Will you
 get in and let me put it over you?"
 
 "Oh, no, thank you," said Daisy. "I shall admire it much more as I see
 you driving round with it."
 
 "Do get in and drive with me!" said Mrs. Walker.
 
 "That would be charming, but it's so enchanting just as I am!" and Daisy
 gave a brilliant glance at the gentlemen on either side of her.
 
 "It may be enchanting, dear child, but it is not the custom here," urged
 Mrs. Walker, leaning forward in her victoria, with her hands devoutly
 clasped.
 
 "Well, it ought to be, then!" said Daisy. "If I didn't walk I should
 expire."
 
 "You should walk with your mother, dear," cried the lady from Geneva,
 losing patience.
 
 "With my mother dear!" exclaimed the young girl. Winterbourne saw that
 she scented interference. "My mother never walked ten steps in her life.
 And then, you know," she added with a laugh, "I am more than five years
 old."
 
 "You are old enough to be more reasonable. You are old enough, dear Miss
 Miller, to be talked about."
 
 Daisy looked at Mrs. Walker, smiling intensely. "Talked about? What do
--**--**--
 away.
 
 Mrs. Walker sat looking after her, and there were tears in Mrs. Walker's
 eyes. "Get in here, sir," she said to Winterbourne, indicating the place
 beside her. The young man answered that he felt bound to accompany Miss
 Miller, whereupon Mrs. Walker declared that if he refused her this
 favor she would never speak to him again. She was evidently in earnest.
 Winterbourne overtook Daisy and her companion, and, offering the young
 girl his hand, told her that Mrs. Walker had made an imperious claim
 upon his society. He expected that in answer she would say something
 rather free, something to commit herself still further to that
 "recklessness" from which Mrs. Walker had so charitably endeavored to
 dissuade her. But she only shook his hand, hardly looking at him, while
 Mr. Giovanelli bade him farewell with a too emphatic flourish of the
 hat.
 
 Winterbourne was not in the best possible humor as he took his seat in
 Mrs. Walker's victoria. "That was not clever of you," he said candidly,
 while the vehicle mingled again with the throng of carriages.
 
 "In such a case," his companion answered, "I don't wish to be clever; I
 wish to be EARNEST!"
 
 "Well, your earnestness has only offended her and put her off."
 
 "It has happened very well," said Mrs. Walker. "If she is so perfectly
 determined to compromise herself, the sooner one knows it the better;
 one can act accordingly."
 
 "I suspect she meant no harm," Winterbourne rejoined.
 
 "So I thought a month ago. But she has been going too far."
 
 "What has she been doing?"
 
 "Everything that is not done here. Flirting with any man she could pick
 up; sitting in corners with mysterious Italians; dancing all the evening
 with the same partners; receiving visits at eleven o'clock at night. Her
--**--**--
 The carriage was traversing that part of the Pincian Garden that
 overhangs the wall of Rome and overlooks the beautiful Villa Borghese.
 It is bordered by a large parapet, near which there are several seats.
 One of the seats at a distance was occupied by a gentleman and a lady,
 toward whom Mrs. Walker gave a toss of her head. At the same moment
 these persons rose and walked toward the parapet. Winterbourne had asked
 the coachman to stop; he now descended from the carriage. His companion
 looked at him a moment in silence; then, while he raised his hat, she
 drove majestically away. Winterbourne stood there; he had turned his
 eyes toward Daisy and her cavalier. They evidently saw no one; they were
 too deeply occupied with each other. When they reached the low garden
 wall, they stood a moment looking off at the great flat-topped pine
 clusters of the Villa Borghese; then Giovanelli seated himself,
 familiarly, upon the broad ledge of the wall. The western sun in the
 opposite sky sent out a brilliant shaft through a couple of cloud bars,
 whereupon Daisy's companion took her parasol out of her hands and opened
 it. She came a little nearer, and he held the parasol over her; then,
 still holding it, he let it rest upon her shoulder, so that both of
 their heads were hidden from Winterbourne. This young man lingered a
 moment, then he began to walk. But he walked--not toward the couple with
 the parasol; toward the residence of his aunt, Mrs. Costello.
 
 He flattered himself on the following day that there was no smiling
 among the servants when he, at least, asked for Mrs. Miller at her
 hotel. This lady and her daughter, however, were not at home; and on
 the next day after, repeating his visit, Winterbourne again had the
--**--**--
 round with Mr. Giovanelli."
 
 "This is most horrible!" said Mrs. Walker, turning away and addressing
 herself to Winterbourne. "Elle s'affiche. It's her revenge for my having
 ventured to remonstrate with her. When she comes, I shall not speak to
 her."
 
 Daisy came after eleven o'clock; but she was not, on such an occasion,
 a young lady to wait to be spoken to. She rustled forward in radiant
 loveliness, smiling and chattering, carrying a large bouquet, and
 attended by Mr. Giovanelli. Everyone stopped talking and turned and
 looked at her. She came straight to Mrs. Walker. "I'm afraid you thought
 I never was coming, so I sent mother off to tell you. I wanted to make
 Mr. Giovanelli practice some things before he came; you know he sings
 beautifully, and I want you to ask him to sing. This is Mr. Giovanelli;
 you know I introduced him to you; he's got the most lovely voice, and
 he knows the most charming set of songs. I made him go over them this
 evening on purpose; we had the greatest time at the hotel." Of all
 this Daisy delivered herself with the sweetest, brightest audibleness,
 looking now at her hostess and now round the room, while she gave a
 series of little pats, round her shoulders, to the edges of her dress.
 "Is there anyone I know?" she asked.
 
 "I think every one knows you!" said Mrs. Walker pregnantly, and she gave
 a very cursory greeting to Mr. Giovanelli. This gentleman bore himself
 gallantly. He smiled and bowed and showed his white teeth; he curled his
 mustaches and rolled his eyes and performed all the proper functions
 of a handsome Italian at an evening party. He sang very prettily half
 a dozen songs, though Mrs. Walker afterward declared that she had been
--**--**--
 that was not? But I suppose you will tell me now that I am not a nice
 girl."
 
 "You're a very nice girl; but I wish you would flirt with me, and me
 only," said Winterbourne.
 
 "Ah! thank you--thank you very much; you are the last man I should think
 of flirting with. As I have had the pleasure of informing you, you are
 too stiff."
 
 "You say that too often," said Winterbourne.
 
 Daisy gave a delighted laugh. "If I could have the sweet hope of making
 you angry, I should say it again."
 
 "Don't do that; when I am angry I'm stiffer than ever. But if you won't
 flirt with me, do cease, at least, to flirt with your friend at the
 piano; they don't understand that sort of thing here."
 
 "I thought they understood nothing else!" exclaimed Daisy.
 
 "Not in young unmarried women."
 
 "It seems to me much more proper in young unmarried women than in old
 married ones," Daisy declared.
 
 "Well," said Winterbourne, "when you deal with natives you must go
 by the custom of the place. Flirting is a purely American custom;
 it doesn't exist here. So when you show yourself in public with Mr.
 Giovanelli, and without your mother--"
 
 "Gracious! poor Mother!" interposed Daisy.
 
 "Though you may be flirting, Mr. Giovanelli is not; he means something
 else."
 
 "He isn't preaching, at any rate," said Daisy with vivacity. "And if you
 want very much to know, we are neither of us flirting; we are too good
 friends for that: we are very intimate friends."
 
 "Ah!" rejoined Winterbourne, "if you are in love with each other, it is
 another affair."
 
 She had allowed him up to this point to talk so frankly that he had no
 expectation of shocking her by this ejaculation; but she immediately got
--**--**--
 very pale and looked at her mother, but Mrs. Miller was humbly
 unconscious of any violation of the usual social forms. She appeared,
 indeed, to have felt an incongruous impulse to draw attention to her own
 striking observance of them. "Good night, Mrs. Walker," she said; "we've
 had a beautiful evening. You see, if I let Daisy come to parties without
 me, I don't want her to go away without me." Daisy turned away, looking
 with a pale, grave face at the circle near the door; Winterbourne saw
 that, for the first moment, she was too much shocked and puzzled even
 for indignation. He on his side was greatly touched.
 
 "That was very cruel," he said to Mrs. Walker.
 
 "She never enters my drawing room again!" replied his hostess.
 
 Since Winterbourne was not to meet her in Mrs. Walker's drawing room, he
 went as often as possible to Mrs. Miller's hotel. The ladies were rarely
 at home, but when he found them, the devoted Giovanelli was always
 present. Very often the brilliant little Roman was in the drawing room
 with Daisy alone, Mrs. Miller being apparently constantly of the opinion
 that discretion is the better part of surveillance. Winterbourne
 noted, at first with surprise, that Daisy on these occasions was never
 embarrassed or annoyed by his own entrance; but he very presently began
 to feel that she had no more surprises for him; the unexpected in her
 behavior was the only thing to expect. She showed no displeasure at
 her tete-a-tete with Giovanelli being interrupted; she could chatter as
 freshly and freely with two gentlemen as with one; there was always,
 in her conversation, the same odd mixture of audacity and puerility.
 Winterbourne remarked to himself that if she was seriously interested in
 Giovanelli, it was very singular that she should not take more trouble
--**--**--
 "And what is it," he asked, "that you accuse me of thinking of?"
 
 "Of that young lady's--Miss Baker's, Miss Chandler's--what's her
 name?--Miss Miller's intrigue with that little barber's block."
 
 "Do you call it an intrigue," Winterbourne asked--"an affair that goes
 on with such peculiar publicity?"
 
 "That's their folly," said Mrs. Costello; "it's not their merit."
 
 "No," rejoined Winterbourne, with something of that pensiveness to which
 his aunt had alluded. "I don't believe that there is anything to be
 called an intrigue."
 
 "I have heard a dozen people speak of it; they say she is quite carried
 away by him."
 
 "They are certainly very intimate," said Winterbourne.
 
 Mrs. Costello inspected the young couple again with her optical
 instrument. "He is very handsome. One easily sees how it is. She thinks
 him the most elegant man in the world, the finest gentleman. She has
 never seen anything like him; he is better, even, than the courier.
 It was the courier probably who introduced him; and if he succeeds in
 marrying the young lady, the courier will come in for a magnificent
 commission."
 
 "I don't believe she thinks of marrying him," said Winterbourne, "and I
 don't believe he hopes to marry her."
 
 "You may be very sure she thinks of nothing. She goes on from day to
 day, from hour to hour, as they did in the Golden Age. I can imagine
 nothing more vulgar. And at the same time," added Mrs. Costello, "depend
 upon it that she may tell you any moment that she is 'engaged.'"
 
 "I think that is more than Giovanelli expects," said Winterbourne.
 
 "Who is Giovanelli?"
 
 "The little Italian. I have asked questions about him and learned
 something. He is apparently a perfectly respectable little man. I
 believe he is, in a small way, a cavaliere avvocato. But he doesn't
--**--**--
 coming out upon the great steps of the church, he saw Daisy, who had
 emerged before him, get into an open cab with her accomplice and roll
 away through the cynical streets of Rome, he could not deny to himself
 that she was going very far indeed. He felt very sorry for her--not
 exactly that he believed that she had completely lost her head, but
 because it was painful to hear so much that was pretty, and undefended,
 and natural assigned to a vulgar place among the categories of disorder.
 He made an attempt after this to give a hint to Mrs. Miller. He met one
 day in the Corso a friend, a tourist like himself, who had just come
 out of the Doria Palace, where he had been walking through the beautiful
 gallery. His friend talked for a moment about the superb portrait
 of Innocent X by Velasquez which hangs in one of the cabinets of the
 palace, and then said, "And in the same cabinet, by the way, I had the
 pleasure of contemplating a picture of a different kind--that pretty
 American girl whom you pointed out to me last week." In answer to
 Winterbourne's inquiries, his friend narrated that the pretty American
 girl--prettier than ever--was seated with a companion in the secluded
 nook in which the great papal portrait was enshrined.
 
 "Who was her companion?" asked Winterbourne.
 
 "A little Italian with a bouquet in his buttonhole. The girl is
 delightfully pretty, but I thought I understood from you the other day
 that she was a young lady du meilleur monde."
 
 "So she is!" answered Winterbourne; and having assured himself that his
 informant had seen Daisy and her companion but five minutes before, he
 jumped into a cab and went to call on Mrs. Miller. She was at home; but
--**--**--
 Daisy's defiance came from the consciousness of innocence, or from her
 being, essentially, a young person of the reckless class. It must be
 admitted that holding one's self to a belief in Daisy's "innocence" came
 to seem to Winterbourne more and more a matter of fine-spun gallantry.
 As I have already had occasion to relate, he was angry at finding
 himself reduced to chopping logic about this young lady; he was vexed at
 his want of instinctive certitude as to how far her eccentricities were
 generic, national, and how far they were personal. From either view
 of them he had somehow missed her, and now it was too late. She was
 "carried away" by Mr. Giovanelli.
 
 A few days after his brief interview with her mother, he encountered her
 in that beautiful abode of flowering desolation known as the Palace of
 the Caesars. The early Roman spring had filled the air with bloom and
 perfume, and the rugged surface of the Palatine was muffled with tender
 verdure. Daisy was strolling along the top of one of those great mounds
 of ruin that are embanked with mossy marble and paved with monumental
 inscriptions. It seemed to him that Rome had never been so lovely as
 just then. He stood, looking off at the enchanting harmony of line and
 color that remotely encircles the city, inhaling the softly humid odors,
 and feeling the freshness of the year and the antiquity of the place
 reaffirm themselves in mysterious interfusion. It seemed to him also
 that Daisy had never looked so pretty, but this had been an observation
 of his whenever he met her. Giovanelli was at her side, and Giovanelli,
 too, wore an aspect of even unwonted brilliancy.
 
 "Well," said Daisy, "I should think you would be lonesome!"
 
 "Lonesome?" asked Winterbourne.
 
 "You are always going round by yourself. Can't you get anyone to walk
--**--**--
 "You will find I am not so stiff as several others," said Winterbourne,
 smiling.
 
 "How shall I find it?"
 
 "By going to see the others."
 
 "What will they do to me?"
 
 "They will give you the cold shoulder. Do you know what that means?"
 
 Daisy was looking at him intently; she began to color. "Do you mean as
 Mrs. Walker did the other night?"
 
 "Exactly!" said Winterbourne.
 
 She looked away at Giovanelli, who was decorating himself with his
 almond blossom. Then looking back at Winterbourne, "I shouldn't think
 you would let people be so unkind!" she said.
 
 "How can I help it?" he asked.
 
 "I should think you would say something."
 
 "I do say something;" and he paused a moment. "I say that your mother
 tells me that she believes you are engaged."
 
 "Well, she does," said Daisy very simply.
 
 Winterbourne began to laugh. "And does Randolph believe it?" he asked.
 
 "I guess Randolph doesn't believe anything," said Daisy. Randolph's
 skepticism excited Winterbourne to further hilarity, and he observed
 that Giovanelli was coming back to them. Daisy, observing it too,
 addressed herself again to her countryman. "Since you have mentioned
 it," she said, "I AM engaged." * * * Winterbourne looked at her; he had
 stopped laughing. "You don't believe!" she added.
 
 He was silent a moment; and then, "Yes, I believe it," he said.
 
 "Oh, no, you don't!" she answered. "Well, then--I am not!"
 
 The young girl and her cicerone were on their way to the gate of the
 enclosure, so that Winterbourne, who had but lately entered, presently
 took leave of them. A week afterward he went to dine at a beautiful
 villa on the Caelian Hill, and, on arriving, dismissed his hired
 vehicle. The evening was charming, and he promised himself the
 satisfaction of walking home beneath the Arch of Constantine and past
--**--**--
 "He will have to take me first; you will serve for dessert!"
 
 Winterbourne stopped, with a sort of horror, and, it must be added, with
 a sort of relief. It was as if a sudden illumination had been flashed
 upon the ambiguity of Daisy's behavior, and the riddle had become easy
 to read. She was a young lady whom a gentleman need no longer be
 at pains to respect. He stood there, looking at her--looking at her
 companion and not reflecting that though he saw them vaguely, he himself
 must have been more brightly visible. He felt angry with himself that he
 had bothered so much about the right way of regarding Miss Daisy Miller.
 Then, as he was going to advance again, he checked himself, not from the
 fear that he was doing her injustice, but from a sense of the danger
 of appearing unbecomingly exhilarated by this sudden revulsion from
 cautious criticism. He turned away toward the entrance of the place,
 but, as he did so, he heard Daisy speak again.
 
 "Why, it was Mr. Winterbourne! He saw me, and he cuts me!"
 
 What a clever little reprobate she was, and how smartly she played at
 injured innocence! But he wouldn't cut her. Winterbourne came forward
 again and went toward the great cross. Daisy had got up; Giovanelli
 lifted his hat. Winterbourne had now begun to think simply of the
 craziness, from a sanitary point of view, of a delicate young girl
 lounging away the evening in this nest of malaria. What if she WERE
 a clever little reprobate? that was no reason for her dying of the
 perniciosa. "How long have you been here?" he asked almost brutally.
 
 Daisy, lovely in the flattering moonlight, looked at him a moment.
 Then--"All the evening," she answered, gently. * * * "I never saw
--**--**--
 still laughing.
 
 "Well, what do you believe now?"
 
 "I believe that it makes very little difference whether you are engaged
 or not!"
 
 He felt the young girl's pretty eyes fixed upon him through the thick
 gloom of the archway; she was apparently going to answer. But Giovanelli
 hurried her forward. "Quick! quick!" he said; "if we get in by midnight
 we are quite safe."
 
 Daisy took her seat in the carriage, and the fortunate Italian placed
 himself beside her. "Don't forget Eugenio's pills!" said Winterbourne as
 he lifted his hat.
 
 "I don't care," said Daisy in a little strange tone, "whether I have
 Roman fever or not!" Upon this the cab driver cracked his whip, and they
 rolled away over the desultory patches of the antique pavement.
 
 Winterbourne, to do him justice, as it were, mentioned to no one that
 he had encountered Miss Miller, at midnight, in the Colosseum with a
 gentleman; but nevertheless, a couple of days later, the fact of her
 having been there under these circumstances was known to every member
 of the little American circle, and commented accordingly. Winterbourne
 reflected that they had of course known it at the hotel, and that, after
 Daisy's return, there had been an exchange of remarks between the porter
 and the cab driver. But the young man was conscious, at the same moment,
 that it had ceased to be a matter of serious regret to him that the
 little American flirt should be "talked about" by low-minded menials.
 These people, a day or two later, had serious information to give: the
 little American flirt was alarmingly ill. Winterbourne, when the rumor
 came to him, immediately went to the hotel for more news. He found that
 two or three charitable friends had preceded him, and that they were
 being entertained in Mrs. Miller's salon by Randolph.
--**--**--
 nearer still before Winterbourne turned away. Giovanelli was very pale:
 on this occasion he had no flower in his buttonhole; he seemed to wish
 to say something. At last he said, "She was the most beautiful young
 lady I ever saw, and the most amiable;" and then he added in a moment,
 "and she was the most innocent."
 
 Winterbourne looked at him and presently repeated his words, "And the
 most innocent?"
 
 "The most innocent!"
 
 Winterbourne felt sore and angry. "Why the devil," he asked, "did you
 take her to that fatal place?"
 
 Mr. Giovanelli's urbanity was apparently imperturbable. He looked on the
 ground a moment, and then he said, "For myself I had no fear; and she
 wanted to go."
 
 "That was no reason!" Winterbourne declared.
 
 The subtle Roman again dropped his eyes. "If she had lived, I should
 have got nothing. She would never have married me, I am sure."
 
 "She would never have married you?"
 
 "For a moment I hoped so. But no. I am sure."
 
 Winterbourne listened to him: he stood staring at the raw protuberance
 among the April daisies. When he turned away again, Mr. Giovanelli, with
 his light, slow step, had retired.
 
 Winterbourne almost immediately left Rome; but the following summer he
 again met his aunt, Mrs. Costello at Vevey. Mrs. Costello was fond of
 Vevey. In the interval Winterbourne had often thought of Daisy Miller
 and her mystifying manners. One day he spoke of her to his aunt--said it
 was on his conscience that he had done her injustice.
 
 "I am sure I don't know," said Mrs. Costello. "How did your injustice
 affect her?"
 
 "She sent me a message before her death which I didn't understand at the
 time; but I have understood it since. She would have appreciated one's
 esteem."
 
 "Is that a modest way," asked Mrs. Costello, "of saying that she would
--**--**--
 and by that of those who knew nothing.  The great rooms caused so much
 poetry and history to press upon him that he needed some straying apart
 to feel in a proper relation with them, though this impulse was not, as
 happened, like the gloating of some of his companions, to be compared to
 the movements of a dog sniffing a cupboard.  It had an issue promptly
 enough in a direction that was not to have been calculated.
 
 It led, briefly, in the course of the October afternoon, to his closer
 meeting with May Bartram, whose face, a reminder, yet not quite a
 remembrance, as they sat much separated at a very long table, had begun
 merely by troubling him rather pleasantly.  It affected him as the sequel
 of something of which he had lost the beginning.  He knew it, and for the
 time quite welcomed it, as a continuation, but didn't know what it
 continued, which was an interest or an amusement the greater as he was
 also somehow aware--yet without a direct sign from her--that the young
 woman herself hadn't lost the thread.  She hadn't lost it, but she
 wouldn't give it back to him, he saw, without some putting forth of his
 hand for it; and he not only saw that, but saw several things more,
 things odd enough in the light of the fact that at the moment some
 accident of grouping brought them face to face he was still merely
 fumbling with the idea that any contact between them in the past would
 have had no importance.  If it had had no importance he scarcely knew why
 his actual impression of her should so seem to have so much; the answer
 to which, however, was that in such a life as they all appeared to be
--**--**--
 old tapestry, old gold, old colour.  It was most of all perhaps in the
 way she came to him as if, since she had been turned on to deal with the
 simpler sort, he might, should he choose to keep the whole thing down,
 just take her mild attention for a part of her general business.  As soon
 as he heard her voice, however, the gap was filled up and the missing
 link supplied; the slight irony he divined in her attitude lost its
 advantage.  He almost jumped at it to get there before her.  "I met you
 years and years ago in Rome.  I remember all about it."  She confessed to
 disappointment--she had been so sure he didn't; and to prove how well he
 did he began to pour forth the particular recollections that popped up as
 he called for them.  Her face and her voice, all at his service now,
 worked the miracle--the impression operating like the torch of a
 lamplighter who touches into flame, one by one, a long row of gas-jets.
 Marcher flattered himself the illumination was brilliant, yet he was
 really still more pleased on her showing him, with amusement, that in his
 haste to make everything right he had got most things rather wrong.  It
 hadn't been at Rome--it had been at Naples; and it hadn't been eight
 years before--it had been more nearly ten.  She hadn't been, either, with
 her uncle and aunt, but with her mother and brother; in addition to which
 it was not with the Pembles _he_ had been, but with the Boyers, coming
 down in their company from Rome--a point on which she insisted, a little
 to his confusion, and as to which she had her evidence in hand.  The
 Boyers she had known, but didn't know the Pembles, though she had heard
--**--**--
 (didn't it seem?) to sprout after so many years.  Marcher could only feel
 he ought to have rendered her some service--saved her from a capsized
 boat in the bay or at least recovered her dressing-bag, filched from her
 cab in the streets of Naples by a lazzarone with a stiletto.  Or it would
 have been nice if he could have been taken with fever all alone at his
 hotel, and she could have come to look after him, to write to his people,
 to drive him out in convalescence.  _Then_ they would be in possession of
 the something or other that their actual show seemed to lack.  It yet
 somehow presented itself, this show, as too good to be spoiled; so that
 they were reduced for a few minutes more to wondering a little helplessly
 why--since they seemed to know a certain number of the same people--their
 reunion had been so long averted.  They didn't use that name for it, but
 their delay from minute to minute to join the others was a kind of
 confession that they didn't quite want it to be a failure.  Their
 attempted supposition of reasons for their not having met but showed how
 little they knew of each other.  There came in fact a moment when Marcher
 felt a positive pang.  It was vain to pretend she was an old friend, for
 all the communities were wanting, in spite of which it was as an old
 friend that he saw she would have suited him.  He had new ones enough--was
 surrounded with them for instance on the stage of the other house; as a
 new one he probably wouldn't have so much as noticed her.  He would have
 liked to invent something, get her to make-believe with him that some
 passage of a romantic or critical kind _had_ originally occurred.  He was
--**--**--
 "I'm not very sure you do," May Bartram after a moment said; "and I'm not
 very sure I ought to want you to.  It's dreadful to bring a person back
 at any time to what he was ten years before.  If you've lived away from
 it," she smiled, "so much the better."
 
 "Ah if _you_ haven't why should I?" he asked.
 
 "Lived away, you mean, from what I myself was?"
 
 "From what _I_ was.  I was of course an ass," Marcher went on; "but I
 would rather know from you just the sort of ass I was than--from the
 moment you have something in your mind--not know anything."
 
 Still, however, she hesitated.  "But if you've completely ceased to be
 that sort--?"
 
 "Why I can then all the more bear to know.  Besides, perhaps I haven't."
 
 "Perhaps.  Yet if you haven't," she added, "I should suppose you'd
 remember.  Not indeed that _I_ in the least connect with my impression
 the invidious name you use.  If I had only thought you foolish," she
 explained, "the thing I speak of wouldn't so have remained with me.  It
 was about yourself."  She waited as if it might come to him; but as, only
 meeting her eyes in wonder, he gave no sign, she burnt her ships.  "Has
 it ever happened?"
 
 Then it was that, while he continued to stare, a light broke for him and
 the blood slowly came to his face, which began to burn with recognition.
 
 "Do you mean I told you--?"  But he faltered, lest what came to him
 shouldn't be right, lest he should only give himself away.
 
 "It was something about yourself that it was natural one shouldn't
 forget--that is if one remembered you at all.  That's why I ask you," she
 smiled, "if the thing you then spoke of has ever come to pass?"
--**--**--
 he felt was that he couldn't at present have begun to tell her, and yet
 could profit perhaps exquisitely by the accident of having done so of
 old.  "Please don't then.  We're just right as it is."
 
 "Oh I am," she laughed, "if you are!"  To which she added: "Then you do
 still feel in the same way?"
 
 It was impossible he shouldn't take to himself that she was really
 interested, though it all kept coming as a perfect surprise.  He had
 thought of himself so long as abominably alone, and lo he wasn't alone a
 bit.  He hadn't been, it appeared, for an hour--since those moments on
 the Sorrento boat.  It was she who had been, he seemed to see as he
 looked at her--she who had been made so by the graceless fact of his
 lapse of fidelity.  To tell her what he had told her--what had it been
 but to ask something of her? something that she had given, in her
 charity, without his having, by a remembrance, by a return of the spirit,
 failing another encounter, so much as thanked her.  What he had asked of
 her had been simply at first not to laugh at him.  She had beautifully
 not done so for ten years, and she was not doing so now.  So he had
 endless gratitude to make up.  Only for that he must see just how he had
 figured to her.  "What, exactly, was the account I gave--?"
 
 "Of the way you did feel?  Well, it was very simple.  You said you had
 had from your earliest time, as the deepest thing within you, the sense
 of being kept for something rare and strange, possibly prodigious and
 terrible, that was sooner or later to happen to you, that you had in your
--**--**--
 that of mockery.  "Isn't what you describe perhaps but the expectation--or
 at any rate the sense of danger, familiar to so many people--of falling
 in love?"
 
 John Marcher thought.  "Did you ask me that before?"
 
 "No--I wasn't so free-and-easy then.  But it's what strikes me now."
 
 "Of course," he said after a moment, "it strikes you.  Of course it
 strikes _me_.  Of course what's in store for me may be no more than that.
 The only thing is," he went on, "that I think if it had been that I
 should by this time know."
 
 "Do you mean because you've _been_ in love?"  And then as he but looked
 at her in silence: "You've been in love, and it hasn't meant such a
 cataclysm, hasn't proved the great affair?"
 
 "Here I am, you see.  It hasn't been overwhelming."
 
 "Then it hasn't been love," said May Bartram.
 
 "Well, I at least thought it was.  I took it for that--I've taken it till
 now.  It was agreeable, it was delightful, it was miserable," he
 explained.  "But it wasn't strange.  It wasn't what my affair's to be."
 
 "You want something all to yourself--something that nobody else knows or
 _has_ known?"
 
 "It isn't a question of what I 'want'--God knows I don't want anything.
 It's only a question of the apprehension that haunts me--that I live with
 day by day."
 
 He said this so lucidly and consistently that he could see it further
 impose itself.  If she hadn't been interested before she'd have been
 interested now.
 
 "Is it a sense of coming violence?"
 
 Evidently now too again he liked to talk of it.  "I don't think of it
 as--when it does come--necessarily violent.  I only think of it as
 natural and as of course above all unmistakeable.  I think of it simply
 as _the_ thing.  _The_ thing will of itself appear natural."
--**--**--
 "No," said May Bartram.  "I understand you.  I believe you."
 
 "You mean you feel how my obsession--poor old thing--may correspond to
 some possible reality?"
 
 "To some possible reality."
 
 "Then you _will_ watch with me?"
 
 She hesitated, then for the third time put her question.  "Are you
 afraid?"
 
 "Did I tell you I was--at Naples?"
 
 "No, you said nothing about it."
 
 "Then I don't know.  And I should like to know," said John Marcher.
 "You'll tell me yourself whether you think so.  If you'll watch with me
 you'll see."
 
 "Very good then."  They had been moving by this time across the room, and
 at the door, before passing out, they paused as for the full wind-up of
 their understanding.  "I'll watch with you," said May Bartram.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II
 
 
 The fact that she "knew"--knew and yet neither chaffed him nor betrayed
 him--had in a short time begun to constitute between them a goodly bond,
 which became more marked when, within the year that followed their
 afternoon at Weatherend, the opportunities for meeting multiplied.  The
 event that thus promoted these occasions was the death of the ancient
 lady her great-aunt, under whose wing, since losing her mother, she had
 to such an extent found shelter, and who, though but the widowed mother
 of the new successor to the property, had succeeded--thanks to a high
 tone and a high temper--in not forfeiting the supreme position at the
 great house.  The deposition of this personage arrived but with her
 death, which, followed by many changes, made in particular a difference
 for the young woman in whom Marcher's expert attention had recognised
 from the first a dependent with a pride that might ache though it didn't
 bristle.  Nothing for a long time had made him easier than the thought
 that the aching must have been much soothed by Miss Bartram's now finding
--**--**--
 comfort, as he felt, for the future, that this accident itself had helped
 to keep fresh.  It had never entered into his plan that any one should
 "know", and mainly for the reason that it wasn't in him to tell any one.
 That would have been impossible, for nothing but the amusement of a cold
 world would have waited on it.  Since, however, a mysterious fate had
 opened his mouth betimes, in spite of him, he would count that a
 compensation and profit by it to the utmost.  That the right person
 _should_ know tempered the asperity of his secret more even than his
 shyness had permitted him to imagine; and May Bartram was clearly right,
 because--well, because there she was.  Her knowledge simply settled it;
 he would have been sure enough by this time had she been wrong.  There
 was that in his situation, no doubt, that disposed him too much to see
 her as a mere confidant, taking all her light for him from the fact--the
 fact only--of her interest in his predicament; from her mercy, sympathy,
 seriousness, her consent not to regard him as the funniest of the funny.
 Aware, in fine, that her price for him was just in her giving him this
 constant sense of his being admirably spared, he was careful to remember
 that she had also a life of her own, with things that might happen to
 _her_, things that in friendship one should likewise take account of.
 Something fairly remarkable came to pass with him, for that matter, in
 this connexion--something represented by a certain passage of his
 consciousness, in the suddenest way, from one extreme to the other.
 
 He had thought himself, so long as nobody knew, the most disinterested
 person in the world, carrying his concentrated burden, his perpetual
--**--**--
 precisely what was the matter with him.  Something or other lay in wait
 for him, amid the twists and the turns of the months and the years, like
 a crouching Beast in the Jungle.  It signified little whether the
 crouching Beast were destined to slay him or to be slain.  The definite
 point was the inevitable spring of the creature; and the definite lesson
 from that was that a man of feeling didn't cause himself to be
 accompanied by a lady on a tiger-hunt.  Such was the image under which he
 had ended by figuring his life.
 
 They had at first, none the less, in the scattered hours spent together,
 made no allusion to that view of it; which was a sign he was handsomely
 alert to give that he didn't expect, that he in fact didn't care, always
 to be talking about it.  Such a feature in one's outlook was really like
 a hump on one's back.  The difference it made every minute of the day
 existed quite independently of discussion.  One discussed of course
 _like_ a hunchback, for there was always, if nothing else, the hunchback
 face.  That remained, and she was watching him; but people watched best,
 as a general thing, in silence, so that such would be predominantly the
 manner of their vigil.  Yet he didn't want, at the same time, to be tense
 and solemn; tense and solemn was what he imagined he too much showed for
 with other people.  The thing to be, with the one person who knew, was
 easy and natural--to make the reference rather than be seeming to avoid
 it, to avoid it rather than be seeming to make it, and to keep it, in any
 case, familiar, facetious even, rather than pedantic and portentous.  Some
 such consideration as the latter was doubtless in his mind for instance
--**--**--
 her.  _She_ at least never spoke of the secret of his life except as "the
 real truth about you," and she had in fact a wonderful way of making it
 seem, as such, the secret of her own life too.  That was in fine how he
 so constantly felt her as allowing for him; he couldn't on the whole call
 it anything else.  He allowed for himself, but she, exactly, allowed
 still more; partly because, better placed for a sight of the matter, she
 traced his unhappy perversion through reaches of its course into which he
 could scarce follow it.  He knew how he felt, but, besides knowing that,
 she knew how he looked as well; he knew each of the things of importance
 he was insidiously kept from doing, but she could add up the amount they
 made, understand how much, with a lighter weight on his spirit, he might
 have done, and thereby establish how, clever as he was, he fell short.
 Above all she was in the secret of the difference between the forms he
 went through--those of his little office under Government, those of
 caring for his modest patrimony, for his library, for his garden in the
 country, for the people in London whose invitations he accepted and
 repaid--and the detachment that reigned beneath them and that made of all
 behaviour, all that could in the least be called behaviour, a long act of
 dissimulation.  What it had come to was that he wore a mask painted with
 the social simper, out of the eye-holes of which there looked eyes of an
 expression not in the least matching the other features.  This the stupid
 world, even after years, had never more than half discovered.  It was
 only May Bartram who had, and she achieved, by an art indescribable, the
--**--**--
 different developments.  What we are especially concerned with is the
 turn it happened to take from her one afternoon when he had come to see
 her in honour of her birthday.  This anniversary had fallen on a Sunday,
 at a season of thick fog and general outward gloom; but he had brought
 her his customary offering, having known her now long enough to have
 established a hundred small traditions.  It was one of his proofs to
 himself, the present he made her on her birthday, that he hadn't sunk
 into real selfishness.  It was mostly nothing more than a small trinket,
 but it was always fine of its kind, and he was regularly careful to pay
 for it more than he thought he could afford.  "Our habit saves you, at
 least, don't you see? because it makes you, after all, for the vulgar,
 indistinguishable from other men.  What's the most inveterate mark of men
 in general?  Why the capacity to spend endless time with dull women--to
 spend it I won't say without being bored, but without minding that they
 are, without being driven off at a tangent by it; which comes to the same
 thing.  I'm your dull woman, a part of the daily bread for which you pray
 at church.  That covers your tracks more than anything."
 
 "And what covers yours?" asked Marcher, whom his dull woman could mostly
 to this extent amuse.  "I see of course what you mean by your saving me,
 in this way and that, so far as other people are concerned--I've seen it
 all along.  Only what is it that saves _you_?  I often think, you know,
 of that."
 
 She looked as if she sometimes thought of that too, but rather in a
 different way.  "Where other people, you mean, are concerned?"
 
 "Well, you're really so in with me, you know--as a sort of result of my
--**--**--
 Something in this made him look at her with suspicion.  "You say 'were to
 _have_ been,' as if in your heart you had begun to doubt."
 
 "Oh!" she vaguely protested.
 
 "As if you believed," he went on, "that nothing will now take place."
 
 She shook her head slowly but rather inscrutably.  "You're far from my
 thought."
 
 He continued to look at her.  "What then is the matter with you?"
 
 "Well," she said after another wait, "the matter with me is simply that
 I'm more sure than ever my curiosity, as you call it, will be but too
 well repaid."
 
 They were frankly grave now; he had got up from his seat, had turned once
 more about the little drawing-room to which, year after year, he brought
 his inevitable topic; in which he had, as he might have said, tasted
 their intimate community with every sauce, where every object was as
 familiar to him as the things of his own house and the very carpets were
 worn with his fitful walk very much as the desks in old counting-houses
 are worn by the elbows of generations of clerks.  The generations of his
 nervous moods had been at work there, and the place was the written
 history of his whole middle life.  Under the impression of what his
 friend had just said he knew himself, for some reason, more aware of
 these things; which made him, after a moment, stop again before her.  "Is
 it possibly that you've grown afraid?"
 
 "Afraid?"  He thought, as she repeated the word, that his question had
 made her, a little, change colour; so that, lest he should have touched
 on a truth, he explained very kindly: "You remember that that was what
 you asked _me_ long ago--that first day at Weatherend."
 
 "Oh yes, and you told me you didn't know--that I was to see for myself.
--**--**--
 
 John Marcher faintly smiled.  "It's heroic?"
 
 "Certainly--call it that."
 
 It was what he would have liked indeed to call it.  "I _am_ then a man of
 courage?"
 
 "That's what you were to show me."
 
 He still, however, wondered.  "But doesn't the man of courage know what
 he's afraid of--or not afraid of?  I don't know _that_, you see.  I don't
 focus it.  I can't name it.  I only know I'm exposed."
 
 "Yes, but exposed--how shall I say?--so directly.  So intimately.  That's
 surely enough."
 
 "Enough to make you feel then--as what we may call the end and the upshot
 of our watch--that I'm not afraid?"
 
 "You're not afraid.  But it isn't," she said, "the end of our watch.  That
 is it isn't the end of yours.  You've everything still to see."
 
 "Then why haven't you?" he asked.  He had had, all along, to-day, the
 sense of her keeping something back, and he still had it.  As this was
 his first impression of that it quite made a date.  The case was the more
 marked as she didn't at first answer; which in turn made him go on.  "You
 know something I don't."  Then his voice, for that of a man of courage,
 trembled a little.  "You know what's to happen."  Her silence, with the
 face she showed, was almost a confession--it made him sure.  "You know,
 and you're afraid to tell me.  It's so bad that you're afraid I'll find
 out."
 
 All this might be true, for she did look as if, unexpectedly to her, he
 had crossed some mystic line that she had secretly drawn round her.  Yet
 she might, after all, not have worried; and the real climax was that he
 himself, at all events, needn't.  "You'll never find out."
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III
 
 
 It was all to have made, none the less, as I have said, a date; which
--**--**--
 alliance, such as it was, since they must suppose it had been more or
 less noticed, have failed to make her rather positively talked about?
 
 "I never said," May Bartram replied, "that it hadn't made me a good deal
 talked about."
 
 "Ah well then you're not 'saved.'"
 
 "It hasn't been a question for me.  If you've had your woman I've had,"
 she said, "my man."
 
 "And you mean that makes you all right?"
 
 Oh it was always as if there were so much to say!
 
 "I don't know why it shouldn't make me--humanly, which is what we're
 speaking of--as right as it makes you."
 
 "I see," Marcher returned.  "'Humanly,' no doubt, as showing that you're
 living for something.  Not, that is, just for me and my secret."
 
 May Bartram smiled.  "I don't pretend it exactly shows that I'm not
 living for you.  It's my intimacy with you that's in question."
 
 He laughed as he saw what she meant.  "Yes, but since, as you say, I'm
 only, so far as people make out, ordinary, you're--aren't you? no more
 than ordinary either.  You help me to pass for a man like another.  So if
 I _am_, as I understand you, you're not compromised.  Is that it?"
 
 She had another of her waits, but she spoke clearly enough.  "That's it.
 It's all that concerns me--to help you to pass for a man like another."
 
 He was careful to acknowledge the remark handsomely.  "How kind, how
 beautiful, you are to me!  How shall I ever repay you?"
 
 She had her last grave pause, as if there might be a choice of ways.  But
 she chose.  "By going on as you are."
 
 It was into this going on as he was that they relapsed, and really for so
 long a time that the day inevitably came for a further sounding of their
--**--**--
 appearance of uncertainty in her health, co-incident and equally new.  It
 was characteristic of the inner detachment he had hitherto so
 successfully cultivated and to which our whole account of him is a
 reference, it was characteristic that his complications, such as they
 were, had never yet seemed so as at this crisis to thicken about him,
 even to the point of making him ask himself if he were, by any chance, of
 a truth, within sight or sound, within touch or reach, within the
 immediate jurisdiction, of the thing that waited.
 
 When the day came, as come it had to, that his friend confessed to him
 her fear of a deep disorder in her blood, he felt somehow the shadow of a
 change and the chill of a shock.  He immediately began to imagine
 aggravations and disasters, and above all to think of her peril as the
 direct menace for himself of personal privation.  This indeed gave him
 one of those partial recoveries of equanimity that were agreeable to
 him--it showed him that what was still first in his mind was the loss she
 herself might suffer.  "What if she should have to die before knowing,
 before seeing--?"  It would have been brutal, in the early stages of her
 trouble, to put that question to her; but it had immediately sounded for
 him to his own concern, and the possibility was what most made him sorry
 for her.  If she did "know," moreover, in the sense of her having had
 some--what should he think?--mystical irresistible light, this would make
 the matter not better, but worse, inasmuch as her original adoption of
 his own curiosity had quite become the basis of her life.  She had been
 living to see what would _be_ to be seen, and it would quite lacerate her
--**--**--
 spite of which there was small doubt for him that as an answer to his
 long riddle the mere effacement of even so fine a feature of his
 situation would be an abject anticlimax.  It would represent, as
 connected with his past attitude, a drop of dignity under the shadow of
 which his existence could only become the most grotesques of failures.  He
 had been far from holding it a failure--long as he had waited for the
 appearance that was to make it a success.  He had waited for quite
 another thing, not for such a thing as that.  The breath of his good
 faith came short, however, as he recognised how long he had waited, or
 how long at least his companion had.  That she, at all events, might be
 recorded as having waited in vain--this affected him sharply, and all the
 more because of his at first having done little more than amuse himself
 with the idea.  It grew more grave as the gravity of her condition grew,
 and the state of mind it produced in him, which he himself ended by
 watching as if it had been some definite disfigurement of his outer
 person, may pass for another of his surprises.  This conjoined itself
 still with another, the really stupefying consciousness of a question
 that he would have allowed to shape itself had he dared.  What did
 everything mean--what, that is, did _she_ mean, she and her vain waiting
 and her probable death and the soundless admonition of it all--unless
 that, at this time of day, it was simply, it was overwhelmingly too late?
 He had never at any stage of his queer consciousness admitted the whisper
 of such a correction; he had never till within these last few months been
 so false to his conviction as not to hold that what was to come to him
--**--**--
 
 Then it was that, one afternoon, while the spring of the year was young
 and new she met all in her own way his frankest betrayal of these alarms.
 He had gone in late to see her, but evening hadn't settled and she was
 presented to him in that long fresh light of waning April days which
 affects us often with a sadness sharper than the greyest hours of autumn.
 The week had been warm, the spring was supposed to have begun early, and
 May Bartram sat, for the first time in the year, without a fire; a fact
 that, to Marcher's sense, gave the scene of which she formed part a
 smooth and ultimate look, an air of knowing, in its immaculate order and
 cold meaningless cheer, that it would never see a fire again.  Her own
 aspect--he could scarce have said why--intensified this note.  Almost as
 white as wax, with the marks and signs in her face as numerous and as
 fine as if they had been etched by a needle, with soft white draperies
 relieved by a faded green scarf on the delicate tone of which the years
 had further refined, she was the picture of a serene and exquisite but
 impenetrable sphinx, whose head, or indeed all whose person, might have
 been powdered with silver.  She was a sphinx, yet with her white petals
 and green fronds she might have been a lily too--only an artificial lily,
 wonderfully imitated and constantly kept, without dust or stain, though
 not exempt from a slight droop and a complexity of faint creases, under
 some clear glass bell.  The perfection of household care, of high polish
 and finish, always reigned in her rooms, but they now looked most as if
 everything had been wound up, tucked in, put away, so that she might sit
--**--**--
 dismissal and reaction to come out again, sounding for the hour as new.
 She could thus at present meet his enquiry quite freshly and patiently.
 "Oh yes, I've repeatedly thought, only it always seemed to me of old that
 I couldn't quite make up my mind.  I thought of dreadful things, between
 which it was difficult to choose; and so must you have done."
 
 "Rather!  I feel now as if I had scarce done anything else.  I appear to
 myself to have spent my life in thinking of nothing but dreadful things.
 A great many of them I've at different times named to you, but there were
 others I couldn't name."
 
 "They were too, too dreadful?"
 
 "Too, too dreadful--some of them."
 
 She looked at him a minute, and there came to him as he met it, an
 inconsequent sense that her eyes, when one got their full clearness, were
 still as beautiful as they had been in youth, only beautiful with a
 strange cold light--a light that somehow was a part of the effect, if it
 wasn't rather a part of the cause, of the pale hard sweetness of the
 season and the hour.  "And yet," she said at last, "there are horrors
 we've mentioned."
 
 It deepened the strangeness to see her, as such a figure in such a
 picture, talk of "horrors," but she was to do in a few minutes something
 stranger yet--though even of this he was to take the full measure but
 afterwards--and the note of it already trembled.  It was, for the matter
 of that, one of the signs that her eyes were having again the high
 flicker of their prime.  He had to admit, however, what she said.  "Oh
 yes, there were times when we did go far."  He caught himself in the act
--**--**--
 you of conceiving, imagining, comparing.  It isn't a question now of
 choosing."  At last he came out with it.  "You know something I don't.
 You've shown me that before."
 
 These last words had affected her, he made out in a moment, exceedingly,
 and she spoke with firmness.  "I've shown you, my dear, nothing."
 
 He shook his head.  "You can't hide it."
 
 "Oh, oh!" May Bartram sounded over what she couldn't hide.  It was almost
 a smothered groan.
 
 "You admitted it months ago, when I spoke of it to you as of something
 you were afraid I should find out.  Your answer was that I couldn't, that
 I wouldn't, and I don't pretend I have.  But you had something therefore
 in mind, and I see now how it must have been, how it still is, the
 possibility that, of all possibilities, has settled itself for you as the
 worst.  This," he went on, "is why I appeal to you.  I'm only afraid of
 ignorance to-day--I'm not afraid of knowledge."  And then as for a while
 she said nothing: "What makes me sure is that I see in your face and feel
 here, in this air and amid these appearances, that you're out of it.
 You've done.  You've had your experience.  You leave me to my fate."
 
 Well, she listened, motionless and white in her chair, as on a decision
 to be made, so that her manner was fairly an avowal, though still, with a
 small fine inner stiffness, an imperfect surrender.  "It _would_ be the
 worst," she finally let herself say.  "I mean the thing I've never said."
 
 It hushed him a moment.  "More monstrous than all the monstrosities we've
 named?"
 
 "More monstrous.  Isn't that what you sufficiently express," she asked,
 "in calling it the worst?"
 
 Marcher thought.  "Assuredly--if you mean, as I do, something that
--**--**--
 the worst?"
 
 "You think nothing is better?" she asked.
 
 She seemed to mean something so special that he again sharply wondered,
 though still with the dawn of a prospect of relief.  "Why not, if one
 doesn't _know_?"  After which, as their eyes, over his question, met in a
 silence, the dawn deepened, and something to his purpose came
 prodigiously out of her very face.  His own, as he took it in, suddenly
 flushed to the forehead, and he gasped with the force of a perception to
 which, on the instant, everything fitted.  The sound of his gasp filled
 the air; then he became articulate.  "I see--if I don't suffer!"
 
 In her own look, however, was doubt.  "You see what?"
 
 "Why what you mean--what you've always meant."
 
 She again shook her head.  "What I mean isn't what I've always meant.
 It's different."
 
 "It's something new?"
 
 She hung back from it a little.  "Something new.  It's not what you
 think.  I see what you think."
 
 His divination drew breath then; only her correction might be wrong.  "It
 isn't that I _am_ a blockhead?" he asked between faintness and grimness.
 "It isn't that it's all a mistake?"
 
 "A mistake?" she pityingly echoed.  _That_ possibility, for her, he saw,
 would be monstrous; and if she guaranteed him the immunity from pain it
 would accordingly not be what she had in mind.  "Oh no," she declared;
 "it's nothing of that sort.  You've been right."
 
 Yet he couldn't help asking himself if she weren't, thus pressed,
 speaking but to save him.  It seemed to him he should be most in a hole
 if his history should prove all a platitude.  "Are you telling me the
 truth, so that I shan't have been a bigger idiot than I can bear to know?
 I _haven't_ lived with a vain imagination, in the most besotted illusion?
--**--**--
 less, was that what he had expected failed to come to him.  Something
 else took place instead, which seemed to consist at first in the mere
 closing of her eyes.  She gave way at the same instant to a slow fine
 shudder, and though he remained staring--though he stared in fact but the
 harder--turned off and regained her chair.  It was the end of what she
 had been intending, but it left him thinking only of that.
 
 "Well, you don't say--?"
 
 She had touched in her passage a bell near the chimney and had sunk back
 strangely pale.  "I'm afraid I'm too ill."
 
 "Too ill to tell me?" it sprang up sharp to him, and almost to his lips,
 the fear she might die without giving him light.  He checked himself in
 time from so expressing his question, but she answered as if she had
 heard the words.
 
 "Don't you know--now?"
 
 "'Now'--?"   She had spoken as if some difference had been made within
 the moment.  But her maid, quickly obedient to her bell, was already with
 them.  "I know nothing."  And he was afterwards to say to himself that he
 must have spoken with odious impatience, such an impatience as to show
 that, supremely disconcerted, he washed his hands of the whole question.
 
 "Oh!" said May Bartram.
 
 "Are you in pain?" he asked as the woman went to her.
 
 "No," said May Bartram.
 
 Her maid, who had put an arm round her as if to take her to her room,
 fixed on him eyes that appealingly contradicted her; in spite of which,
 however, he showed once more his mystification.
 
 "What then has happened?"
 
 She was once more, with her companion's help, on her feet, and, feeling
 withdrawal imposed on him, he had blankly found his hat and gloves and
--**--**--
 his turn, and even as the consummation of infinite waiting he would bend
 his pride to accept it.  He sat down on a bench in the twilight.  He
 hadn't been a fool.  Something had _been_, as she had said, to come.
 Before he rose indeed it had quite struck him that the final fact really
 matched with the long avenue through which he had had to reach it.  As
 sharing his suspense and as giving herself all, giving her life, to bring
 it to an end, she had come with him every step of the way.  He had lived
 by her aid, and to leave her behind would be cruelly, damnably to miss
 her.  What could be more overwhelming than that?
 
 Well, he was to know within the week, for though she kept him a while at
 bay, left him restless and wretched during a series of days on each of
 which he asked about her only again to have to turn away, she ended his
 trial by receiving him where she had always received him.  Yet she had
 been brought out at some hazard into the presence of so many of the
 things that were, consciously, vainly, half their past, and there was
 scant service left in the gentleness of her mere desire, all too visible,
 to check his obsession and wind up his long trouble.  That was clearly
 what she wanted; the one thing more for her own peace while she could
 still put out her hand.  He was so affected by her state that, once
 seated by her chair, he was moved to let everything go; it was she
 herself therefore who brought him back, took up again, before she
 dismissed him, her last word of the other time.  She showed how she
 wished to leave their business in order.  "I'm not sure you understood.
--**--**--
 the perfect straightness of a sibyl.  She visibly knew that she knew, and
 the effect on him was of something co-ordinate, in its high character,
 with the law that had ruled him.  It was the true voice of the law; so on
 her lips would the law itself have sounded.  "It _has_ touched you," she
 went on.  "It has done its office.  It has made you all its own."
 
 "So utterly without my knowing it?"
 
 "So utterly without your knowing it."  His hand, as he leaned to her, was
 on the arm of her chair, and, dimly smiling always now, she placed her
 own on it.  "It's enough if _I_ know it."
 
 "Oh!" he confusedly breathed, as she herself of late so often had done.
 
 "What I long ago said is true.  You'll never know now, and I think you
 ought to be content.  You've _had_ it," said May Bartram.
 
 "But had what?"
 
 "Why what was to have marked you out.  The proof of your law.  It has
 acted.  I'm too glad," she then bravely added, "to have been able to see
 what it's _not_."
 
 He continued to attach his eyes to her, and with the sense that it was
 all beyond him, and that _she_ was too, he would still have sharply
 challenged her hadn't he so felt it an abuse of her weakness to do more
 than take devoutly what she gave him, take it hushed as to a revelation.
 If he did speak, it was out of the foreknowledge of his loneliness to
 come.  "If you're glad of what it's 'not' it might then have been worse?"
 
 She turned her eyes away, she looked straight before her; with which
 after a moment: "Well, you know our fears."
 
 He wondered.  "It's something then we never feared?"
 
 On this slowly she turned to him.  "Did we ever dream, with all our
--**--**--
 _your_ absence."
 
 "Oh mine!"--and her pale hands made light of it.
 
 "With the absence of everything."  He had a dreadful sense of standing
 there before her for--so far as anything but this proved, this bottomless
 drop was concerned--the last time of their life.  It rested on him with a
 weight he felt he could scarce bear, and this weight it apparently was
 that still pressed out what remained in him of speakable protest.  "I
 believe you; but I can't begin to pretend I understand.  _Nothing_, for
 me, is past; nothing _will_ pass till I pass myself, which I pray my
 stars may be as soon as possible.  Say, however," he added, "that I've
 eaten my cake, as you contend, to the last crumb--how can the thing I've
 never felt at all be the thing I was marked out to feel?"
 
 She met him perhaps less directly, but she met him unperturbed.  "You
 take your 'feelings' for granted.  You were to suffer your fate.  That
 was not necessarily to know it."
 
 "How in the world--when what is such knowledge but suffering?"
 
 She looked up at him a while in silence.  "No--you don't understand."
 
 "I suffer," said John Marcher.
 
 "Don't, don't!"
 
 "How can I help at least _that_?"
 
 "_Don't_!" May Bartram repeated.
 
 She spoke it in a tone so special, in spite of her weakness, that he
 stared an instant--stared as if some light, hitherto hidden, had
 shimmered across his vision.  Darkness again closed over it, but the
 gleam had already become for him an idea.  "Because I haven't the
 right--?"
 
 "Don't _know_--when you needn't," she mercifully urged.  "You needn't--for
 we shouldn't."
 
 "Shouldn't?"  If he could but know what she meant!
 
 "No-- it's too much."
 
 "Too much?" he still asked but with a mystification that was the next
 moment of a sudden to give way.  Her words, if they meant something,
--**--**--
 the great grey London cemetery, to what had been mortal, to what had been
 precious, in his friend.  The concourse at her grave was not numerous,
 but he saw himself treated as scarce more nearly concerned with it than
 if there had been a thousand others.  He was in short from this moment
 face to face with the fact that he was to profit extraordinarily little
 by the interest May Bartram had taken in him.  He couldn't quite have
 said what he expected, but he hadn't surely expected this approach to a
 double privation.  Not only had her interest failed him, but he seemed to
 feel himself unattended--and for a reason he couldn't seize--by the
 distinction, the dignity, the propriety, if nothing else, of the man
 markedly bereaved.  It was as if, in the view of society he had not
 _been_ markedly bereaved, as if there still failed some sign or proof of
 it, and as if none the less his character could never be affirmed nor the
 deficiency ever made up.  There were moments as the weeks went by when he
 would have liked, by some almost aggressive act, to take his stand on the
 intimacy of his loss, in order that it _might_ be questioned and his
 retort, to the relief of his spirit, so recorded; but the moments of an
 irritation more helpless followed fast on these, the moments during
 which, turning things over with a good conscience but with a bare
 horizon, he found himself wondering if he oughtn't to have begun, so to
 speak, further back.
 
 He found himself wondering indeed at many things, and this last
 speculation had others to keep it company.  What could he have done,
 after all, in her lifetime, without giving them both, as it were, away?
 He couldn't have made known she was watching him, for that would have
--**--**--
 muffled and masked.
 
 The torment of this vision became then his occupation; he couldn't
 perhaps have consented to live but for the possibility of guessing.  She
 had told him, his friend, not to guess; she had forbidden him, so far as
 he might, to know, and she had even in a sort denied the power in him to
 learn: which were so many things, precisely, to deprive him of rest.  It
 wasn't that he wanted, he argued for fairness, that anything past and
 done should repeat itself; it was only that he shouldn't, as an
 anticlimax, have been taken sleeping so sound as not to be able to win
 back by an effort of thought the lost stuff of consciousness.  He
 declared to himself at moments that he would either win it back or have
 done with consciousness for ever; he made this idea his one motive in
 fine, made it so much his passion that none other, to compare with it,
 seemed ever to have touched him.  The lost stuff of consciousness became
 thus for him as a strayed or stolen child to an unappeasable father; he
 hunted it up and down very much as if he were knocking at doors and
 enquiring of the police.  This was the spirit in which, inevitably, he
 set himself to travel; he started on a journey that was to be as long as
 he could make it; it danced before him that, as the other side of the
 globe couldn't possibly have less to say to him, it might, by a
 possibility of suggestion, have more.  Before he quitted London, however,
 he made a pilgrimage to May Bartram's grave, took his way to it through
 the endless avenues of the grim suburban necropolis, sought it out in the
 wilderness of tombs, and, though he had come but for the renewal of the
--**--**--
 the sense of difference; and there were hours when, before the temples of
 gods and the sepulchres of kings, his spirit turned for nobleness of
 association to the barely discriminated slab in the London suburb.  That
 had become for him, and more intensely with time and distance, his one
 witness of a past glory.  It was all that was left to him for proof or
 pride, yet the past glories of Pharaohs were nothing to him as he thought
 of it.  Small wonder then that he came back to it on the morrow of his
 return.  He was drawn there this time as irresistibly as the other, yet
 with a confidence, almost, that was doubtless the effect of the many
 months that had elapsed.  He had lived, in spite of himself, into his
 change of feeling, and in wandering over the earth had wandered, as might
 be said, from the circumference to the centre of his desert.  He had
 settled to his safety and accepted perforce his extinction; figuring to
 himself, with some colour, in the likeness of certain little old men he
 remembered to have seen, of whom, all meagre and wizened as they might
 look, it was related that they had in their time fought twenty duels or
 been loved by ten princesses.  They indeed had been wondrous for others
 while he was but wondrous for himself; which, however, was exactly the
 cause of his haste to renew the wonder by getting back, as he might put
 it, into his own presence.  That had quickened his steps and checked his
 delay.  If his visit was prompt it was because he had been separated so
 long from the part of himself that alone he now valued.
 
 It's accordingly not false to say that he reached his goal with a certain
--**--**--
 revolution, never ceased to follow him, and whose seat was his point, so
 to speak, of orientation.  Thus in short he settled to live--feeding all
 on the sense that he once _had_ lived, and dependent on it not alone for
 a support but for an identity.
 
 It sufficed him in its way for months and the year elapsed; it would
 doubtless even have carried him further but for an accident,
 superficially slight, which moved him, quite in another direction, with a
 force beyond any of his impressions of Egypt or of India.  It was a thing
 of the merest chance--the turn, as he afterwards felt, of a hair, though
 he was indeed to live to believe that if light hadn't come to him in this
 particular fashion it would still have come in another.  He was to live
 to believe this, I say, though he was not to live, I may not less
 definitely mention, to do much else.  We allow him at any rate the
 benefit of the conviction, struggling up for him at the end, that,
 whatever might have happened or not happened, he would have come round of
 himself to the light.  The incident of an autumn day had put the match to
 the train laid from of old by his misery.  With the light before him he
 knew that even of late his ache had only been smothered.  It was
 strangely drugged, but it throbbed; at the touch it began to bleed.  And
 the touch, in the event, was the face of a fellow-mortal.  This face, one
 grey afternoon when the leaves were thick in the alleys, looked into
 Marcher's own, at the cemetery, with an expression like the cut of a
 blade.  He felt it, that is, so deep down that he winced at the steady
--**--**--
 He might already have been aware of our friend, might at some previous
 hour have noticed in him the smooth habit of the scene, with which the
 state of his own senses so scantly consorted, and might thereby have been
 stirred as by an overt discord.  What Marcher was at all events conscious
 of was in the first place that the image of scarred passion presented to
 him was conscious too--of something that profaned the air; and in the
 second that, roused, startled, shocked, he was yet the next moment
 looking after it, as it went, with envy.  The most extraordinary thing
 that had happened to him--though he had given that name to other matters
 as well--took place, after his immediate vague stare, as a consequence of
 this impression.  The stranger passed, but the raw glare of his grief
 remained, making our friend wonder in pity what wrong, what wound it
 expressed, what injury not to be healed.  What had the man _had_, to make
 him by the loss of it so bleed and yet live?
 
 Something--and this reached him with a pang--that _he_, John Marcher,
 hadn't; the proof of which was precisely John Marcher's arid end.  No
 passion had ever touched him, for this was what passion meant; he had
 survived and maundered and pined, but where had been _his_ deep ravage?
 The extraordinary thing we speak of was the sudden rush of the result of
 this question.  The sight that had just met his eyes named to him, as in
 letters of quick flame, something he had utterly, insanely missed, and
 what he had missed made these things a train of fire, made them mark
 themselves in an anguish of inward throbs.  He had seen _outside_ of his
 life, not learned it within, the way a woman was mourned when she had
--**--**--
 seen him but stupidly stare at the escape she offered him.
 
 The escape would have been to love her; then, _then_ he would have lived.
 _She_ had lived--who could say now with what passion?--since she had
 loved him for himself; whereas he had never thought of her (ah how it
 hugely glared at him!) but in the chill of his egotism and the light of
 her use.  Her spoken words came back to him--the chain stretched and
 stretched.  The Beast had lurked indeed, and the Beast, at its hour, had
 sprung; it had sprung in that twilight of the cold April when, pale, ill,
 wasted, but all beautiful, and perhaps even then recoverable, she had
 risen from her chair to stand before him and let him imaginably guess.  It
 had sprung as he didn't guess; it had sprung as she hopelessly turned
 from him, and the mark, by the time he left her, had fallen where it
 _was_ to fall.  He had justified his fear and achieved his fate; he had
 failed, with the last exactitude, of all he was to fail of; and a moan
 now rose to his lips as he remembered she had prayed he mightn't know.
 This horror of waking--_this_ was knowledge, knowledge under the breath
 of which the very tears in his eyes seemed to freeze.  Through them, none
 the less, he tried to fix it and hold it; he kept it there before him so
 that he might feel the pain.  That at least, belated and bitter, had
 something of the taste of life.  But the bitterness suddenly sickened
 him, and it was as if, horribly, he saw, in the truth, in the cruelty of
 his image, what had been appointed and done.  He saw the Jungle of his
 life and saw the lurking Beast; then, while he looked, perceived it, as
--**--**--
 produce and to feel.
 
 "To arrive at these things is to arrive at my story," he said, "and
 that's the way I look for it. The result is that I'm often accused
 of not having 'story' enough. I seem to myself to have as much as I
 need--to show my people, to exhibit their relations with each other;
 for that is all my measure. If I watch them long enough I see them come
 together, I see them PLACED, I see them engaged in this or that act and
 in this or that difficulty. How they look and move and speak and behave,
 always in the setting I have found for them, is my account of them--of
 which I dare say, alas, que cela manque souvent d'architecture. But I
 would rather, I think, have too little architecture than too much--when
 there's danger of its interfering with my measure of the truth. The
 French of course like more of it than I give--having by their own genius
 such a hand for it; and indeed one must give all one can. As for the
 origin of one's wind-blown germs themselves, who shall say, as you ask,
 where THEY come from? We have to go too far back, too far behind,
 to say. Isn't it all we can say that they come from every quarter
 of heaven, that they are THERE at almost any turn of the road? They
 accumulate, and we are always picking them over, selecting among them.
 They are the breath of life--by which I mean that life, in its own
 way, breathes them upon us. They are so, in a manner prescribed and
 imposed--floated into our minds by the current of life. That reduces to
 imbecility the vain critic's quarrel, so often, with one's subject, when
 he hasn't the wit to accept it. Will he point out then which other it
--**--**--
 ado about Isabel Archer.
 
 One looked it well in the face, I seem to remember, this extravagance;
 and with the effect precisely of recognising the charm of the problem.
 Challenge any such problem with any intelligence, and you immediately
 see how full it is of substance; the wonder being, all the while, as we
 look at the world, how absolutely, how inordinately, the Isabel Archers,
 and even much smaller female fry, insist on mattering. George Eliot has
 admirably noted it--"In these frail vessels is borne onward through the
 ages the treasure of human affection." In "Romeo and Juliet" Juliet has
 to be important, just as, in "Adam Bede" and "The Mill on the Floss" and
 "Middlemarch" and "Daniel Deronda," Hetty Sorrel and Maggie Tulliver and
 Rosamond Vincy and Gwendolen Harleth have to be; with that much of firm
 ground, that much of bracing air, at the disposal all the while of
 their feet and their lungs. They are typical, none the less, of a class
 difficult, in the individual case, to make a centre of interest; so
 difficult in fact that many an expert painter, as for instance Dickens
 and Walter Scott, as for instance even, in the main, so subtle a hand
 as that of R. L. Stevenson, has preferred to leave the task unattempted.
 There are in fact writers as to whom we make out that their refuge
 from this is to assume it to be not worth their attempting; by which
 pusillanimity in truth their honour is scantly saved. It is never an
 attestation of a value, or even of our imperfect sense of one, it is
 never a tribute to any truth at all, that we shall represent that value
 badly. It never makes up, artistically, for an artist's dim feeling
 about a thing that he shall "do" the thing as ill as possible. There are
--**--**--
 Henrietta Stackpole was a good example, in "The Portrait," of the truth
 to which I just adverted--as good an example as I could name were it not
 that Maria Gostrey, in "The Ambassadors," then in the bosom of time,
 may be mentioned as a better. Each of these persons is but wheels to the
 coach; neither belongs to the body of that vehicle, or is for a moment
 accommodated with a seat inside. There the subject alone is ensconced,
 in the form of its "hero and heroine," and of the privileged high
 officials, say, who ride with the king and queen. There are reasons
 why one would have liked this to be felt, as in general one would like
 almost anything to be felt, in one's work, that one has one's self
 contributively felt. We have seen, however, how idle is that pretension,
 which I should be sorry to make too much of. Maria Gostrey and Miss
 Stackpole then are cases, each, of the light ficelle, not of the true
 agent; they may run beside the coach "for all they are worth," they may
 cling to it till they are out of breath (as poor Miss Stackpole all so
 visibly does), but neither, all the while, so much as gets her foot on
 the step, neither ceases for a moment to tread the dusty road. Put it
 even that they are like the fishwives who helped to bring back to Paris
 from Versailles, on that most ominous day of the first half of the
 French Revolution, the carriage of the royal family. The only thing
 is that I may well be asked, I acknowledge, why then, in the present
 fiction, I have suffered Henrietta (of whom we have indubitably too
 much) so officiously, so strangely, so almost inexplicably, to pervade.
--**--**--
 book, but it is only a supreme illustration of the general plan. As to
 Henrietta, my apology for whom I just left incomplete, she exemplifies,
 I fear, in her superabundance, not an element of my plan, but only
 an excess of my zeal. So early was to begin my tendency to OVERTREAT,
 rather than undertreat (when there was choice or danger) my subject.
 (Many members of my craft, I gather, are far from agreeing with me, but
 I have always held overtreating the minor disservice.) "Treating" that
 of "The Portrait" amounted to never forgetting, by any lapse, that the
 thing was under a special obligation to be amusing. There was the danger
 of the noted "thinness"--which was to be averted, tooth and nail,
 by cultivation of the lively. That is at least how I see it to-day.
 Henrietta must have been at that time a part of my wonderful notion of
 the lively. And then there was another matter. I had, within the few
 preceding years, come to live in London, and the "international" light
 lay, in those days, to my sense, thick and rich upon the scene. It was
 the light in which so much of the picture hung. But that IS another
 matter. There is really too much to say.
 
 HENRY JAMES
 
 
 
 
 THE PORTRAIT OF A LADY
 
 
 
 CHAPTER I
 
 Under certain circumstances there are few hours in life more agreeable
 than the hour dedicated to the ceremony known as afternoon tea. There
 are circumstances in which, whether you partake of the tea or not--some
 people of course never do,--the situation is in itself delightful. Those
 that I have in mind in beginning to unfold this simple history offered
 an admirable setting to an innocent pastime. The implements of
 the little feast had been disposed upon the lawn of an old English
--**--**--
 like a room, with cushioned seats, with rich-coloured rugs, with
 the books and papers that lay upon the grass. The river was at some
 distance; where the ground began to slope the lawn, properly speaking,
 ceased. But it was none the less a charming walk down to the water.
 
 The old gentleman at the tea-table, who had come from America thirty
 years before, had brought with him, at the top of his baggage, his
 American physiognomy; and he had not only brought it with him, but he
 had kept it in the best order, so that, if necessary, he might have
 taken it back to his own country with perfect confidence. At present,
 obviously, nevertheless, he was not likely to displace himself; his
 journeys were over and he was taking the rest that precedes the
 great rest. He had a narrow, clean-shaven face, with features evenly
 distributed and an expression of placid acuteness. It was evidently a
 face in which the range of representation was not large, so that the air
 of contented shrewdness was all the more of a merit. It seemed to tell
 that he had been successful in life, yet it seemed to tell also that his
 success had not been exclusive and invidious, but had had much of the
 inoffensiveness of failure. He had certainly had a great experience of
 men, but there was an almost rustic simplicity in the faint smile that
 played upon his lean, spacious cheek and lighted up his humorous eye
 as he at last slowly and carefully deposited his big tea-cup upon the
 table. He was neatly dressed, in well-brushed black; but a shawl was
 folded upon his knees, and his feet were encased in thick, embroidered
 slippers. A beautiful collie dog lay upon the grass near his chair,
 watching the master's face almost as tenderly as the master took in the
--**--**--
 "Do you mean because I'm a banker?" asked the old man.
 
 "Because of that, if you like; and because you have--haven't you?--such
 unlimited means."
 
 "He isn't very rich," the other young man mercifully pleaded. "He has
 given away an immense deal of money."
 
 "Well, I suppose it was his own," said Lord Warburton; "and in that case
 could there be a better proof of wealth? Let not a public benefactor
 talk of one's being too fond of pleasure."
 
 "Daddy's very fond of pleasure--of other people's."
 
 The old man shook his head. "I don't pretend to have contributed
 anything to the amusement of my contemporaries."
 
 "My dear father, you're too modest!"
 
 "That's a kind of joke, sir," said Lord Warburton.
 
 "You young men have too many jokes. When there are no jokes you've
 nothing left."
 
 "Fortunately there are always more jokes," the ugly young man remarked.
 
 "I don't believe it--I believe things are getting more serious. You
 young men will find that out."
 
 "The increasing seriousness of things, then that's the great opportunity
 of jokes."
 
 "They'll have to be grim jokes," said the old man. "I'm convinced there
 will be great changes, and not all for the better."
 
 "I quite agree with you, sir," Lord Warburton declared. "I'm very sure
 there will be great changes, and that all sorts of queer things will
 happen. That's why I find so much difficulty in applying your advice;
 you know you told me the other day that I ought to 'take hold' of
 something. One hesitates to take hold of a thing that may the next
 moment be knocked sky-high."
 
 "You ought to take hold of a pretty woman," said his companion. "He's
 trying hard to fall in love," he added, by way of explanation, to his
 father.
 
 "The pretty women themselves may be sent flying!" Lord Warburton
--**--**--
 
 CHAPTER II
 
 While this exchange of pleasantries took place between the two Ralph
 Touchett wandered away a little, with his usual slouching gait, his
 hands in his pockets and his little rowdyish terrier at his heels. His
 face was turned toward the house, but his eyes were bent musingly on the
 lawn; so that he had been an object of observation to a person who had
 just made her appearance in the ample doorway for some moments before
 he perceived her. His attention was called to her by the conduct of
 his dog, who had suddenly darted forward with a little volley of shrill
 barks, in which the note of welcome, however, was more sensible than
 that of defiance. The person in question was a young lady, who seemed
 immediately to interpret the greeting of the small beast. He advanced
 with great rapidity and stood at her feet, looking up and barking hard;
 whereupon, without hesitation, she stooped and caught him in her hands,
 holding him face to face while he continued his quick chatter. His
 master now had had time to follow and to see that Bunchie's new friend
 was a tall girl in a black dress, who at first sight looked pretty.
 She was bareheaded, as if she were staying in the house--a fact which
 conveyed perplexity to the son of its master, conscious of that immunity
 from visitors which had for some time been rendered necessary by the
 latter's ill-health. Meantime the two other gentlemen had also taken
 note of the new-comer.
 
 "Dear me, who's that strange woman?" Mr. Touchett had asked.
 
 "Perhaps it's Mrs. Touchett's niece--the independent young lady," Lord
 Warburton suggested. "I think she must be, from the way she handles the
 dog."
 
 The collie, too, had now allowed his attention to be diverted, and he
--**--**--
 The girl gave a laugh. "I don't suppose it's the other. Who's the
 other?"
 
 "He's a friend of ours--Lord Warburton."
 
 "Oh, I hoped there would be a lord; it's just like a novel!" And then,
 "Oh you adorable creature!" she suddenly cried, stooping down and
 picking up the small dog again.
 
 She remained standing where they had met, making no offer to advance or
 to speak to Mr. Touchett, and while she lingered so near the threshold,
 slim and charming, her interlocutor wondered if she expected the old man
 to come and pay her his respects. American girls were used to a great
 deal of deference, and it had been intimated that this one had a high
 spirit. Indeed Ralph could see that in her face.
 
 "Won't you come and make acquaintance with my father?" he nevertheless
 ventured to ask. "He's old and infirm--he doesn't leave his chair."
 
 "Ah, poor man, I'm very sorry!" the girl exclaimed, immediately moving
 forward. "I got the impression from your mother that he was rather
 intensely active."
 
 Ralph Touchett was silent a moment. "She hasn't seen him for a year."
 
 "Well, he has a lovely place to sit. Come along, little hound."
 
 "It's a dear old place," said the young man, looking sidewise at his
 neighbour.
 
 "What's his name?" she asked, her attention having again reverted to the
 terrier.
 
 "My father's name?"
 
 "Yes," said the young lady with amusement; "but don't tell him I asked
 you."
 
 They had come by this time to where old Mr. Touchett was sitting, and he
 slowly got up from his chair to introduce himself.
 
 "My mother has arrived," said Ralph, "and this is Miss Archer."
 
 The old man placed his two hands on her shoulders, looked at her a
 moment with extreme benevolence and then gallantly kissed her. "It's
--**--**--
 came to see me and proposed that I should come with her to Europe."
 
 "I see," said Ralph. "She has adopted you."
 
 "Adopted me?" The girl stared, and her blush came back to her, together
 with a momentary look of pain which gave her interlocutor some alarm. He
 had underestimated the effect of his words. Lord Warburton, who appeared
 constantly desirous of a nearer view of Miss Archer, strolled toward the
 two cousins at the moment, and as he did so she rested her wider eyes on
 him.
 
 "Oh no; she has not adopted me. I'm not a candidate for adoption."
 
 "I beg a thousand pardons," Ralph murmured. "I meant--I meant--" He
 hardly knew what he meant.
 
 "You meant she has taken me up. Yes; she likes to take people up.
 She has been very kind to me; but," she added with a certain visible
 eagerness of desire to be explicit, "I'm very fond of my liberty."
 
 "Are you talking about Mrs. Touchett?" the old man called out from his
 chair. "Come here, my dear, and tell me about her. I'm always thankful
 for information."
 
 The girl hesitated again, smiling. "She's really very benevolent,"
 she answered; after which she went over to her uncle, whose mirth was
 excited by her words.
 
 Lord Warburton was left standing with Ralph Touchett, to whom in a
 moment he said: "You wished a while ago to see my idea of an interesting
 woman. There it is!"
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III
 
 Mrs. Touchett was certainly a person of many oddities, of which her
 behaviour on returning to her husband's house after many months was a
 noticeable specimen. She had her own way of doing all that she did, and
 this is the simplest description of a character which, although by no
 means without liberal motions, rarely succeeded in giving an impression
--**--**--
 and tasted like soap; she objected to the consumption of beer by
 her maid-servants; and she affirmed that the British laundress (Mrs.
 Touchett was very particular about the appearance of her linen) was not
 a mistress of her art. At fixed intervals she paid a visit to her own
 country; but this last had been longer than any of its predecessors.
 
 She had taken up her niece--there was little doubt of that. One wet
 afternoon, some four months earlier than the occurrence lately narrated,
 this young lady had been seated alone with a book. To say she was so
 occupied is to say that her solitude did not press upon her; for her
 love of knowledge had a fertilising quality and her imagination was
 strong. There was at this time, however, a want of fresh taste in
 her situation which the arrival of an unexpected visitor did much to
 correct. The visitor had not been announced; the girl heard her at last
 walking about the adjoining room. It was in an old house at Albany, a
 large, square, double house, with a notice of sale in the windows of one
 of the lower apartments. There were two entrances, one of which had
 long been out of use but had never been removed. They were exactly
 alike--large white doors, with an arched frame and wide side-lights,
 perched upon little "stoops" of red stone, which descended sidewise
 to the brick pavement of the street. The two houses together formed a
 single dwelling, the party-wall having been removed and the rooms placed
 in communication. These rooms, above-stairs, were extremely numerous,
 and were painted all over exactly alike, in a yellowish white which had
 grown sallow with time. On the third floor there was a sort of arched
 passage, connecting the two sides of the house, which Isabel and her
--**--**--
 at the temples and that she was the widow of some one of consequence.
 The little girl had been offered the opportunity of laying a foundation
 of knowledge in this establishment; but having spent a single day in it,
 she had protested against its laws and had been allowed to stay at home,
 where, in the September days, when the windows of the Dutch House
 were open, she used to hear the hum of childish voices repeating the
 multiplication table--an incident in which the elation of liberty and
 the pain of exclusion were indistinguishably mingled. The foundation
 of her knowledge was really laid in the idleness of her grandmother's
 house, where, as most of the other inmates were not reading people,
 she had uncontrolled use of a library full of books with frontispieces,
 which she used to climb upon a chair to take down. When she had found
 one to her taste--she was guided in the selection chiefly by the
 frontispiece--she carried it into a mysterious apartment which lay
 beyond the library and which was called, traditionally, no one knew
 why, the office. Whose office it had been and at what period it had
 flourished, she never learned; it was enough for her that it contained
 an echo and a pleasant musty smell and that it was a chamber of disgrace
 for old pieces of furniture whose infirmities were not always apparent
 (so that the disgrace seemed unmerited and rendered them victims
 of injustice) and with which, in the manner of children, she had
 established relations almost human, certainly dramatic. There was an old
 haircloth sofa in especial, to which she had confided a hundred childish
 sorrows. The place owed much of its mysterious melancholy to the fact
 that it was properly entered from the second door of the house, the
--**--**--
 
 "In an old palace?" Isabel repeated.
 
 "Yes, my dear; a very different affair from this. This is very
 bourgeois."
 
 Isabel felt some emotion, for she had always thought highly of her
 grandmother's house. But the emotion was of a kind which led her to say:
 "I should like very much to go to Florence."
 
 "Well, if you'll be very good, and do everything I tell you I'll take
 you there," Mrs. Touchett declared.
 
 Our young woman's emotion deepened; she flushed a little and smiled at
 her aunt in silence. "Do everything you tell me? I don't think I can
 promise that."
 
 "No, you don't look like a person of that sort. You're fond of your own
 way; but it's not for me to blame you."
 
 "And yet, to go to Florence," the girl exclaimed in a moment, "I'd
 promise almost anything!"
 
 Edmund and Lilian were slow to return, and Mrs. Touchett had an
 hour's uninterrupted talk with her niece, who found her a strange and
 interesting figure: a figure essentially--almost the first she had ever
 met. She was as eccentric as Isabel had always supposed; and hitherto,
 whenever the girl had heard people described as eccentric, she had
 thought of them as offensive or alarming. The term had always suggested
 to her something grotesque and even sinister. But her aunt made it a
 matter of high but easy irony, or comedy, and led her to ask herself
 if the common tone, which was all she had known, had ever been as
 interesting. No one certainly had on any occasion so held her as this
 little thin-lipped, bright-eyed, foreign-looking woman, who retrieved an
 insignificant appearance by a distinguished manner and, sitting there in
 a well-worn waterproof, talked with striking familiarity of the courts
 of Europe. There was nothing flighty about Mrs. Touchett, but she
--**--**--
 was on the contrary because she felt too wide-eyed and wished to check
 the sense of seeing too many things at once. Her imagination was by
 habit ridiculously active; when the door was not open it jumped out of
 the window. She was not accustomed indeed to keep it behind bolts; and
 at important moments, when she would have been thankful to make use
 of her judgement alone, she paid the penalty of having given undue
 encouragement to the faculty of seeing without judging. At present, with
 her sense that the note of change had been struck, came gradually a host
 of images of the things she was leaving behind her. The years and hours
 of her life came back to her, and for a long time, in a stillness broken
 only by the ticking of the big bronze clock, she passed them in
 review. It had been a very happy life and she had been a very fortunate
 person--this was the truth that seemed to emerge most vividly. She had
 had the best of everything, and in a world in which the circumstances
 of so many people made them unenviable it was an advantage never to have
 known anything particularly unpleasant. It appeared to Isabel that the
 unpleasant had been even too absent from her knowledge, for she had
 gathered from her acquaintance with literature that it was often a
 source of interest and even of instruction. Her father had kept it
 away from her--her handsome, much loved father, who always had such
 an aversion to it. It was a great felicity to have been his daughter;
 Isabel rose even to pride in her parentage. Since his death she had
 seemed to see him as turning his braver side to his children and as
 not having managed to ignore the ugly quite so much in practice as in
--**--**--
 as well, had kept her unacquainted with the supreme disciplines of
 her sex and age. She had had everything a girl could have: kindness,
 admiration, bonbons, bouquets, the sense of exclusion from none of the
 privileges of the world she lived in, abundant opportunity for dancing,
 plenty of new dresses, the London Spectator, the latest publications,
 the music of Gounod, the poetry of Browning, the prose of George Eliot.
 
 These things now, as memory played over them, resolved themselves into a
 multitude of scenes and figures. Forgotten things came back to her; many
 others, which she had lately thought of great moment, dropped out of
 sight. The result was kaleidoscopic, but the movement of the instrument
 was checked at last by the servant's coming in with the name of a
 gentleman. The name of the gentleman was Caspar Goodwood; he was a
 straight young man from Boston, who had known Miss Archer for the last
 twelvemonth and who, thinking her the most beautiful young woman of her
 time, had pronounced the time, according to the rule I have hinted at,
 a foolish period of history. He sometimes wrote to her and had within a
 week or two written from New York. She had thought it very possible he
 would come in--had indeed all the rainy day been vaguely expecting him.
 Now that she learned he was there, nevertheless, she felt no eagerness
 to receive him. He was the finest young man she had ever seen, was
 indeed quite a splendid young man; he inspired her with a sentiment of
 high, of rare respect. She had never felt equally moved to it by any
 other person. He was supposed by the world in general to wish to marry
 her, but this of course was between themselves. It at least may be
--**--**--
 Touchett had made of the very limits of his pliancy half the ground
 of his general success. He had retained in their freshness most of
 his marks of primary pressure; his tone, as his son always noted with
 pleasure, was that of the more luxuriant parts of New England. At the
 end of his life he had become, on his own ground, as mellow as he
 was rich; he combined consummate shrewdness with the disposition
 superficially to fraternise, and his "social position," on which he had
 never wasted a care, had the firm perfection of an unthumbed fruit. It
 was perhaps his want of imagination and of what is called the historic
 consciousness; but to many of the impressions usually made by English
 life upon the cultivated stranger his sense was completely closed. There
 were certain differences he had never perceived, certain habits he had
 never formed, certain obscurities he had never sounded. As regards these
 latter, on the day he had sounded them his son would have thought less
 well of him.
 
 Ralph, on leaving Oxford, had spent a couple of years in travelling;
 after which he had found himself perched on a high stool in his father's
 bank. The responsibility and honour of such positions is not, I
 believe, measured by the height of the stool, which depends upon other
 considerations: Ralph, indeed, who had very long legs, was fond of
 standing, and even of walking about, at his work. To this exercise,
 however, he was obliged to devote but a limited period, for at the end
 of some eighteen months he had become aware of his being seriously out
 of health. He had caught a violent cold, which fixed itself on his lungs
 and threw them into dire confusion. He had to give up work and apply,
--**--**--
 entirely of the father. But I always meant to do something for them when
 he should have gone to his reward. I ascertained where they were to be
 found and, without any preliminaries, went and introduced myself. There
 are two others of them, both of whom are married; but I saw only the
 elder, who has, by the way, a very uncivil husband. The wife, whose name
 is Lily, jumped at the idea of my taking an interest in Isabel; she
 said it was just what her sister needed--that some one should take
 an interest in her. She spoke of her as you might speak of some young
 person of genius--in want of encouragement and patronage. It may be that
 Isabel's a genius; but in that case I've not yet learned her special
 line. Mrs. Ludlow was especially keen about my taking her to Europe;
 they all regard Europe over there as a land of emigration, of rescue, a
 refuge for their superfluous population. Isabel herself seemed very
 glad to come, and the thing was easily arranged. There was a little
 difficulty about the money-question, as she seemed averse to being
 under pecuniary obligations. But she has a small income and she supposes
 herself to be travelling at her own expense."
 
 Ralph had listened attentively to this judicious report, by which his
 interest in the subject of it was not impaired. "Ah, if she's a genius,"
 he said, "we must find out her special line. Is it by chance for
 flirting?"
 
 "I don't think so. You may suspect that at first, but you'll be wrong.
 You won't, I think, in anyway, be easily right about her."
 
 "Warburton's wrong then!" Ralph rejoicingly exclaimed. "He flatters
 himself he has made that discovery."
 
 His mother shook her head. "Lord Warburton won't understand her. He
--**--**--
 to do that. But tell me this; it just occurs to me. Is Isabel capable of
 making herself disagreeable?"
 
 "Ah," cried his mother, "you ask too many questions! Find that out for
 yourself."
 
 His questions, however, were not exhausted. "All this time," he said,
 "you've not told me what you intend to do with her."
 
 "Do with her? You talk as if she were a yard of calico. I shall do
 absolutely nothing with her, and she herself will do everything she
 chooses. She gave me notice of that."
 
 "What you meant then, in your telegram, was that her character's
 independent."
 
 "I never know what I mean in my telegrams--especially those I send from
 America. Clearness is too expensive. Come down to your father."
 
 "It's not yet a quarter to eight," said Ralph.
 
 "I must allow for his impatience," Mrs. Touchett answered. Ralph knew
 what to think of his father's impatience; but, making no rejoinder, he
 offered his mother his arm. This put it in his power, as they
 descended together, to stop her a moment on the middle landing of the
 staircase--the broad, low, wide-armed staircase of time-blackened oak
 which was one of the most striking features of Gardencourt. "You've no
 plan of marrying her?" he smiled.
 
 "Marrying her? I should be sorry to play her such a trick! But apart
 from that, she's perfectly able to marry herself. She has every
 facility."
 
 "Do you mean to say she has a husband picked out?"
 
 "I don't know about a husband, but there's a young man in Boston--!"
 
 Ralph went on; he had no desire to hear about the young man in Boston.
 "As my father says, they're always engaged!"
 
 His mother had told him that he must satisfy his curiosity at the
 source, and it soon became evident he should not want for occasion. He
--**--**--
 
 "You apparently have a great passion for knowledge," her cousin
 returned.
 
 "I think I have; most girls are horridly ignorant."
 
 "You strike me as different from most girls."
 
 "Ah, some of them would--but the way they're talked to!" murmured
 Isabel, who preferred not to dilate just yet on herself. Then in a
 moment, to change the subject, "Please tell me--isn't there a ghost?"
 she went on.
 
 "A ghost?"
 
 "A castle-spectre, a thing that appears. We call them ghosts in
 America."
 
 "So we do here, when we see them."
 
 "You do see them then? You ought to, in this romantic old house."
 
 "It's not a romantic old house," said Ralph. "You'll be disappointed if
 you count on that. It's a dismally prosaic one; there's no romance here
 but what you may have brought with you."
 
 "I've brought a great deal; but it seems to me I've brought it to the
 right place."
 
 "To keep it out of harm, certainly; nothing will ever happen to it here,
 between my father and me."
 
 Isabel looked at him a moment. "Is there never any one here but your
 father and you?"
 
 "My mother, of course."
 
 "Oh, I know your mother; she's not romantic. Haven't you other people?"
 
 "Very few."
 
 "I'm sorry for that; I like so much to see people."
 
 "Oh, we'll invite all the county to amuse you," said Ralph.
 
 "Now you're making fun of me," the girl answered rather gravely. "Who
 was the gentleman on the lawn when I arrived?"
 
 "A county neighbour; he doesn't come very often."
 
 "I'm sorry for that; I liked him," said Isabel.
 
 "Why, it seemed to me that you barely spoke to him," Ralph objected.
 
 "Never mind, I like him all the same. I like your father too,
 immensely."
 
 "You can't do better than that. He's the dearest of the dear."
--**--**--
 Varian's acquaintance with literature was confined to The New York
 Interviewer; as she very justly said, after you had read the Interviewer
 you had lost all faith in culture. Her tendency, with this, was rather
 to keep the Interviewer out of the way of her daughters; she was
 determined to bring them up properly, and they read nothing at all. Her
 impression with regard to Isabel's labours was quite illusory; the girl
 had never attempted to write a book and had no desire for the laurels
 of authorship. She had no talent for expression and too little of the
 consciousness of genius; she only had a general idea that people were
 right when they treated her as if she were rather superior. Whether or
 no she were superior, people were right in admiring her if they thought
 her so; for it seemed to her often that her mind moved more quickly
 than theirs, and this encouraged an impatience that might easily be
 confounded with superiority. It may be affirmed without delay that
 Isabel was probably very liable to the sin of self-esteem; she often
 surveyed with complacency the field of her own nature; she was in the
 habit of taking for granted, on scanty evidence, that she was right;
 she treated herself to occasions of homage. Meanwhile her errors and
 delusions were frequently such as a biographer interested in preserving
 the dignity of his subject must shrink from specifying. Her thoughts
 were a tangle of vague outlines which had never been corrected by the
 judgement of people speaking with authority. In matters of opinion
 she had had her own way, and it had led her into a thousand ridiculous
 zigzags. At moments she discovered she was grotesquely wrong, and then
 she treated herself to a week of passionate humility. After this she
--**--**--
 to one's hand. Of course, among her theories, this young lady was not
 without a collection of views on the subject of marriage. The first on
 the list was a conviction of the vulgarity of thinking too much of it.
 From lapsing into eagerness on this point she earnestly prayed she might
 be delivered; she held that a woman ought to be able to live to herself,
 in the absence of exceptional flimsiness, and that it was perfectly
 possible to be happy without the society of a more or less coarse-minded
 person of another sex. The girl's prayer was very sufficiently answered;
 something pure and proud that there was in her--something cold and dry
 an unappreciated suitor with a taste for analysis might have called
 it--had hitherto kept her from any great vanity of conjecture on the
 article of possible husbands. Few of the men she saw seemed worth a
 ruinous expenditure, and it made her smile to think that one of them
 should present himself as an incentive to hope and a reward of patience.
 Deep in her soul--it was the deepest thing there--lay a belief that if
 a certain light should dawn she could give herself completely; but
 this image, on the whole, was too formidable to be attractive. Isabel's
 thoughts hovered about it, but they seldom rested on it long; after a
 little it ended in alarms. It often seemed to her that she thought too
 much about herself; you could have made her colour, any day in the
 year, by calling her a rank egoist. She was always planning out her
 development, desiring her perfection, observing her progress. Her nature
 had, in her conceit, a certain garden-like quality, a suggestion of
 perfume and murmuring boughs, of shady bowers and lengthening vistas,
 which made her feel that introspection was, after all, an exercise
--**--**--
 
 "I don't know about the novels," said Mr. Touchett. "I believe the
 novels have a great deal but I don't suppose they're very accurate.
 We once had a lady who wrote novels staying here; she was a friend
 of Ralph's and he asked her down. She was very positive, quite up to
 everything; but she was not the sort of person you could depend on
 for evidence. Too free a fancy--I suppose that was it. She afterwards
 published a work of fiction in which she was understood to have given
 a representation--something in the nature of a caricature, as you might
 say--of my unworthy self. I didn't read it, but Ralph just handed me
 the book with the principal passages marked. It was understood to be
 a description of my conversation; American peculiarities, nasal twang,
 Yankee notions, stars and stripes. Well, it was not at all accurate;
 she couldn't have listened very attentively. I had no objection to her
 giving a report of my conversation, if she liked but I didn't like the
 idea that she hadn't taken the trouble to listen to it. Of course I talk
 like an American--I can't talk like a Hottentot. However I talk, I've
 made them understand me pretty well over here. But I don't talk like the
 old gentleman in that lady's novel. He wasn't an American; we wouldn't
 have him over there at any price. I just mention that fact to show you
 that they're not always accurate. Of course, as I've no daughters,
 and as Mrs. Touchett resides in Florence, I haven't had much chance
 to notice about the young ladies. It sometimes appears as if the young
 women in the lower class were not very well treated; but I guess their
 position is better in the upper and even to some extent in the middle."
--**--**--
 native land. She would be as American as it pleased him to regard her,
 and if he chose to laugh at her she would give him plenty of occupation.
 She defended England against his mother, but when Ralph sang its praises
 on purpose, as she said, to work her up, she found herself able to
 differ from him on a variety of points. In fact, the quality of this
 small ripe country seemed as sweet to her as the taste of an October
 pear; and her satisfaction was at the root of the good spirits which
 enabled her to take her cousin's chaff and return it in kind. If her
 good-humour flagged at moments it was not because she thought herself
 ill-used, but because she suddenly felt sorry for Ralph. It seemed to
 her he was talking as a blind and had little heart in what he said. "I
 don't know what's the matter with you," she observed to him once; "but I
 suspect you're a great humbug."
 
 "That's your privilege," Ralph answered, who had not been used to being
 so crudely addressed.
 
 "I don't know what you care for; I don't think you care for anything.
 You don't really care for England when you praise it; you don't care for
 America even when you pretend to abuse it."
 
 "I care for nothing but you, dear cousin," said Ralph.
 
 "If I could believe even that, I should be very glad."
 
 "Ah well, I should hope so!" the young man exclaimed.
 
 Isabel might have believed it and not have been far from the truth. He
 thought a great deal about her; she was constantly present to his mind.
 At a time when his thoughts had been a good deal of a burden to him her
 sudden arrival, which promised nothing and was an open-handed gift of
--**--**--
 puzzling over them. It even suggested there might be a compensation for
 the intolerable ennui of surviving his genial sire. He wondered whether
 he were harbouring "love" for this spontaneous young woman from Albany;
 but he judged that on the whole he was not. After he had known her for
 a week he quite made up his mind to this, and every day he felt a little
 more sure. Lord Warburton had been right about her; she was a really
 interesting little figure. Ralph wondered how their neighbour had
 found it out so soon; and then he said it was only another proof of his
 friend's high abilities, which he had always greatly admired. If his
 cousin were to be nothing more than an entertainment to him, Ralph was
 conscious she was an entertainment of a high order. "A character like
 that," he said to himself--"a real little passionate force to see at
 play is the finest thing in nature. It's finer than the finest work
 of art--than a Greek bas-relief, than a great Titian, than a Gothic
 cathedral. It's very pleasant to be so well treated where one had least
 looked for it. I had never been more blue, more bored, than for a week
 before she came; I had never expected less that anything pleasant would
 happen. Suddenly I receive a Titian, by the post, to hang on my wall--a
 Greek bas-relief to stick over my chimney-piece. The key of a beautiful
 edifice is thrust into my hand, and I'm told to walk in and admire. My
 poor boy, you've been sadly ungrateful, and now you had better keep very
 quiet and never grumble again." The sentiment of these reflexions was
 very just; but it was not exactly true that Ralph Touchett had had a key
 put into his hand. His cousin was a very brilliant girl, who would take,
--**--**--
 
 "I shall always tell you," her aunt answered, "whenever I see you taking
 what seems to me too much liberty."
 
 "Pray do; but I don't say I shall always think your remonstrance just."
 
 "Very likely not. You're too fond of your own ways."
 
 "Yes, I think I'm very fond of them. But I always want to know the
 things one shouldn't do."
 
 "So as to do them?" asked her aunt.
 
 "So as to choose," said Isabel.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VIII
 
 As she was devoted to romantic effects Lord Warburton ventured to
 express a hope that she would come some day and see his house, a very
 curious old place. He extracted from Mrs. Touchett a promise that she
 would bring her niece to Lockleigh, and Ralph signified his willingness
 to attend the ladies if his father should be able to spare him. Lord
 Warburton assured our heroine that in the mean time his sisters would
 come and see her. She knew something about his sisters, having sounded
 him, during the hours they spent together while he was at Gardencourt,
 on many points connected with his family. When Isabel was interested she
 asked a great many questions, and as her companion was a copious talker
 she urged him on this occasion by no means in vain. He told her he
 had four sisters and two brothers and had lost both his parents. The
 brothers and sisters were very good people--"not particularly clever,
 you know," he said, "but very decent and pleasant;" and he was so good
 as to hope Miss Archer might know them well. One of the brothers was in
 the Church, settled in the family living, that of Lockleigh, which was
 a heavy, sprawling parish, and was an excellent fellow in spite of his
 thinking differently from himself on every conceivable topic. And then
--**--**--
 "Much worse; he regards himself as an imposition--as an abuse."
 
 "Well, perhaps he is," said Isabel.
 
 "Perhaps he is--though on the whole I don't think so. But in that case
 what's more pitiable than a sentient, self-conscious abuse planted by
 other hands, deeply rooted but aching with a sense of its injustice?
 For me, in his place, I could be as solemn as a statue of Buddha.
 He occupies a position that appeals to my imagination. Great
 responsibilities, great opportunities, great consideration, great
 wealth, great power, a natural share in the public affairs of a great
 country. But he's all in a muddle about himself, his position, his
 power, and indeed about everything in the world. He's the victim of a
 critical age; he has ceased to believe in himself and he doesn't know
 what to believe in. When I attempt to tell him (because if I were he I
 know very well what I should believe in) he calls me a pampered bigot.
 I believe he seriously thinks me an awful Philistine; he says I don't
 understand my time. I understand it certainly better than he, who
 can neither abolish himself as a nuisance nor maintain himself as an
 institution."
 
 "He doesn't look very wretched," Isabel observed.
 
 "Possibly not; though, being a man of a good deal of charming taste, I
 think he often has uncomfortable hours. But what is it to say of a being
 of his opportunities that he's not miserable? Besides, I believe he is."
 
 "I don't," said Isabel.
 
 "Well," her cousin rejoined, "if he isn't he ought to be!"
 
 In the afternoon she spent an hour with her uncle on the lawn, where the
 old man sat, as usual, with his shawl over his legs and his large cup
 of diluted tea in his hands. In the course of conversation he asked her
--**--**--
 were fifty thousand young women in England who exactly resembled them.
 Deprived of this advantage, however, Isabel's visitors retained that
 of an extreme sweetness and shyness of demeanour, and of having, as
 she thought, eyes like the balanced basins, the circles of "ornamental
 water," set, in parterres, among the geraniums.
 
 "They're not morbid, at any rate, whatever they are," our heroine said
 to herself; and she deemed this a great charm, for two or three of the
 friends of her girlhood had been regrettably open to the charge (they
 would have been so nice without it), to say nothing of Isabel's having
 occasionally suspected it as a tendency of her own. The Misses Molyneux
 were not in their first youth, but they had bright, fresh complexions
 and something of the smile of childhood. Yes, their eyes, which Isabel
 admired, were round, quiet and contented, and their figures, also of a
 generous roundness, were encased in sealskin jackets. Their friendliness
 was great, so great that they were almost embarrassed to show it; they
 seemed somewhat afraid of the young lady from the other side of the
 world and rather looked than spoke their good wishes. But they made it
 clear to her that they hoped she would come to luncheon at Lockleigh,
 where they lived with their brother, and then they might see her very,
 very often. They wondered if she wouldn't come over some day, and sleep:
 they were expecting some people on the twenty-ninth, so perhaps she
 would come while the people were there.
 
 "I'm afraid it isn't any one very remarkable," said the elder sister;
 "but I dare say you'll take us as you find us."
 
 "I shall find you delightful; I think you're enchanting just as you
 are," replied Isabel, who often praised profusely.
 
 Her visitors flushed, and her cousin told her, after they were gone,
--**--**--
 "His ability is known," Mildred added; "every one thinks it's immense."
 
 "Oh, I can see that," said Isabel. "But if I were he I should wish to
 fight to the death: I mean for the heritage of the past. I should hold
 it tight."
 
 "I think one ought to be liberal," Mildred argued gently. "We've always
 been so, even from the earliest times."
 
 "Ah well," said Isabel, "you've made a great success of it; I don't
 wonder you like it. I see you're very fond of crewels."
 
 When Lord Warburton showed her the house, after luncheon, it seemed to
 her a matter of course that it should be a noble picture. Within, it
 had been a good deal modernised--some of its best points had lost their
 purity; but as they saw it from the gardens, a stout grey pile, of the
 softest, deepest, most weather-fretted hue, rising from a broad, still
 moat, it affected the young visitor as a castle in a legend. The day was
 cool and rather lustreless; the first note of autumn had been struck,
 and the watery sunshine rested on the walls in blurred and desultory
 gleams, washing them, as it were, in places tenderly chosen, where the
 ache of antiquity was keenest. Her host's brother, the Vicar, had come
 to luncheon, and Isabel had had five minutes' talk with him--time enough
 to institute a search for a rich ecclesiasticism and give it up as
 vain. The marks of the Vicar of Lockleigh were a big, athletic figure,
 a candid, natural countenance, a capacious appetite and a tendency to
 indiscriminate laughter. Isabel learned afterwards from her cousin
 that before taking orders he had been a mighty wrestler and that he
 was still, on occasion--in the privacy of the family circle as it
 were--quite capable of flooring his man. Isabel liked him--she was in
--**--**--
 
 Lord Warburton was briefly silent. "You judge only from the outside--you
 don't care," he said presently. "You only care to amuse yourself." The
 note she had heard in his voice a moment before reappeared, and mixed
 with it now was an audible strain of bitterness--a bitterness so abrupt
 and inconsequent that the girl was afraid she had hurt him. She had
 often heard that the English are a highly eccentric people, and she
 had even read in some ingenious author that they are at bottom the most
 romantic of races. Was Lord Warburton suddenly turning romantic--was he
 going to make her a scene, in his own house, only the third time they
 had met? She was reassured quickly enough by her sense of his great good
 manners, which was not impaired by the fact that he had already touched
 the furthest limit of good taste in expressing his admiration of a young
 lady who had confided in his hospitality. She was right in trusting
 to his good manners, for he presently went on, laughing a little and
 without a trace of the accent that had discomposed her: "I don't mean of
 course that you amuse yourself with trifles. You select great materials;
 the foibles, the afflictions of human nature, the peculiarities of
 nations!"
 
 "As regards that," said Isabel, "I should find in my own nation
 entertainment for a lifetime. But we've a long drive, and my aunt
 will soon wish to start." She turned back toward the others and Lord
 Warburton walked beside her in silence. But before they reached the
 others, "I shall come and see you next week," he said.
 
 She had received an appreciable shock, but as it died away she felt that
 she couldn't pretend to herself that it was altogether a painful one.
 Nevertheless she made answer to his declaration, coldly enough, "Just as
--**--**--
 "I should think not; crimes of violence and attacks on the person
 require more or less pluck. Do you suppose she'll interview me?"
 
 "Never in the world. She'll not think you of enough importance."
 
 "You'll see," said Ralph. "She'll send a description of us all,
 including Bunchie, to her newspaper."
 
 "I shall ask her not to," Isabel answered.
 
 "You think she's capable of it then?"
 
 "Perfectly."
 
 "And yet you've made her your bosom-friend?"
 
 "I've not made her my bosom-friend; but I like her in spite of her
 faults."
 
 "Ah well," said Ralph, "I'm afraid I shall dislike her in spite of her
 merits."
 
 "You'll probably fall in love with her at the end of three days."
 
 "And have my love-letters published in the Interviewer? Never!" cried
 the young man.
 
 The train presently arrived, and Miss Stackpole, promptly descending,
 proved, as Isabel had promised, quite delicately, even though rather
 provincially, fair. She was a neat, plump person, of medium stature,
 with a round face, a small mouth, a delicate complexion, a bunch of
 light brown ringlets at the back of her head and a peculiarly open,
 surprised-looking eye. The most striking point in her appearance was the
 remarkable fixedness of this organ, which rested without impudence or
 defiance, but as if in conscientious exercise of a natural right, upon
 every object it happened to encounter. It rested in this manner upon
 Ralph himself, a little arrested by Miss Stackpole's gracious and
 comfortable aspect, which hinted that it wouldn't be so easy as he had
 assumed to disapprove of her. She rustled, she shimmered, in fresh,
 dove-coloured draperies, and Ralph saw at a glance that she was as crisp
 and new and comprehensive as a first issue before the folding. From top
 to toe she had probably no misprint. She spoke in a clear, high voice--a
--**--**--
 "Ah, that's very good!" cried Henrietta, seizing her pen again. "Just
 let me make a note of it and I'll put it in somewhere." she was a
 thoroughly good-natured woman, and half an hour later she was in as
 cheerful a mood as should have been looked for in a newspaper-lady
 in want of matter. "I've promised to do the social side," she said to
 Isabel; "and how can I do it unless I get ideas? If I can't describe
 this place don't you know some place I can describe?" Isabel promised
 she would bethink herself, and the next day, in conversation with her
 friend, she happened to mention her visit to Lord Warburton's ancient
 house. "Ah, you must take me there--that's just the place for me!" Miss
 Stackpole cried. "I must get a glimpse of the nobility."
 
 "I can't take you," said Isabel; "but Lord Warburton's coming here, and
 you'll have a chance to see him and observe him. Only if you intend to
 repeat his conversation I shall certainly give him warning."
 
 "Don't do that," her companion pleaded; "I want him to be natural."
 
 "An Englishman's never so natural as when he's holding his tongue,"
 Isabel declared.
 
 It was not apparent, at the end of three days, that her cousin had,
 according to her prophecy, lost his heart to their visitor, though he
 had spent a good deal of time in her society. They strolled about the
 park together and sat under the trees, and in the afternoon, when it was
 delightful to float along the Thames, Miss Stackpole occupied a place
 in the boat in which hitherto Ralph had had but a single companion. Her
 presence proved somehow less irreducible to soft particles than Ralph
 had expected in the natural perturbation of his sense of the perfect
--**--**--
 one's grandmother. They're both antecedent to choice--elements of one's
 composition that are not to be eliminated."
 
 "I suppose that means that you've tried and been worsted. What do they
 think of you over here?"
 
 "They delight in me."
 
 "That's because you truckle to them."
 
 "Ah, set it down a little to my natural charm!" Ralph sighed.
 
 "I don't know anything about your natural charm. If you've got any charm
 it's quite unnatural. It's wholly acquired--or at least you've tried
 hard to acquire it, living over here. I don't say you've succeeded. It's
 a charm that I don't appreciate, anyway. Make yourself useful in some
 way, and then we'll talk about it." "Well, now, tell me what I shall
 do," said Ralph.
 
 "Go right home, to begin with."
 
 "Yes, I see. And then?"
 
 "Take right hold of something."
 
 "Well, now, what sort of thing?"
 
 "Anything you please, so long as you take hold. Some new idea, some big
 work."
 
 "Is it very difficult to take hold?" Ralph enquired.
 
 "Not if you put your heart into it."
 
 "Ah, my heart," said Ralph. "If it depends upon my heart--!"
 
 "Haven't you got a heart?"
 
 "I had one a few days ago, but I've lost it since."
 
 "You're not serious," Miss Stackpole remarked; "that's what's the matter
 with you." But for all this, in a day or two, she again permitted him to
 fix her attention and on the later occasion assigned a different cause
 to her mysterious perversity. "I know what's the matter with you, Mr.
 Touchett," she said. "You think you're too good to get married."
 
 "I thought so till I knew you, Miss Stackpole," Ralph answered; "and
 then I suddenly changed my mind."
 
 "Oh pshaw!" Henrietta groaned.
 
 "Then it seemed to me," said Ralph, "that I was not good enough."
--**--**--
 instance. So long as I look at the Misses Molyneux they seem to me
 to answer a kind of ideal. Then Henrietta presents herself, and I'm
 straightway convinced by her; not so much in respect to herself as in
 respect to what masses behind her."
 
 "Ah, you mean the back view of her," Ralph suggested.
 
 "What she says is true," his cousin answered; "you'll never be serious.
 I like the great country stretching away beyond the rivers and across
 the prairies, blooming and smiling and spreading till it stops at the
 green Pacific! A strong, sweet, fresh odour seems to rise from it,
 and Henrietta--pardon my simile--has something of that odour in her
 garments."
 
 Isabel blushed a little as she concluded this speech, and the blush,
 together with the momentary ardour she had thrown into it, was so
 becoming to her that Ralph stood smiling at her for a moment after she
 had ceased speaking. "I'm not sure the Pacific's so green as that," he
 said; "but you're a young woman of imagination. Henrietta, however, does
 smell of the Future--it almost knocks one down!"
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XI
 
 He took a resolve after this not to misinterpret her words even when
 Miss Stackpole appeared to strike the personal note most strongly. He
 bethought himself that persons, in her view, were simple and homogeneous
 organisms, and that he, for his own part, was too perverted a
 representative of the nature of man to have a right to deal with her
 in strict reciprocity. He carried out his resolve with a great deal of
 tact, and the young lady found in renewed contact with him no obstacle
 to the exercise of her genius for unshrinking enquiry, the general
 application of her confidence. Her situation at Gardencourt therefore,
 appreciated as we have seen her to be by Isabel and full of appreciation
--**--**--
 contribution to the discussion, however, Miss Stackpole rejected with
 scorn. Middling indeed! If they were not the best in the world they were
 the worst, but there was nothing middling about an American hotel.
 
 "We judge from different points of view, evidently," said Mrs. Touchett.
 "I like to be treated as an individual; you like to be treated as a
 'party.'"
 
 "I don't know what you mean," Henrietta replied. "I like to be treated
 as an American lady."
 
 "Poor American ladies!" cried Mrs. Touchett with a laugh. "They're the
 slaves of slaves."
 
 "They're the companions of freemen," Henrietta retorted.
 
 "They're the companions of their servants--the Irish chambermaid and the
 negro waiter. They share their work."
 
 "Do you call the domestics in an American household 'slaves'?" Miss
 Stackpole enquired. "If that's the way you desire to treat them, no
 wonder you don't like America."
 
 "If you've not good servants you're miserable," Mrs. Touchett serenely
 said. "They're very bad in America, but I've five perfect ones in
 Florence."
 
 "I don't see what you want with five," Henrietta couldn't help
 observing. "I don't think I should like to see five persons surrounding
 me in that menial position."
 
 "I like them in that position better than in some others," proclaimed
 Mrs. Touchett with much meaning.
 
 "Should you like me better if I were your butler, dear?" her husband
 asked.
 
 "I don't think I should: you wouldn't at all have the tenue."
 
 "The companions of freemen--I like that, Miss Stackpole," said Ralph.
 "It's a beautiful description."
 
 "When I said freemen I didn't mean you, sir!"
 
 And this was the only reward that Ralph got for his compliment. Miss
 Stackpole was baffled; she evidently thought there was something
 treasonable in Mrs. Touchett's appreciation of a class which she
 privately judged to be a mysterious survival of feudalism. It was
--**--**--
 for the worse. Her suspense indeed was dissipated the second day. She
 had walked into the park in company with the sociable Bunchie, and
 after strolling about for some time, in a manner at once listless and
 restless, had seated herself on a garden-bench, within sight of the
 house, beneath a spreading beech, where, in a white dress ornamented
 with black ribbons, she formed among the flickering shadows a graceful
 and harmonious image. She entertained herself for some moments with
 talking to the little terrier, as to whom the proposal of an ownership
 divided with her cousin had been applied as impartially as possible--as
 impartially as Bunchie's own somewhat fickle and inconstant sympathies
 would allow. But she was notified for the first time, on this occasion,
 of the finite character of Bunchie's intellect; hitherto she had been
 mainly struck with its extent. It seemed to her at last that she would
 do well to take a book; formerly, when heavy-hearted, she had been
 able, with the help of some well-chosen volume, to transfer the seat
 of consciousness to the organ of pure reason. Of late, it was not to
 be denied, literature had seemed a fading light, and even after she had
 reminded herself that her uncle's library was provided with a complete
 set of those authors which no gentleman's collection should be without,
 she sat motionless and empty-handed, her eyes bent on the cool green
 turf of the lawn. Her meditations were presently interrupted by the
 arrival of a servant who handed her a letter. The letter bore the
 London postmark and was addressed in a hand she knew--that came into her
 vision, already so held by him, with the vividness of the writer's voice
 or his face. This document proved short and may be given entire.
 
 MY DEAR MISS ARCHER--I don't know whether you will have heard of my
--**--**--
 CHAPTER XII
 
 She put the letter into her pocket and offered her visitor a smile of
 welcome, exhibiting no trace of discomposure and half surprised at her
 coolness.
 
 "They told me you were out here," said Lord Warburton; "and as there
 was no one in the drawing-room and it's really you that I wish to see, I
 came out with no more ado."
 
 Isabel had got up; she felt a wish, for the moment, that he should not
 sit down beside her. "I was just going indoors."
 
 "Please don't do that; it's much jollier here; I've ridden over from
 Lockleigh; it's a lovely day." His smile was peculiarly friendly
 and pleasing, and his whole person seemed to emit that radiance of
 good-feeling and good fare which had formed the charm of the girl's
 first impression of him. It surrounded him like a zone of fine June
 weather.
 
 "We'll walk about a little then," said Isabel, who could not divest
 herself of the sense of an intention on the part of her visitor and who
 wished both to elude the intention and to satisfy her curiosity about
 it. It had flashed upon her vision once before, and it had given her on
 that occasion, as we know, a certain alarm. This alarm was composed of
 several elements, not all of which were disagreeable; she had indeed
 spent some days in analysing them and had succeeded in separating the
 pleasant part of the idea of Lord Warburton's "making up" to her from
 the painful. It may appear to some readers that the young lady was both
 precipitate and unduly fastidious; but the latter of these facts, if
 the charge be true, may serve to exonerate her from the discredit of
 the former. She was not eager to convince herself that a territorial
--**--**--
 
 "I like you very much, Lord Warburton," she answered; and at this moment
 she liked him immensely.
 
 "I thank you for saying that; it shows you don't regard me as a
 stranger. I really believe I've filled all the other relations of life
 very creditably, and I don't see why I shouldn't fill this one--in which
 I offer myself to you--seeing that I care so much more about it. Ask the
 people who know me well; I've friends who'll speak for me."
 
 "I don't need the recommendation of your friends," said Isabel.
 
 "Ah now, that's delightful of you. You believe in me yourself."
 
 "Completely," Isabel declared. She quite glowed there, inwardly, with
 the pleasure of feeling she did.
 
 The light in her companion's eyes turned into a smile, and he gave a
 long exhalation of joy. "If you're mistaken, Miss Archer, let me lose
 all I possess!"
 
 She wondered whether he meant this for a reminder that he was rich, and,
 on the instant, felt sure that he didn't. He was thinking that, as he
 would have said himself; and indeed he might safely leave it to the
 memory of any interlocutor, especially of one to whom he was offering
 his hand. Isabel had prayed that she might not be agitated, and her mind
 was tranquil enough, even while she listened and asked herself what it
 was best she should say, to indulge in this incidental criticism. What
 she should say, had she asked herself? Her foremost wish was to say
 something if possible not less kind than what he had said to her. His
 words had carried perfect conviction with them; she felt she did, all so
 mysteriously, matter to him. "I thank you more than I can say for your
 offer," she returned at last. "It does me great honour."
--**--**--
 royalist than the king."
 
 "It's not only that," said Isabel; "but I'm not sure I wish to marry any
 one."
 
 "Very likely you don't. I've no doubt a great many women begin that
 way," said his lordship, who, be it averred, did not in the least
 believe in the axiom he thus beguiled his anxiety by uttering. "But
 they're frequently persuaded."
 
 "Ah, that's because they want to be!" And Isabel lightly laughed. Her
 suitor's countenance fell, and he looked at her for a while in silence.
 "I'm afraid it's my being an Englishman that makes you hesitate," he
 said presently. "I know your uncle thinks you ought to marry in your own
 country."
 
 Isabel listened to this assertion with some interest; it had never
 occurred to her that Mr. Touchett was likely to discuss her matrimonial
 prospects with Lord Warburton. "Has he told you that?"
 
 "I remember his making the remark. He spoke perhaps of Americans
 generally."
 
 "He appears himself to have found it very pleasant to live in England."
 Isabel spoke in a manner that might have seemed a little perverse, but
 which expressed both her constant perception of her uncle's outward
 felicity and her general disposition to elude any obligation to take a
 restricted view.
 
 It gave her companion hope, and he immediately cried with warmth: "Ah,
 my dear Miss Archer, old England's a very good sort of country, you
 know! And it will be still better when we've furbished it up a little."
 
 "Oh, don't furbish it, Lord Warburton--, leave it alone. I like it this
 way."
 
 "Well then, if you like it, I'm more and more unable to see your
 objection to what I propose."
 
 "I'm afraid I can't make you understand."
 
 "You ought at least to try. I've a fair intelligence. Are you
 afraid--afraid of the climate? We can easily live elsewhere, you know.
--**--**--
 cheerful reasons for it.
 
 "I don't care if I don't meet any one else. I like Lord Warburton quite
 well enough." she fell into that appearance of a sudden change of
 point of view with which she sometimes startled and even displeased her
 interlocutors.
 
 Her uncle, however, seemed proof against either of these impressions.
 "He's a very fine man," he resumed in a tone which might have passed
 for that of encouragement. "His letter was one of the pleasantest I've
 received for some weeks. I suppose one of the reasons I liked it was
 that it was all about you; that is all except the part that was about
 himself. I suppose he told you all that."
 
 "He would have told me everything I wished to ask him," Isabel said.
 
 "But you didn't feel curious?"
 
 "My curiosity would have been idle--once I had determined to decline his
 offer."
 
 "You didn't find it sufficiently attractive?" Mr. Touchett enquired.
 
 She was silent a little. "I suppose it was that," she presently
 admitted. "But I don't know why."
 
 "Fortunately ladies are not obliged to give reasons," said her uncle.
 "There's a great deal that's attractive about such an idea; but I don't
 see why the English should want to entice us away from our native land.
 I know that we try to attract them over there, but that's because our
 population is insufficient. Here, you know, they're rather crowded.
 However, I presume there's room for charming young ladies everywhere."
 
 "There seems to have been room here for you," said Isabel, whose eyes
 had been wandering over the large pleasure-spaces of the park.
 
 Mr. Touchett gave a shrewd, conscious smile. "There's room everywhere,
 my dear, if you'll pay for it. I sometimes think I've paid too much for
 this. Perhaps you also might have to pay too much."
--**--**--
 and I shall never be able to see mine in the manner you proposed. Kindly
 let this suffice you, and do me the justice to believe that I have given
 your proposal the deeply respectful consideration it deserves. It is
 with this very great regard that I remain sincerely yours,
 
 ISABEL ARCHER.
 
 While the author of this missive was making up her mind to dispatch it
 Henrietta Stackpole formed a resolve which was accompanied by no demur.
 She invited Ralph Touchett to take a walk with her in the garden, and
 when he had assented with that alacrity which seemed constantly to
 testify to his high expectations, she informed him that she had a favour
 to ask of him. It may be admitted that at this information the young man
 flinched; for we know that Miss Stackpole had struck him as apt to push
 an advantage. The alarm was unreasoned, however; for he was clear about
 the area of her indiscretion as little as advised of its vertical depth,
 and he made a very civil profession of the desire to serve her. He
 was afraid of her and presently told her so. "When you look at me in a
 certain way my knees knock together, my faculties desert me; I'm filled
 with trepidation and I ask only for strength to execute your commands.
 You've an address that I've never encountered in any woman."
 
 "Well," Henrietta replied good-humouredly, "if I had not known before
 that you were trying somehow to abash me I should know it now. Of course
 I'm easy game--I was brought up with such different customs and ideas.
 I'm not used to your arbitrary standards, and I've never been spoken to
 in America as you have spoken to me. If a gentleman conversing with me
 over there were to speak to me like that I shouldn't know what to make
--**--**--
 on Isabel Archer since she came here, Mr. Touchett."
 
 "I, my dear Miss Stackpole? Never in the world. Isabel Archer has acted
 on me--yes; she acts on every one. But I've been absolutely passive."
 
 "You're too passive then. You had better stir yourself and be careful.
 Isabel's changing every day; she's drifting away--right out to sea. I've
 watched her and I can see it. She's not the bright American girl she
 was. She's taking different views, a different colour, and turning away
 from her old ideals. I want to save those ideals, Mr. Touchett, and
 that's where you come in."
 
 "Not surely as an ideal?"
 
 "Well, I hope not," Henrietta replied promptly. "I've got a fear in my
 heart that she's going to marry one of these fell Europeans, and I want
 to prevent it.
 
 "Ah, I see," cried Ralph; "and to prevent it you want me to step in and
 marry her?"
 
 "Not quite; that remedy would be as bad as the disease, for you're the
 typical, the fell European from whom I wish to rescue her. No; I wish
 you to take an interest in another person--a young man to whom she once
 gave great encouragement and whom she now doesn't seem to think good
 enough. He's a thoroughly grand man and a very dear friend of mine, and
 I wish very much you would invite him to pay a visit here."
 
 Ralph was much puzzled by this appeal, and it is perhaps not to the
 credit of his purity of mind that he failed to look at it at first in
 the simplest light. It wore, to his eyes, a tortuous air, and his fault
 was that he was not quite sure that anything in the world could really
 be as candid as this request of Miss Stackpole's appeared. That a young
--**--**--
 Ralph.
 
 In a moment his companion understood it. "I believe you are; now you're
 too serious."
 
 "You're difficult to please."
 
 "Oh, you're very serious indeed. You won't invite Mr. Goodwood."
 
 "I don't know," said Ralph. "I'm capable of strange things. Tell me a
 little about Mr. Goodwood. What's he like?"
 
 "He's just the opposite of you. He's at the head of a cotton-factory; a
 very fine one."
 
 "Has he pleasant manners?" asked Ralph.
 
 "Splendid manners--in the American style."
 
 "Would he be an agreeable member of our little circle?"
 
 "I don't think he'd care much about our little circle. He'd concentrate
 on Isabel."
 
 "And how would my cousin like that?"
 
 "Very possibly not at all. But it will be good for her. It will call
 back her thoughts."
 
 "Call them back--from where?"
 
 "From foreign parts and other unnatural places. Three months ago she
 gave Mr. Goodwood every reason to suppose he was acceptable to her, and
 it's not worthy of Isabel to go back on a real friend simply because she
 has changed the scene. I've changed the scene too, and the effect of it
 has been to make me care more for my old associations than ever. It's my
 belief that the sooner Isabel changes it back again the better. I know
 her well enough to know that she would never be truly happy over here,
 and I wish her to form some strong American tie that will act as a
 preservative."
 
 "Aren't you perhaps a little too much in a hurry?" Ralph enquired.
 "Don't you think you ought to give her more of a chance in poor old
 England?"
 
 "A chance to ruin her bright young life? One's never too much in a hurry
 to save a precious human creature from drowning."
 
 "As I understand it then," said Ralph, "you wish me to push Mr. Goodwood
--**--**--
 promised enquiry into the causes of Mr. Goodwood's stiffness--a
 curiosity for the present ungratified, inasmuch as when he asked her
 three days later if she had written to London she was obliged to confess
 she had written in vain. Mr. Goodwood had not replied.
 
 "I suppose he's thinking it over," she said; "he thinks everything
 over; he's not really at all impetuous. But I'm accustomed to having my
 letters answered the same day." She presently proposed to Isabel, at
 all events, that they should make an excursion to London together. "If I
 must tell the truth," she observed, "I'm not seeing much at this
 place, and I shouldn't think you were either. I've not even seen that
 aristocrat--what's his name?--Lord Washburton. He seems to let you
 severely alone."
 
 "Lord Warburton's coming to-morrow, I happen to know," replied her
 friend, who had received a note from the master of Lockleigh in answer
 to her own letter. "You'll have every opportunity of turning him inside
 out."
 
 "Well, he may do for one letter, but what's one letter when you want to
 write fifty? I've described all the scenery in this vicinity and raved
 about all the old women and donkeys. You may say what you please,
 scenery doesn't make a vital letter. I must go back to London and get
 some impressions of real life. I was there but three days before I came
 away, and that's hardly time to get in touch."
 
 As Isabel, on her journey from New York to Gardencourt, had seen even
 less of the British capital than this, it appeared a happy suggestion of
 Henrietta's that the two should go thither on a visit of pleasure. The
 idea struck Isabel as charming; he was curious of the thick detail of
 London, which had always loomed large and rich to her. They turned over
--**--**--
 
 "I'm sorry for that; I think an aristocracy ought to be splendid,"
 Henrietta declared. "If it's not that, what is it?"
 
 "Oh, you know, it isn't much, at the best," her neighbour allowed.
 "Won't you have a potato?"
 
 "I don't care much for these European potatoes. I shouldn't know you
 from an ordinary American gentleman."
 
 "Do talk to me as if I were one," said Lord Warburton. "I don't see how
 you manage to get on without potatoes; you must find so few things to
 eat over here."
 
 Henrietta was silent a little; there was a chance he was not sincere.
 "I've had hardly any appetite since I've been here," she went on at
 last; "so it doesn't much matter. I don't approve of you, you know; I
 feel as if I ought to tell you that."
 
 "Don't approve of me?"
 
 "Yes; I don't suppose any one ever said such a thing to you before, did
 they? I don't approve of lords as an institution. I think the world has
 got beyond them--far beyond."
 
 "Oh, so do I. I don't approve of myself in the least. Sometimes it comes
 over me--how I should object to myself if I were not myself, don't you
 know? But that's rather good, by the way--not to be vainglorious."
 
 "Why don't you give it up then?" Miss Stackpole enquired.
 
 "Give up--a--?" asked Lord Warburton, meeting her harsh inflexion with a
 very mellow one.
 
 "Give up being a lord."
 
 "Oh, I'm so little of one! One would really forget all about it if you
 wretched Americans were not constantly reminding one. However, I do
 think of giving it up, the little there is left of it, one of these
 days."
 
 "I should like to see you do it!" Henrietta exclaimed rather grimly.
 
 "I'll invite you to the ceremony; we'll have a supper and a dance."
--**--**--
 
 "Excuse my saying that in the mean time I must doubt of it."
 
 "You make me very unhappy," said Isabel.
 
 "I'm not sorry for that; it may help you to know how I feel. Will you
 kindly answer me a question?" Isabel made no audible assent, but he
 apparently saw in her eyes something that gave him courage to go on. "Do
 you prefer some one else?"
 
 "That's a question I'd rather not answer."
 
 "Ah, you do then!" her suitor murmured with bitterness.
 
 The bitterness touched her, and she cried out: "You're mistaken! I
 don't."
 
 He sat down on a bench, unceremoniously, doggedly, like a man in
 trouble; leaning his elbows on his knees and staring at the floor. "I
 can't even be glad of that," he said at last, throwing himself back
 against the wall; "for that would be an excuse."
 
 She raised her eyebrows in surprise. "An excuse? Must I excuse myself?"
 
 He paid, however, no answer to the question. Another idea had come into
 his head. "Is it my political opinions? Do you think I go too far?"
 
 "I can't object to your political opinions, because I don't understand
 them."
 
 "You don't care what I think!" he cried, getting up. "It's all the same
 to you."
 
 Isabel walked to the other side of the gallery and stood there showing
 him her charming back, her light slim figure, the length of her white
 neck as she bent her head, and the density of her dark braids. She
 stopped in front of a small picture as if for the purpose of examining
 it; and there was something so young and free in her movement that her
 very pliancy seemed to mock at him. Her eyes, however, saw nothing; they
 had suddenly been suffused with tears. In a moment he followed her, and
--**--**--
 Molyneux--she wouldn't commit herself. You have been warned, anyway,"
 Henrietta continued, addressing this young lady; "but for you it wasn't
 necessary."
 
 "I hope not," said Miss Molyneux vaguely.
 
 "Miss Stackpole takes notes," Ralph soothingly explained. "She's a great
 satirist; she sees through us all and she works us up."
 
 "Well, I must say I never have had such a collection of bad material!"
 Henrietta declared, looking from Isabel to Lord Warburton and from this
 nobleman to his sister and to Ralph. "There's something the matter with
 you all; you're as dismal as if you had got a bad cable."
 
 "You do see through us, Miss Stackpole," said Ralph in a low tone,
 giving her a little intelligent nod as he led the party out of the
 gallery. "There's something the matter with us all."
 
 Isabel came behind these two; Miss Molyneux, who decidedly liked her
 immensely, had taken her arm, to walk beside her over the polished
 floor. Lord Warburton strolled on the other side with his hands behind
 him and his eyes lowered. For some moments he said nothing; and then,
 "Is it true you're going to London?" he asked.
 
 "I believe it has been arranged."
 
 "And when shall you come back?"
 
 "In a few days; but probably for a very short time. I'm going to Paris
 with my aunt."
 
 "When, then, shall I see you again?"
 
 "Not for a good while," said Isabel. "But some day or other, I hope."
 
 "Do you really hope it?"
 
 "Very much."
 
 He went a few steps in silence; then he stopped and put out his hand.
 "Good-bye."
 
 "Good-bye," said Isabel.
 
 Miss Molyneux kissed her again, and she let the two depart. After it,
 without rejoining Henrietta and Ralph, she retreated to her own room; in
 which apartment, before dinner, she was found by Mrs. Touchett, who had
--**--**--
 class? They're only the population of London, and that's of no
 consequence."
 
 Ralph declared that for him the aristocracy left no void that Miss
 Stackpole herself didn't fill, and that a more contented man was nowhere
 at that moment to be found. In this he spoke the truth, for the stale
 September days, in the huge half-empty town, had a charm wrapped in them
 as a coloured gem might be wrapped in a dusty cloth. When he went home
 at night to the empty house in Winchester Square, after a chain of hours
 with his comparatively ardent friends, he wandered into the big dusky
 dining-room, where the candle he took from the hall-table, after letting
 himself in, constituted the only illumination. The square was still, the
 house was still; when he raised one of the windows of the dining-room to
 let in the air he heard the slow creak of the boots of a lone constable.
 His own step, in the empty place, seemed loud and sonorous; some of the
 carpets had been raised, and whenever he moved he roused a melancholy
 echo. He sat down in one of the armchairs; the big dark dining table
 twinkled here and there in the small candle-light; the pictures on the
 wall, all of them very brown, looked vague and incoherent. There was a
 ghostly presence as of dinners long since digested, of table-talk
 that had lost its actuality. This hint of the supernatural perhaps had
 something to do with the fact that his imagination took a flight and
 that he remained in his chair a long time beyond the hour at which he
 should have been in bed; doing nothing, not even reading the evening
 paper. I say he did nothing, and I maintain the phrase in the face of
 the fact that he thought at these moments of Isabel. To think of Isabel
--**--**--
 cab."
 
 "Never mind; we'll go alone. Come on, Mr. Bantling, and take care you
 get me a good one."
 
 Mr. Bantling promised to do his best, and the two took their departure,
 leaving the girl and her cousin together in the square, over which
 a clear September twilight had now begun to gather. It was perfectly
 still; the wide quadrangle of dusky houses showed lights in none of the
 windows, where the shutters and blinds were closed; the pavements were
 a vacant expanse, and, putting aside two small children from a
 neighbouring slum, who, attracted by symptoms of abnormal animation
 in the interior, poked their faces between the rusty rails of
 the enclosure, the most vivid object within sight was the big red
 pillar-post on the southeast corner.
 
 "Henrietta will ask him to get into the cab and go with her to Jermyn
 Street," Ralph observed. He always spoke of Miss Stackpole as Henrietta.
 
 "Very possibly," said his companion.
 
 "Or rather, no, she won't," he went on. "But Bantling will ask leave to
 get in."
 
 "Very likely again. I'm glad very they're such good friends."
 
 "She has made a conquest. He thinks her a brilliant woman. It may go
 far," said Ralph.
 
 Isabel was briefly silent. "I call Henrietta a very brilliant woman, but
 I don't think it will go far. They would never really know each other.
 He has not the least idea what she really is, and she has no just
 comprehension of Mr. Bantling."
 
 "There's no more usual basis of union than a mutual misunderstanding.
 But it ought not to be so difficult to understand Bob Bantling," Ralph
 added. "He is a very simple organism."
 
 "Yes, but Henrietta's a simpler one still. And, pray, what am I to do?"
 Isabel asked, looking about her through the fading light, in which the
--**--**--
 
 "I think not. I don't understand the matter, and I'm not conscious of
 any mission of that sort. You're evidently disappointed," Isabel added,
 looking at her cousin with rueful gentleness. "You'd have liked me to
 make such a marriage."
 
 "Not in the least. I'm absolutely without a wish on the subject. I don't
 pretend to advise you, and I content myself with watching you--with the
 deepest interest."
 
 She gave rather a conscious sigh. "I wish I could be as interesting to
 myself as I am to you!"
 
 "There you're not candid again; you're extremely interesting to
 yourself. Do you know, however," said Ralph, "that if you've really
 given Warburton his final answer I'm rather glad it has been what it
 was. I don't mean I'm glad for you, and still less of course for him.
 I'm glad for myself."
 
 "Are you thinking of proposing to me?"
 
 "By no means. From the point of view I speak of that would be fatal;
 I should kill the goose that supplies me with the material of my
 inimitable omelettes. I use that animal as the symbol of my insane
 illusions. What I mean is that I shall have the thrill of seeing what a
 young lady does who won't marry Lord Warburton."
 
 "That's what your mother counts upon too," said Isabel.
 
 "Ah, there will be plenty of spectators! We shall hang on the rest of
 your career. I shall not see all of it, but I shall probably see the
 most interesting years. Of course if you were to marry our friend you'd
 still have a career--a very decent, in fact a very brilliant one. But
 relatively speaking it would be a little prosaic. It would be definitely
 marked out in advance; it would be wanting in the unexpected. You know
 I'm extremely fond of the unexpected, and now that you've kept the game
--**--**--
 "And now that I've come, at any rate, mayn't I stay?"
 
 "You may sit down, certainly."
 
 She went back to her chair again, while her visitor took the first place
 that offered, in the manner of a man accustomed to pay little thought to
 that sort of furtherance. "I've been hoping every day for an answer to
 my letter. You might have written me a few lines."
 
 "It wasn't the trouble of writing that prevented me; I could as easily
 have written you four pages as one. But my silence was an intention,"
 Isabel said. "I thought it the best thing."
 
 He sat with his eyes fixed on hers while she spoke; then he lowered them
 and attached them to a spot in the carpet as if he were making a strong
 effort to say nothing but what he ought. He was a strong man in the
 wrong, and he was acute enough to see that an uncompromising exhibition
 of his strength would only throw the falsity of his position into
 relief. Isabel was not incapable of tasting any advantage of position
 over a person of this quality, and though little desirous to flaunt it
 in his face she could enjoy being able to say "You know you oughtn't to
 have written to me yourself!" and to say it with an air of triumph.
 
 Caspar Goodwood raised his eyes to her own again; they seemed to shine
 through the vizard of a helmet. He had a strong sense of justice and was
 ready any day in the year--over and above this--to argue the question
 of his rights. "You said you hoped never to hear from me again; I know
 that. But I never accepted any such rule as my own. I warned you that
 you should hear very soon."
--**--**--
 He might be pardoned if for an instant this exclamation seemed to him
 to sound the infernal note, and it is not on record that her motive for
 discharging such a shaft had been of the clearest. He oughtn't to stride
 about lean and hungry, however--she certainly felt THAT for him. "God
 forgive you!" he murmured between his teeth as he turned away.
 
 Her accent had put her slightly in the wrong, and after a moment she
 felt the need to right herself. The easiest way to do it was to place
 him where she had been. "You do me great injustice--you say what you
 don't know!" she broke out. "I shouldn't be an easy victim--I've proved
 it."
 
 "Oh, to me, perfectly."
 
 "I've proved it to others as well." And she paused a moment. "I refused
 a proposal of marriage last week; what they call--no doubt--a dazzling
 one."
 
 "I'm very glad to hear it," said the young man gravely.
 
 "It was a proposal many girls would have accepted; it had everything to
 recommend it." Isabel had not proposed to herself to tell this story,
 but, now she had begun, the satisfaction of speaking it out and doing
 herself justice took possession of her. "I was offered a great position
 and a great fortune--by a person whom I like extremely."
 
 Caspar watched her with intense interest. "Is he an Englishman?"
 
 "He's an English nobleman," said Isabel.
 
 Her visitor received this announcement at first in silence, but at last
 said: "I'm glad he's disappointed."
 
 "Well then, as you have companions in misfortune, make the best of it."
 
 "I don't call him a companion," said Casper grimly.
 
 "Why not--since I declined his offer absolutely?"
 
 "That doesn't make him my companion. Besides, he's an Englishman."
 
 "And pray isn't an Englishman a human being?" Isabel asked.
--**--**--
 reserved her option. As she took his hand she felt a great respect for
 him; she knew how much he cared for her and she thought him magnanimous.
 They stood so for a moment, looking at each other, united by a
 hand-clasp which was not merely passive on her side. "That's right,"
 she said very kindly, almost tenderly. "You'll lose nothing by being a
 reasonable man."
 
 "But I'll come back, wherever you are, two years hence," he returned
 with characteristic grimness.
 
 We have seen that our young lady was inconsequent, and at this she
 suddenly changed her note. "Ah, remember, I promise nothing--absolutely
 nothing!" Then more softly, as if to help him to leave her: "And
 remember too that I shall not be an easy victim!"
 
 "You'll get very sick of your independence."
 
 "Perhaps I shall; it's even very probable. When that day comes I shall
 be very glad to see you."
 
 She had laid her hand on the knob of the door that led into her room,
 and she waited a moment to see whether her visitor would not take his
 departure. But he appeared unable to move; there was still an immense
 unwillingness in his attitude and a sore remonstrance in his eyes. "I
 must leave you now," said Isabel; and she opened the door and passed
 into the other room.
 
 This apartment was dark, but the darkness was tempered by a vague
 radiance sent up through the window from the court of the hotel, and
 Isabel could make out the masses of the furniture, the dim shining of
 the mirror and the looming of the big four-posted bed. She stood still a
 moment, listening, and at last she heard Caspar Goodwood walk out of
 the sitting-room and close the door behind him. She stood still a little
--**--**--
 
 "You're not the judge. I can't trust you," said Isabel.
 
 This declaration was unflattering, but Henrietta was much too unselfish
 to heed the charge it conveyed; she cared only for what it intimated
 with regard to her friend. "Isabel Archer," she observed with equal
 abruptness and solemnity, "if you marry one of these people I'll never
 speak to you again!"
 
 "Before making so terrible a threat you had better wait till I'm asked,"
 Isabel replied. Never having said a word to Miss Stackpole about Lord
 Warburton's overtures, she had now no impulse whatever to justify
 herself to Henrietta by telling her that she had refused that nobleman.
 
 "Oh, you'll be asked quick enough, once you get off on the Continent.
 Annie Climber was asked three times in Italy--poor plain little Annie."
 
 "Well, if Annie Climber wasn't captured why should I be?"
 
 "I don't believe Annie was pressed; but you'll be."
 
 "That's a flattering conviction," said Isabel without alarm.
 
 "I don't flatter you, Isabel, I tell you the truth!" cried her friend.
 "I hope you don't mean to tell me that you didn't give Mr. Goodwood some
 hope."
 
 "I don't see why I should tell you anything; as I said to you just now,
 I can't trust you. But since you're so much interested in Mr. Goodwood I
 won't conceal from you that he returns immediately to America."
 
 "You don't mean to say you've sent him off?" Henrietta almost shrieked.
 
 "I asked him to leave me alone; and I ask you the same, Henrietta." Miss
 Stackpole glittered for an instant with dismay, and then passed to the
 mirror over the chimney-piece and took off her bonnet. "I hope you've
 enjoyed your dinner," Isabel went on.
 
 But her companion was not to be diverted by frivolous propositions. "Do
 you know where you're going, Isabel Archer?"
--**--**--
 if the invitation should get lost on the way?"
 
 "I thought the British post-office was impeccable."
 
 "The good Homer sometimes nods," said Ralph. "However," he went on more
 brightly, "the good Bantling never does, and, whatever happens, he'll
 take care of Henrietta."
 
 Ralph went to keep his appointment with Sir Matthew Hope, and Isabel
 made her arrangements for quitting Pratt's Hotel. Her uncle's danger
 touched her nearly, and while she stood before her open trunk, looking
 about her vaguely for what she should put into it, the tears suddenly
 rose to her eyes. It was perhaps for this reason that when Ralph came
 back at two o'clock to take her to the station she was not yet ready. He
 found Miss Stackpole, however, in the sitting-room, where she had just
 risen from her luncheon, and this lady immediately expressed her regret
 at his father's illness.
 
 "He's a grand old man," she said; "he's faithful to the last. If it's
 really to be the last--pardon my alluding to it, but you must often
 have thought of the possibility--I'm sorry that I shall not be at
 Gardencourt."
 
 "You'll amuse yourself much more in Bedfordshire."
 
 "I shall be sorry to amuse myself at such a time," said Henrietta
 with much propriety. But she immediately added: "I should like so to
 commemorate the closing scene."
 
 "My father may live a long time," said Ralph simply. Then, adverting
 to topics more cheerful, he interrogated Miss Stackpole as to her own
 future.
 
 Now that Ralph was in trouble she addressed him in a tone of larger
 allowance and told him that she was much indebted to him for having made
 her acquainted with Mr. Bantling. "He has told me just the things I
 want to know," she said; "all the society items and all about the royal
--**--**--
 On the other hand, he quickly said to himself, what concern was it of
 his that she should have made an appointment with a lover? Had it not
 been thought graceful in every age that young ladies should make a
 mystery of such appointments? Ralph gave Miss Stackpole a diplomatic
 answer. "I should have thought that, with the views you expressed to me
 the other day, this would satisfy you perfectly."
 
 "That he should come to see her? That was very well, as far as it went.
 It was a little plot of mine; I let him know that we were in London, and
 when it had been arranged that I should spend the evening out I sent him
 a word--the word we just utter to the 'wise.' I hoped he would find her
 alone; I won't pretend I didn't hope that you'd be out of the way. He
 came to see her, but he might as well have stayed away."
 
 "Isabel was cruel?"--and Ralph's face lighted with the relief of his
 cousin's not having shown duplicity.
 
 "I don't exactly know what passed between them. But she gave him no
 satisfaction--she sent him back to America."
 
 "Poor Mr. Goodwood!" Ralph sighed.
 
 "Her only idea seems to be to get rid of him," Henrietta went on.
 
 "Poor Mr. Goodwood!" Ralph repeated. The exclamation, it must be
 confessed, was automatic; it failed exactly to express his thoughts,
 which were taking another line.
 
 "You don't say that as if you felt it. I don't believe you care."
 
 "Ah," said Ralph, "you must remember that I don't know this interesting
 young man--that I've never seen him."
 
 "Well, I shall see him, and I shall tell him not to give up. If I didn't
 believe Isabel would come round," Miss Stackpole added--"well, I'd give
--**--**--
 her manner of raising the lid of this receptacle in order to glance at
 the contents: in neither act was it becoming to make a show of avidity.
 Questioned about her husband she was unable to say he was better; but
 the local doctor was with him, and much light was expected from this
 gentleman's consultation with Sir Matthew Hope.
 
 "I suppose you two ladies have made acquaintance," she pursued. "If you
 haven't I recommend you to do so; for so long as we continue--Ralph and
 I--to cluster about Mr. Touchett's bed you're not likely to have much
 society but each other."
 
 "I know nothing about you but that you're a great musician," Isabel said
 to the visitor.
 
 "There's a good deal more than that to know," Mrs. Touchett affirmed in
 her little dry tone.
 
 "A very little of it, I am sure, will content Miss Archer!" the lady
 exclaimed with a light laugh. "I'm an old friend of your aunt's.
 I've lived much in Florence. I'm Madame Merle." She made this last
 announcement as if she were referring to a person of tolerably distinct
 identity. For Isabel, however, it represented little; she could only
 continue to feel that Madame Merle had as charming a manner as any she
 had ever encountered.
 
 "She's not a foreigner in spite of her name," said Mrs. Touchett.
 
 "She was born--I always forget where you were born."
 
 "It's hardly worth while then I should tell you."
 
 "On the contrary," said Mrs. Touchett, who rarely missed a logical
 point; "if I remembered your telling me would be quite superfluous."
 
 Madame Merle glanced at Isabel with a sort of world-wide smile, a
 thing that over-reached frontiers. "I was born under the shadow of the
 national banner."
 
 "She's too fond of mystery," said Mrs. Touchett; "that's her great
--**--**--
 "No one else."
 
 Mr. Touchett said nothing for a while; and then, "I want to talk a
 little," he went on.
 
 "Won't it tire you?" Ralph demurred.
 
 "It won't matter if it does. I shall have a long rest. I want to talk
 about YOU."
 
 Ralph had drawn nearer to the bed; he sat leaning forward with his hand
 on his father's. "You had better select a brighter topic."
 
 "You were always bright; I used to be proud of your brightness. I should
 like so much to think you'd do something."
 
 "If you leave us," said Ralph, "I shall do nothing but miss you."
 
 "That's just what I don't want; it's what I want to talk about. You must
 get a new interest."
 
 "I don't want a new interest, daddy. I have more old ones than I know
 what to do with."
 
 The old man lay there looking at his son; his face was the face of the
 dying, but his eyes were the eyes of Daniel Touchett. He seemed to be
 reckoning over Ralph's interests. "Of course you have your mother," he
 said at last. "You'll take care of her."
 
 "My mother will always take care of herself," Ralph returned.
 
 "Well," said his father, "perhaps as she grows older she'll need a
 little help."
 
 "I shall not see that. She'll outlive me."
 
 "Very likely she will; but that's no reason--!" Mr. Touchett let his
 phrase die away in a helpless but not quite querulous sigh and remained
 silent again.
 
 "Don't trouble yourself about us," said his son, "My mother and I get on
 very well together, you know."
 
 "You get on by always being apart; that's not natural."
 
 "If you leave us we shall probably see more of each other."
 
 "Well," the old man observed with wandering irrelevance, "it can't be
--**--**--
 It's just the same with your bad lung. You're a great deal better than
 you used to be. All you want is to lead a natural life. It is a great
 deal more natural to marry a pretty young lady that you're in love with
 than it is to remain single on false principles."
 
 "I'm not in love with Isabel," said Ralph.
 
 "You said just now that you would be if you didn't think it wrong. I
 want to prove to you that it isn't wrong."
 
 "It will only tire you, dear daddy," said Ralph, who marvelled at his
 father's tenacity and at his finding strength to insist. "Then where
 shall we all be?"
 
 "Where shall you be if I don't provide for you? You won't have anything
 to do with the bank, and you won't have me to take care of. You say
 you've so many interests; but I can't make them out."
 
 Ralph leaned back in his chair with folded arms; his eyes were fixed for
 some time in meditation. At last, with the air of a man fairly mustering
 courage, "I take a great interest in my cousin," he said, "but not the
 sort of interest you desire. I shall not live many years; but I hope I
 shall live long enough to see what she does with herself. She's entirely
 independent of me; I can exercise very little influence upon her life.
 But I should like to do something for her."
 
 "What should you like to do?"
 
 "I should like to put a little wind in her sails."
 
 "What do you mean by that?"
 
 "I should like to put it into her power to do some of the things she
 wants. She wants to see the world for instance. I should like to put
 money in her purse."
--**--**--
 "Well, you seem to have thought it out," said Mr. Touchett. "But I don't
 see why you appeal to me. The money will be yours, and you can easily
 give it to her yourself."
 
 Ralph openly stared. "Ah, dear father, I can't offer Isabel money!"
 
 The old man gave a groan. "Don't tell me you're not in love with her! Do
 you want me to have the credit of it?"
 
 "Entirely. I should like it simply to be a clause in your will, without
 the slightest reference to me."
 
 "Do you want me to make a new will then?"
 
 "A few words will do it; you can attend to it the next time you feel a
 little lively."
 
 "You must telegraph to Mr. Hilary then. I'll do nothing without my
 solicitor."
 
 "You shall see Mr. Hilary to-morrow."
 
 "He'll think we've quarrelled, you and I," said the old man.
 
 "Very probably; I shall like him to think it," said Ralph, smiling;
 "and, to carry out the idea, I give you notice that I shall be very
 sharp, quite horrid and strange, with you."
 
 The humour of this appeared to touch his father, who lay a little while
 taking it in. "I'll do anything you like," Mr. Touchett said at last;
 "but I'm not sure it's right. You say you want to put wind in her sails;
 but aren't you afraid of putting too much?"
 
 "I should like to see her going before the breeze!" Ralph answered.
 
 "You speak as if it were for your mere amusement."
 
 "So it is, a good deal."
 
 "Well, I don't think I understand," said Mr. Touchett with a sigh.
 "Young men are very different from what I was. When I cared for a
 girl--when I was young--I wanted to do more than look at her."
--**--**--
 pair of umbrellas. The roads about Gardencourt were so firm, even in the
 worst weather, that the two ladies always came back with a healthy glow
 in their cheeks, looking at the soles of their neat, stout boots and
 declaring that their walk had done them inexpressible good. Before
 luncheon, always, Madame Merle was engaged; Isabel admired and envied
 her rigid possession of her morning. Our heroine had always passed for a
 person of resources and had taken a certain pride in being one; but she
 wandered, as by the wrong side of the wall of a private garden, round
 the enclosed talents, accomplishments, aptitudes of Madame Merle. She
 found herself desiring to emulate them, and in twenty such ways this
 lady presented herself as a model. "I should like awfully to be so!"
 Isabel secretly exclaimed, more than once, as one after another of her
 friend's fine aspects caught the light, and before long she knew that
 she had learned a lesson from a high authority. It took no great time
 indeed for her to feel herself, as the phrase is, under an influence.
 "What's the harm," she wondered, "so long as it's a good one? The more
 one's under a good influence the better. The only thing is to see our
 steps as we take them--to understand them as we go. That, no doubt, I
 shall always do. I needn't be afraid of becoming too pliable; isn't it
 my fault that I'm not pliable enough?" It is said that imitation is the
 sincerest flattery; and if Isabel was sometimes moved to gape at her
 friend aspiringly and despairingly it was not so much because she
 desired herself to shine as because she wished to hold up the lamp for
 Madame Merle. She liked her extremely, but was even more dazzled than
--**--**--
 drawing-room: it was the rest of you that were before the time. It means
 that one answers a letter the day one gets it and that when one comes to
 stay with her one doesn't bring too much luggage and is careful not to
 be taken ill. For Mrs. Touchett those things constitute virtue; it's a
 blessing to be able to reduce it to its elements."
 
 Madame Merle's own conversation, it will be perceived, was enriched with
 bold, free touches of criticism, which, even when they had a restrictive
 effect, never struck Isabel as ill-natured. It couldn't occur to the
 girl for instance that Mrs. Touchett's accomplished guest was abusing
 her; and this for very good reasons. In the first place Isabel rose
 eagerly to the sense of her shades; in the second Madame Merle implied
 that there was a great deal more to say; and it was clear in the
 third that for a person to speak to one without ceremony of one's near
 relations was an agreeable sign of that person's intimacy with one's
 self. These signs of deep communion multiplied as the days elapsed, and
 there was none of which Isabel was more sensible than of her companion's
 preference for making Miss Archer herself a topic. Though she referred
 frequently to the incidents of her own career she never lingered upon
 them; she was as little of a gross egotist as she was of a flat gossip.
 
 "I'm old and stale and faded," she said more than once; "I'm of no
 more interest than last week's newspaper. You're young and fresh and of
 to-day; you've the great thing--you've actuality. I once had it--we all
 have it for an hour. You, however, will have it for longer. Let us talk
 about you then; you can say nothing I shall not care to hear. It's a
--**--**--
 qualities--frank, generous, sincere like you. In that case I should have
 made something better of my life."
 
 "What should you have liked to do that you've not done?"
 
 Madame Merle took a sheet of music--she was seated at the piano and
 had abruptly wheeled about on the stool when she first spoke--and
 mechanically turned the leaves. "I'm very ambitious!" she at last
 replied.
 
 "And your ambitions have not been satisfied? They must have been great."
 
 "They WERE great. I should make myself ridiculous by talking of them."
 
 Isabel wondered what they could have been--whether Madame Merle had
 aspired to wear a crown. "I don't know what your idea of success may be,
 but you seem to me to have been successful. To me indeed you're a vivid
 image of success."
 
 Madame Merle tossed away the music with a smile. "What's YOUR idea of
 success?"
 
 "You evidently think it must be a very tame one. It's to see some dream
 of one's youth come true."
 
 "Ah," Madame Merle exclaimed, "that I've never seen! But my dreams were
 so great--so preposterous. Heaven forgive me, I'm dreaming now!" And she
 turned back to the piano and began grandly to play. On the morrow she
 said to Isabel that her definition of success had been very pretty,
 yet frightfully sad. Measured in that way, who had ever succeeded? The
 dreams of one's youth, why they were enchanting, they were divine! Who
 had ever seen such things come to pass?
 
 "I myself--a few of them," Isabel ventured to answer.
 
 "Already? They must have been dreams of yesterday."
 
 "I began to dream very young," Isabel smiled.
 
 "Ah, if you mean the aspirations of your childhood--that of having a
 pink sash and a doll that could close her eyes."
 
 "No, I don't mean that."
 
 "Or a young man with a fine moustache going down on his knees to you."
--**--**--
 aunt and cousin only at meals, and discovered that of the hours during
 which Mrs. Touchett was invisible only a minor portion was now devoted
 to nursing her husband. She spent the rest in her own apartments, to
 which access was not allowed even to her niece, apparently occupied
 there with mysterious and inscrutable exercises. At table she was grave
 and silent; but her solemnity was not an attitude--Isabel could see it
 was a conviction. She wondered if her aunt repented of having taken her
 own way so much; but there was no visible evidence of this--no tears, no
 sighs, no exaggeration of a zeal always to its own sense adequate. Mrs.
 Touchett seemed simply to feel the need of thinking things over and
 summing them up; she had a little moral account-book--with columns
 unerringly ruled and a sharp steel clasp--which she kept with exemplary
 neatness. Uttered reflection had with her ever, at any rate, a practical
 ring. "If I had foreseen this I'd not have proposed your coming abroad
 now," she said to Isabel after Madame Merle had left the house. "I'd
 have waited and sent for you next year."
 
 "So that perhaps I should never have known my uncle? It's a great
 happiness to me to have come now."
 
 "That's very well. But it was not that you might know your uncle that
 I brought you to Europe." A perfectly veracious speech; but, as Isabel
 thought, not as perfectly timed. She had leisure to think of this and
 other matters. She took a solitary walk every day and spent vague hours
 in turning over books in the library. Among the subjects that engaged
 her attention were the adventures of her friend Miss Stackpole, with
 whom she was in regular correspondence. Isabel liked her friend's
 private epistolary style better than her public; that is she felt her
--**--**--
 But for the present she's simply stupefied."
 
 "Do you mean that she doesn't know what to do with the money?"
 
 "That, I think, she has hardly considered. She doesn't know what to
 think about the matter at all. It has been as if a big gun were suddenly
 fired off behind her; she's feeling herself to see if she be hurt. It's
 but three days since she received a visit from the principal executor,
 who came in person, very gallantly, to notify her. He told me afterwards
 that when he had made his little speech she suddenly burst into tears.
 The money's to remain in the affairs of the bank, and she's to draw the
 interest."
 
 Madame Merle shook her head with a wise and now quite benignant smile.
 "How very delicious! After she has done that two or three times she'll
 get used to it." Then after a silence, "What does your son think of it?"
 she abruptly asked.
 
 "He left England before the will was read--used up by his fatigue and
 anxiety and hurrying off to the south. He's on his way to the Riviera
 and I've not yet heard from him. But it's not likely he'll ever object
 to anything done by his father."
 
 "Didn't you say his own share had been cut down?"
 
 "Only at his wish. I know that he urged his father to do something for
 the people in America. He's not in the least addicted to looking after
 number one."
 
 "It depends upon whom he regards as number one!" said Madame Merle. And
 she remained thoughtful a moment, her eyes bent on the floor.
 
 "Am I not to see your happy niece?" she asked at last as she raised
 them.
 
 "You may see her; but you'll not be struck with her being happy. She
--**--**--
 all live here this way, but what does it lead to?" she was pleased to
 ask. "It doesn't seem to lead to anything, and I should think you'd get
 very tired of it."
 
 Mrs. Touchett thought the question worthy of Henrietta Stackpole. The
 two ladies had found Henrietta in Paris, and Isabel constantly saw her;
 so that Mrs. Touchett had some reason for saying to herself that if her
 niece were not clever enough to originate almost anything, she might be
 suspected of having borrowed that style of remark from her journalistic
 friend. The first occasion on which Isabel had spoken was that of
 a visit paid by the two ladies to Mrs. Luce, an old friend of Mrs.
 Touchett's and the only person in Paris she now went to see. Mrs. Luce
 had been living in Paris since the days of Louis Philippe; she used to
 say jocosely that she was one of the generation of 1830--a joke of
 which the point was not always taken. When it failed Mrs. Luce used to
 explain--"Oh yes, I'm one of the romantics;" her French had never
 become quite perfect. She was always at home on Sunday afternoons and
 surrounded by sympathetic compatriots, usually the same. In fact she
 was at home at all times, and reproduced with wondrous truth in her
 well-cushioned little corner of the brilliant city, the domestic tone of
 her native Baltimore. This reduced Mr. Luce, her worthy husband, a tall,
 lean, grizzled, well-brushed gentleman who wore a gold eye-glass and
 carried his hat a little too much on the back of his head, to mere
 platonic praise of the "distractions" of Paris--they were his great
 word--since you would never have guessed from what cares he escaped to
 them. One of them was that he went every day to the American banker's,
--**--**--
 sentiments, as when Edward told her that he was "defended" by his bonne
 to go near the edge of the lake, and that one must always obey to one's
 bonne. Ned Rosier's English had improved; at least it exhibited in a
 less degree the French variation. His father was dead and his bonne
 dismissed, but the young man still conformed to the spirit of their
 teaching--he never went to the edge of the lake. There was still
 something agreeable to the nostrils about him and something not
 offensive to nobler organs. He was a very gentle and gracious youth,
 with what are called cultivated tastes--an acquaintance with old china,
 with good wine, with the bindings of books, with the Almanach de Gotha,
 with the best shops, the best hotels, the hours of railway-trains. He
 could order a dinner almost as well as Mr. Luce, and it was probable
 that as his experience accumulated he would be a worthy successor to
 that gentleman, whose rather grim politics he also advocated in a soft
 and innocent voice. He had some charming rooms in Paris, decorated with
 old Spanish altar-lace, the envy of his female friends, who declared
 that his chimney-piece was better draped than the high shoulders of many
 a duchess. He usually, however, spent a part of every winter at Pau, and
 had once passed a couple of months in the United States.
 
 He took a great interest in Isabel and remembered perfectly the walk at
 Neufchatel, when she would persist in going so near the edge. He seemed
 to recognise this same tendency in the subversive enquiry that I quoted
 a moment ago, and set himself to answer our heroine's question with
 greater urbanity than it perhaps deserved. "What does it lead to, Miss
 Archer? Why Paris leads everywhere. You can't go anywhere unless you
--**--**--
 of. You think we can escape disagreeable duties by taking romantic
 views--that's your great illusion, my dear. But we can't. You must be
 prepared on many occasions in life to please no one at all--not even
 yourself."
 
 Isabel shook her head sadly; she looked troubled and frightened. "This,
 for you, Henrietta," she said, "must be one of those occasions!"
 
 It was certainly true that Miss Stackpole, during her visit to Paris,
 which had been professionally more remunerative than her English
 sojourn, had not been living in the world of dreams. Mr. Bantling, who
 had now returned to England, was her companion for the first four weeks
 of her stay; and about Mr. Bantling there was nothing dreamy. Isabel
 learned from her friend that the two had led a life of great personal
 intimacy and that this had been a peculiar advantage to Henrietta,
 owing to the gentleman's remarkable knowledge of Paris. He had
 explained everything, shown her everything, been her constant guide and
 interpreter. They had breakfasted together, dined together, gone to
 the theatre together, supped together, really in a manner quite lived
 together. He was a true friend, Henrietta more than once assured our
 heroine; and she had never supposed that she could like any Englishman
 so well. Isabel could not have told you why, but she found something
 that ministered to mirth in the alliance the correspondent of the
 Interviewer had struck with Lady Pensil's brother; her amusement
 moreover subsisted in face of the fact that she thought it a credit to
 each of them. Isabel couldn't rid herself of a suspicion that they were
 playing somehow at cross-purposes--that the simplicity of each had
 been entrapped. But this simplicity was on either side none the less
 honourable. It was as graceful on Henrietta's part to believe that Mr.
--**--**--
 her passive extent, in other words, was about that of a knife-edge.
 Isabel had reason to believe none the less that as she advanced in life
 she made more of those concessions to the sense of something obscurely
 distinct from convenience--more of them than she independently exacted.
 She was learning to sacrifice consistency to considerations of that
 inferior order for which the excuse must be found in the particular
 case. It was not to the credit of her absolute rectitude that she should
 have gone the longest way round to Florence in order to spend a few
 weeks with her invalid son; since in former years it had been one of her
 most definite convictions that when Ralph wished to see her he was at
 liberty to remember that Palazzo Crescentini contained a large apartment
 known as the quarter of the signorino.
 
 "I want to ask you something," Isabel said to this young man the day
 after her arrival at San Remo--"something I've thought more than once
 of asking you by letter, but that I've hesitated on the whole to write
 about. Face to face, nevertheless, my question seems easy enough. Did
 you know your father intended to leave me so much money?"
 
 Ralph stretched his legs a little further than usual and gazed a little
 more fixedly at the Mediterranean.
 
 "What does it matter, my dear Isabel, whether I knew? My father was very
 obstinate."
 
 "So," said the girl, "you did know."
 
 "Yes; he told me. We even talked it over a little." "What did he do it
 for?" asked Isabel abruptly. "Why, as a kind of compliment."
 
 "A compliment on what?"
 
 "On your so beautifully existing."
 
 "He liked me too much," she presently declared.
 
 "That's a way we all have."
 
 "If I believed that I should be very unhappy. Fortunately I don't
--**--**--
 elegant, and in 1820 she had been one of the pretty girls of the
 small but promising capital which clustered about the Battery and
 overlooked the Bay, and of which the uppermost boundary was indicated
 by the grassy waysides of Canal Street.  Even at the age of twenty-
 seven Austin Sloper had made his mark sufficiently to mitigate the
 anomaly of his having been chosen among a dozen suitors by a young
 woman of high fashion, who had ten thousand dollars of income and the
 most charming eyes in the island of Manhattan.  These eyes, and some
 of their accompaniments, were for about five years a source of
 extreme satisfaction to the young physician, who was both a devoted
 and a very happy husband.  The fact of his having married a rich
 woman made no difference in the line he had traced for himself, and
 he cultivated his profession with as definite a purpose as if he
 still had no other resources than his fraction of the modest
 patrimony which on his father's death he had shared with his brothers
 and sisters.  This purpose had not been preponderantly to make money-
 -it had been rather to learn something and to do something.  To learn
 something interesting, and to do something useful--this was, roughly
 speaking, the programme he had sketched, and of which the accident of
 his wife having an income appeared to him in no degree to modify the
 validity.  He was fond of his practice, and of exercising a skill of
 which he was agreeably conscious, and it was so patent a truth that
 if he were not a doctor there was nothing else he could be, that a
 doctor he persisted in being, in the best possible conditions.  Of
 course his easy domestic situation saved him a good deal of drudgery,
--**--**--
 her clever brother, who, in the matter of women, even when they were
 nearly related to him, was a man of distinct preferences.  He
 preferred Mrs. Almond to his sister Lavinia, who had married a poor
 clergyman, of a sickly constitution and a flowery style of eloquence,
 and then, at the age of thirty-three, had been left a widow, without
 children, without fortune--with nothing but the memory of Mr.
 Penniman's flowers of speech, a certain vague aroma of which hovered
 about her own conversation.  Nevertheless he had offered her a home
 under his own roof, which Lavinia accepted with the alacrity of a
 woman who had spent the ten years of her married life in the town of
 Poughkeepsie.  The Doctor had not proposed to Mrs. Penniman to come
 and live with him indefinitely; he had suggested that she should make
 an asylum of his house while she looked about for unfurnished
 lodgings.  It is uncertain whether Mrs. Penniman ever instituted a
 search for unfurnished lodgings, but it is beyond dispute that she
 never found them.  She settled herself with her brother and never
 went away, and when Catherine was twenty years old her Aunt Lavinia
 was still one of the most striking features of her immediate
 entourage.  Mrs. Penniman's own account of the matter was that she
 had remained to take charge of her niece's education.  She had given
 this account, at least, to every one but the Doctor, who never asked
 for explanations which he could entertain himself any day with
 inventing.  Mrs. Penniman, moreover, though she had a good deal of a
 certain sort of artificial assurance, shrank, for indefinable
 reasons, from presenting herself to her brother as a fountain of
 instruction.  She had not a high sense of humour, but she had enough
 to prevent her from making this mistake; and her brother, on his
--**--**--
 poor Catherine.  There was nothing, of course, to be ashamed of; but
 this was not enough for the Doctor, who was a proud man and would
 have enjoyed being able to think of his daughter as an unusual girl.
 There would have been a fitness in her being pretty and graceful,
 intelligent and distinguished; for her mother had been the most
 charming woman of her little day, and as regards her father, of
 course he knew his own value.  He had moments of irritation at having
 produced a commonplace child, and he even went so far at times as to
 take a certain satisfaction in the thought that his wife had not
 lived to find her out.  He was naturally slow in making this
 discovery himself, and it was not till Catherine had become a young
 lady grown that he regarded the matter as settled.  He gave her the
 benefit of a great many doubts; he was in no haste to conclude.  Mrs.
 Penniman frequently assured him that his daughter had a delightful
 nature; but he knew how to interpret this assurance.  It meant, to
 his sense, that Catherine was not wise enough to discover that her
 aunt was a goose--a limitation of mind that could not fail to be
 agreeable to Mrs. Penniman.  Both she and her brother, however,
 exaggerated the young girl's limitations; for Catherine, though she
 was very fond of her aunt, and conscious of the gratitude she owed
 her, regarded her without a particle of that gentle dread which gave
 its stamp to her admiration of her father.  To her mind there was
 nothing of the infinite about Mrs. Penniman; Catherine saw her all at
 once, as it were, and was not dazzled by the apparition; whereas her
 father's great faculties seemed, as they stretched away, to lose
--**--**--
 beginning of something very important.
 
 Some three or four years before this Dr. Sloper had moved his
 household gods up town, as they say in New York.  He had been living
 ever since his marriage in an edifice of red brick, with granite
 copings and an enormous fanlight over the door, standing in a street
 within five minutes' walk of the City Hall, which saw its best days
 (from the social point of view) about 1820.  After this, the tide of
 fashion began to set steadily northward, as, indeed, in New York,
 thanks to the narrow channel in which it flows, it is obliged to do,
 and the great hum of traffic rolled farther to the right and left of
 Broadway.  By the time the Doctor changed his residence the murmur of
 trade had become a mighty uproar, which was music in the ears of all
 good citizens interested in the commercial development, as they
 delighted to call it, of their fortunate isle.  Dr. Sloper's interest
 in this phenomenon was only indirect--though, seeing that, as the
 years went on, half his patients came to be overworked men of
 business, it might have been more immediate--and when most of his
 neighbours' dwellings (also ornamented with granite copings and large
 fanlights) had been converted into offices, warehouses, and shipping
 agencies, and otherwise applied to the base uses of commerce, he
 determined to look out for a quieter home.  The ideal of quiet and of
 genteel retirement, in 1835, was found in Washington Square, where
 the Doctor built himself a handsome, modern, wide-fronted house, with
 a big balcony before the drawing-room windows, and a flight of marble
 steps ascending to a portal which was also faced with white marble.
 This structure, and many of its neighbours, which it exactly
 resembled, were supposed, forty years ago, to embody the last results
--**--**--
 her husband's death, and then suddenly appeared one morning with pink
 roses in her cap--were complicated in odd, unexpected places with
 buckles, bugles, and pins, which discouraged familiarity.  She took
 children too hard, both for good and for evil, and had an oppressive
 air of expecting subtle things of them, so that going to see her was
 a good deal like being taken to church and made to sit in a front
 pew.  It was discovered after a while, however, that Aunt Penniman
 was but an accident in Catherine's existence, and not a part of its
 essence, and that when the girl came to spend a Saturday with her
 cousins, she was available for "follow-my-master," and even for
 leapfrog.  On this basis an understanding was easily arrived at, and
 for several years Catherine fraternised with her young kinsmen.  I
 say young kinsmen, because seven of the little Almonds were boys, and
 Catherine had a preference for those games which are most
 conveniently played in trousers.  By degrees, however, the little
 Almonds' trousers began to lengthen, and the wearers to disperse and
 settle themselves in life.  The elder children were older than
 Catherine, and the boys were sent to college or placed in counting-
 rooms.  Of the girls, one married very punctually, and the other as
 punctually became engaged.  It was to celebrate this latter event
 that Mrs. Almond gave the little party I have mentioned.  Her
 daughter was to marry a stout young stockbroker, a boy of twenty; it
 was thought a very good thing.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV
 
 
 
 Mrs. Penniman, with more buckles and bangles than ever, came, of
 course, to the entertainment, accompanied by her niece; the Doctor,
 too, had promised to look in later in the evening.  There was to be a
 good deal of dancing, and before it had gone very far, Marian Almond
--**--**--
 little ironical cry, when she found these young people still
 together, which made every one turn round, and cost Catherine a
 conscious blush.  Marian broke up their talk, and told Mr. Townsend--
 whom she treated as if she were already married, and he had become
 her cousin--to run away to her mother, who had been wishing for the
 last half-hour to introduce him to Mr. Almond.
 
 "We shall meet again!" he said to Catherine as he left her, and
 Catherine thought it a very original speech.
 
 Her cousin took her by the arm, and made her walk about.  "I needn't
 ask you what you think of Morris!" the young girl exclaimed.
 
 "Is that his name?"
 
 "I don't ask you what you think of his name, but what you think of
 himself," said Marian.
 
 "Oh, nothing particular!" Catherine answered, dissembling for the
 first time in her life.
 
 "I have half a mind to tell him that!" cried Marian.  "It will do him
 good.  He's so terribly conceited."
 
 "Conceited?" said Catherine, staring.
 
 "So Arthur says, and Arthur knows about him."
 
 "Oh, don't tell him!" Catherine murmured imploringly.
 
 "Don't tell him he's conceited?  I have told him so a dozen times."
 
 At this profession of audacity Catherine looked down at her little
 companion in amazement.  She supposed it was because Marian was going
 to be married that she took so much on herself; but she wondered too,
 whether, when she herself should become engaged, such exploits would
 be expected of her.
 
 Half an hour later she saw her Aunt Penniman sitting in the embrasure
 of a window, with her head a little on one side, and her gold eye-
 glass raised to her eyes, which were wandering about the room.  In
 front of her was a gentleman, bending forward a little, with his back
--**--**--
 you know how indistinctly Jefferson speaks."  Jefferson was Mr.
 Almond.  "Catherine, dear, what was the gentleman's name?"
 
 For a minute, if it had not been for the rumbling of the carriage,
 you might have heard a pin drop.
 
 "I don't know, Aunt Lavinia," said Catherine, very softly.  And, with
 all his irony, her father believed her.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V
 
 
 
 He learned what he had asked some three or four days later, after
 Morris Townsend, with his cousin, had called in Washington Square.
 Mrs. Penniman did not tell her brother, on the drive home, that she
 had intimated to this agreeable young man, whose name she did not
 know, that, with her niece, she should be very glad to see him; but
 she was greatly pleased, and even a little flattered, when, late on a
 Sunday afternoon, the two gentlemen made their appearance.  His
 coming with Arthur Townsend made it more natural and easy; the latter
 young man was on the point of becoming connected with the family, and
 Mrs. Penniman had remarked to Catherine that, as he was going to
 marry Marian, it would be polite in him to call.  These events came
 to pass late in the autumn, and Catherine and her aunt had been
 sitting together in the closing dusk, by the firelight, in the high
 back parlour.
 
 Arthur Townsend fell to Catherine's portion, while his companion
 placed himself on the sofa, beside Mrs. Penniman.  Catherine had
 hitherto not been a harsh critic; she was easy to please--she liked
 to talk with young men.  But Marian's betrothed, this evening, made
 her feel vaguely fastidious; he sat looking at the fire and rubbing
 his knees with his hands.  As for Catherine, she scarcely even
 pretended to keep up the conversation; her attention had fixed itself
 on the other side of the room; she was listening to what went on
--**--**--
 
 "Neither have I," Catherine confessed, with more humility.  "They say
 they are generally brilliant," she added vaguely.
 
 "Well, the people of this city are clever enough for me.  I know some
 of them that think they are too clever for me; but they ain't!"
 
 "I suppose you can't be too clever," said Catherine, still with
 humility.
 
 "I don't know.  I know some people that call my cousin too clever."
 
 Catherine listened to this statement with extreme interest, and a
 feeling that if Morris Townsend had a fault it would naturally be
 that one.  But she did not commit herself, and in a moment she asked:
 "Now that he has come back, will he stay here always?"
 
 "Ah," said Arthur, "if he can get something to do."
 
 "Something to do?"
 
 "Some place or other; some business."
 
 "Hasn't he got any?" said Catherine, who had never heard of a young
 man--of the upper class--in this situation.
 
 "No; he's looking round.  But he can't find anything."
 
 "I am very sorry," Catherine permitted herself to observe.
 
 "Oh, he doesn't mind," said young Townsend.  "He takes it easy--he
 isn't in a hurry.  He is very particular."
 
 Catherine thought he naturally would be, and gave herself up for some
 moments to the contemplation of this idea, in several of its
 bearings.
 
 "Won't his father take him into his business--his office?" she at
 last inquired.
 
 "He hasn't got any father--he has only got a sister.  Your sister
 can't help you much."
 
 It seemed to Catherine that if she were his sister she would disprove
 this axiom.  "Is she--is she pleasant?" she asked in a moment.
 
 "I don't know--I believe she's very respectable," said young
 Townsend.  And then he looked across to his cousin and began to
 laugh.  "Look here, we are talking about you," he added.
--**--**--
 more polite to a person who has no longer extreme youth to recommend
 her than most of the young men.  He is thinking of some one else."
 And Mrs. Penniman gave her niece a delicate little kiss.  "You must
 be very gracious to him."
 
 Catherine stared--she was bewildered.  "I don't understand you," she
 said; "he doesn't know me."
 
 "Oh yes, he does; more than you think.  I have told him all about
 you."
 
 "Oh, Aunt Penniman!" murmured Catherine, as if this had been a breach
 of trust.  "He is a perfect stranger--we don't know him."  There was
 infinite, modesty in the poor girl's "we."
 
 Aunt Penniman, however, took no account of it; she spoke even with a
 touch of acrimony.  "My dear Catherine, you know very well that you
 admire him!"
 
 "Oh, Aunt Penniman!" Catherine could only murmur again.  It might
 very well be that she admired him--though this did not seem to her a
 thing to talk about.  But that this brilliant stranger--this sudden
 apparition, who had barely heard the sound of her voice--took that
 sort of interest in her that was expressed by the romantic phrase of
 which Mrs. Penniman had just made use:  this could only be a figment
 of the restless brain of Aunt Lavinia, whom every one knew to be a
 woman of powerful imagination.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VI
 
 
 
 Mrs. Penniman even took for granted at times that other people had as
 much imagination as herself; so that when, half an hour later, her
 brother came in, she addressed him quite on this principle.
 
 "He has just been here, Austin; it's such a pity you missed him."
 
 "Whom in the world have I missed?" asked the Doctor.
 
 "Mr. Morris Townsend; he has made us such a delightful visit."
 
 "And who in the world is Mr. Morris Townsend?"
--**--**--
 He liked everything to be natural.  Suddenly he stopped, looking at
 Catherine with his smile.
 
 "That's what I like you for; you are so natural!  Excuse me," he
 added; "you see I am natural myself!"
 
 And before she had time to think whether she excused him or not--
 which afterwards, at leisure, she became conscious that she did--he
 began to talk about music, and to say that it was his greatest
 pleasure in life.  He had heard all the great singers in Paris and
 London--Pasta and Rubini and Lablache--and when you had done that,
 you could say that you knew what singing was.
 
 "I sing a little myself," he said; "some day I will show you.  Not
 to-day, but some other time."
 
 And then he got up to go; he had omitted, by accident, to say that he
 would sing to her if she would play to him.  He thought of this after
 he got into the street; but he might have spared his compunction, for
 Catherine had not noticed the lapse.  She was thinking only that
 "some other time" had a delightful sound; it seemed to spread itself
 over the future.
 
 This was all the more reason, however, though she was ashamed and
 uncomfortable, why she should tell her father that Mr. Morris
 Townsend had called again.  She announced the fact abruptly, almost
 violently, as soon as the Doctor came into the house; and having done
 so--it was her duty--she took measures to leave the room.  But she
 could not leave it fast enough; her father stopped her just as she
 reached the door.
 
 "Well, my dear, did he propose to you to-day?" the Doctor asked.
 
 This was just what she had been afraid he would say; and yet she had
 no answer ready.  Of course she would have liked to take it as a
--**--**--
 "Only he is lazy, eh?"
 
 "She doesn't say so."
 
 "That's family pride," said the Doctor.  "What is his profession?"
 
 "He hasn't got any; he is looking for something.  I believe he was
 once in the Navy."
 
 "Once?  What is his age?"
 
 "I suppose he is upwards of thirty.  He must have gone into the Navy
 very young.  I think Arthur told me that he inherited a small
 property--which was perhaps the cause of his leaving the Navy--and
 that he spent it all in a few years.  He travelled all over the
 world, lived abroad, amused himself.  I believe it was a kind of
 system, a theory he had.  He has lately come back to America, with
 the intention, as he tells Arthur, of beginning life in earnest."
 
 "Is he in earnest about Catherine, then?"
 
 "I don't see why you should be incredulous," said Mrs. Almond.  "It
 seems to me that you have never done Catherine justice.  You must
 remember that she has the prospect of thirty thousand a year."
 
 The Doctor looked at his sister a moment, and then, with the
 slightest touch of bitterness:  "You at least appreciate her," he
 said.
 
 Mrs. Almond blushed.
 
 "I don't mean that is her only merit; I simply mean that it is a
 great one.  A great many young men think so; and you appear to me
 never to have been properly aware of that.  You have always had a
 little way of alluding to her as an unmarriageable girl."
 
 "My allusions are as kind as yours, Elizabeth," said the Doctor
 frankly.  "How many suitors has Catherine had, with all her
 expectations--how much attention has she ever received?  Catherine is
 not unmarriageable, but she is absolutely unattractive.  What other
 reason is there for Lavinia being so charmed with the idea that there
--**--**--
 
 
 He was, however, by no means so much in earnest as this might seem to
 indicate; and, indeed, he was more than anything else amused with the
 whole situation.  He was not in the least in a state of tension or of
 vigilance with regard to Catherine's prospects he was even on his
 guard against the ridicule that might attach itself to the spectacle
 of a house thrown into agitation by its daughter and heiress
 receiving attentions unprecedented in its annals.  More than this, he
 went so far as to promise himself some entertainment from the little
 drama--if drama it was--of which Mrs. Penniman desired to represent
 the ingenious Mr. Townsend as the hero.  He had no intention, as yet,
 of regulating the denouement.  He was perfectly willing, as Elizabeth
 had suggested, to give the young man the benefit of every doubt.
 There was no great danger in it; for Catherine, at the age of twenty-
 two, was, after all, a rather mature blossom, such as could be
 plucked from the stem only by a vigorous jerk.  The fact that Morris
 Townsend was poor--was not of necessity against him; the Doctor had
 never made up his mind that his daughter should marry a rich man.
 The fortune she would inherit struck him as a very sufficient
 provision for two reasonable persons, and if a penniless swain who
 could give a good account of himself should enter the lists, he
 should be judged quite upon his personal merits.  There were other
 things besides.  The Doctor thought it very vulgar to be precipitate
 in accusing people of mercenary motives, inasmuch as his door had as
 yet not been in the least besieged by fortune-hunters; and, lastly,
 he was very curious to see whether Catherine might really be loved
 for her moral worth.  He smiled as he reflected that poor Mr.
--**--**--
 niece.  "He thinks I'm all wrong."
 
 Unlike her niece, Mrs. Penniman asked for no explanation.  She only
 smiled very sweetly, as if she understood everything; and, unlike
 Catherine too, she made no attempt to contradict him.  "Pray, what
 does it matter?" she murmured softly.
 
 "Ah, you say the right thing!" said Morris, greatly to the
 gratification of Mrs. Penniman, who prided herself on always saying
 the right thing.
 
 The Doctor, the next time he saw his sister Elizabeth, let her know
 that he had made the acquaintance of Lavinia's protege.
 
 "Physically," he said, "he's uncommonly well set up.  As an
 anatomist, it is really a pleasure to me to see such a beautiful
 structure; although, if people were all like him, I suppose there
 would be very little need for doctors."
 
 "Don't you see anything in people but their bones?" Mrs. Almond
 rejoined.  "What do you think of him as a father?"
 
 "As a father?  Thank Heaven I am not his father!"
 
 "No; but you are Catherine's.  Lavinia tells me she is in love."
 
 "She must get over it.  He is not a gentleman."
 
 "Ah, take care!  Remember that he is a branch of the Townsends."
 
 "He is not what I call a gentleman.  He has not the soul of one.  He
 is extremely insinuating; but it's a vulgar nature.  I saw through it
 in a minute.  He is altogether too familiar--I hate familiarity.  He
 is a plausible coxcomb."
 
 "Ah, well," said Mrs. Almond; "if you make up your mind so easily,
 it's a great advantage."
 
 "I don't make up my mind easily.  What I tell you is the result of
 thirty years of observation; and in order to be able to form that
 judgement in a single evening, I have had to spend a lifetime in
 study."
 
 "Very possibly you are right.  But the thing is for Catherine to see
--**--**--
 filled in these days with the impulse of self-effacement and
 sacrifice.  Whenever Morris Townsend had left the house, her
 imagination projected itself, with all its strength, into the idea of
 his soon coming back; but if she had been told at such a moment that
 he would not return for a year, or even that he would never return,
 she would not have complained nor rebelled, but would have humbly
 accepted the decree, and sought for consolation in thinking over the
 times she had already seen him, the words he had spoken, the sound of
 his voice, of his tread, the expression of his face.  Love demands
 certain things as a right; but Catherine had no sense of her rights;
 she had only a consciousness of immense and unexpected favours.  Her
 very gratitude for these things had hushed itself; for it seemed to
 her that there would be something of impudence in making a festival
 of her secret.  Her father suspected Morris Townsend's visits, and
 noted her reserve.  She seemed to beg pardon for it; she looked at
 him constantly in silence, as if she meant to say that she said
 nothing because she was afraid of irritating him.  But the poor
 girl's dumb eloquence irritated him more than anything else would
 have done, and he caught himself murmuring more than once that it was
 a grievous pity his only child was a simpleton.  His murmurs,
 however, were inaudible; and for a while he said nothing to any one.
 He would have liked to know exactly how often young Townsend came;
 but he had determined to ask no questions of the girl herself--to say
 nothing more to her that would show that he watched her.  The Doctor
 had a great idea of being largely just:  he wished to leave his
--**--**--
 "It is the young man, then, who has made you his confidante?  Allow
 me to say that it is extremely indiscreet of you to form secret
 alliances with young men.  You don't know where they may lead you."
 
 "I don't know what you mean by an alliance," said Mrs. Penniman.  "I
 take a great interest in Mr. Townsend; I won't conceal that.  But
 that's all."
 
 "Under the circumstances, that is quite enough.  What is the source
 of your interest in Mr. Townsend?"
 
 "Why," said Mrs. Penniman, musing, and then breaking into her smile,
 "that he is so interesting!"
 
 The Doctor felt that he had need of his patience.  "And what makes
 him interesting?--his good looks?"
 
 "His misfortunes, Austin."
 
 "Ah, he has had misfortunes?  That, of course, is always interesting.
 Are you at liberty to mention a few of Mr. Townsend's?"
 
 "I don't know that he would like it," said Mrs. Penniman.  "He has
 told me a great deal about himself--he has told me, in fact, his
 whole history.  But I don't think I ought to repeat those things.  He
 would tell them to you, I am sure, if he thought you would listen to
 him kindly.  With kindness you may do anything with him."
 
 The Doctor gave a laugh.  "I shall request him very kindly, then, to
 leave Catherine alone."
 
 "Ah!" said Mrs. Penniman, shaking her forefinger at her brother, with
 her little finger turned out, "Catherine had probably said something
 to him kinder than that."
 
 "Said that she loved him?  Do you mean that?"
 
 Mrs. Penniman fixed her eyes on the floor.  "As I tell you, Austin,
 she doesn't confide in me."
 
 "You have an opinion, I suppose, all the same.  It is that I ask you
 for; though I don't conceal from you that I shall not regard it as
--**--**--
 brother.  "My dear Austin," she remarked, "if you regard Catherine as
 a weak-minded woman, you are particularly mistaken!"  And with this
 she moved majestically away.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IX
 
 
 
 It was a regular custom with the family in Washington Square to go
 and spend Sunday evening at Mrs. Almond's.  On the Sunday after the
 conversation I have just narrated, this custom was not intermitted
 and on this occasion, towards the middle of the evening, Dr. Sloper
 found reason to withdraw to the library, with his brother-in-law, to
 talk over a matter of business.  He was absent some twenty minutes,
 and when he came back into the circle, which was enlivened by the
 presence of several friends of the family, he saw that Morris
 Townsend had come in and had lost as little time as possible in
 seating himself on a small sofa, beside Catherine.  In the large
 room, where several different groups had been formed, and the hum of
 voices and of laughter was loud, these two young persons might
 confabulate, as the Doctor phrased it to himself, without attracting
 attention.  He saw in a moment, however, that his daughter was
 painfully conscious of his own observation.  She sat motionless, with
 her eyes bent down, staring at her open fan, deeply flushed,
 shrinking together as if to minimise the indiscretion of which she
 confessed herself guilty.
 
 The Doctor almost pitied her.  Poor Catherine was not defiant; she
 had no genius for bravado; and as she felt that her father viewed her
 companion's attentions with an unsympathising eye, there was nothing
 but discomfort for her in the accident of seeming to challenge him.
 The Doctor felt, indeed, so sorry for her that he turned away, to
 spare her the sense of being watched; and he was so intelligent a man
 that, in his thoughts, he rendered a sort of poetic justice to her
--**--**--
 choose his line with discretion."
 
 "Ah, yes, with discretion," Morris Townsend repeated sympathetically.
 "Well, I have been indiscreet, formerly; but I think I have got over
 it.  I am very steady now."  And he stood a moment, looking down at
 his remarkably neat shoes.  Then at last, "Were you kindly intending
 to propose something for my advantage?" he inquired, looking up and
 smiling.
 
 "Damn his impudence!" the Doctor exclaimed privately.  But in a
 moment he reflected that he himself had, after all, touched first
 upon this delicate point, and that his words might have been
 construed as an offer of assistance.  "I have no particular proposal
 to make," he presently said; "but it occurred to me to let you know
 that I have you in my mind.  Sometimes one hears of opportunities.
 For instance--should you object to leaving New York--to going to a
 distance?"
 
 "I am afraid I shouldn't be able to manage that.  I must seek my
 fortune here or nowhere.  You see," added Morris Townsend, "I have
 ties--I have responsibilities here.  I have a sister, a widow, from
 whom I have been separated for a long time, and to whom I am almost
 everything.  I shouldn't like to say to her that I must leave her.
 She rather depends upon me, you see."
 
 "Ah, that's very proper; family feeling is very proper," said Dr.
 Sloper.  "I often think there is not enough of it in our city.  I
 think I have heard of your sister."
 
 "It is possible, but I rather doubt it; she lives so very quietly."
 
 "As quietly, you mean," the Doctor went on, with a short laugh, "as a
 lady may do who has several young children."
 
 "Ah, my little nephews and nieces--that's the very point!  I am
 helping to bring them up," said Morris Townsend.  "I am a kind of
--**--**--
 
 He left her resignedly; he had got what he wanted.  Fortunately he
 was ignorant that half an hour later, going home with her father and
 feeling him near, the poor girl, in spite of her sudden declaration
 of courage, began to tremble again.  Her father said nothing; but she
 had an idea his eyes were fixed upon her in the darkness.  Mrs.
 Penniman also was silent; Morris Townsend had told her that her niece
 preferred, unromantically, an interview in a chintz-covered parlour
 to a sentimental tryst beside a fountain sheeted with dead leaves,
 and she was lost in wonderment at the oddity--almost the perversity--
 of the choice.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER X
 
 
 
 Catherine received the young man the next day on the ground she had
 chosen--amid the chaste upholstery of a New York drawing-room
 furnished in the fashion of fifty years ago.  Morris had swallowed
 his pride and made the effort necessary to cross the threshold of her
 too derisive parent--an act of magnanimity which could not fail to
 render him doubly interesting.
 
 "We must settle something--we must take a line," he declared, passing
 his hand through his hair and giving a glance at the long narrow
 mirror which adorned the space between the two windows, and which had
 at its base a little gilded bracket covered by a thin slab of white
 marble, supporting in its turn a backgammon board folded together in
 the shape of two volumes, two shining folios inscribed in letters of
 greenish gilt, History of England.  If Morris had been pleased to
 describe the master of the house as a heartless scoffer, it is
 because he thought him too much on his guard, and this was the
 easiest way to express his own dissatisfaction--a dissatisfaction
 which he had made a point of concealing from the Doctor.  It will
--**--**--
 
 "It is very good of you to do it first," Morris answered.  "The young
 man--the happy lover--generally does that.  But just as you please!"
 
 It pleased Catherine to think that she should be brave for his sake,
 and in her satisfaction she even gave a little smile.  "Women have
 more tact," she said "they ought to do it first.  They are more
 conciliating; they can persuade better."
 
 "You will need all your powers of persuasion.  But, after all,"
 Morris added, "you are irresistible."
 
 "Please don't speak that way--and promise me this.  To-morrow, when
 you talk with father, you will be very gentle and respectful."
 
 "As much so as possible," Morris promised.  "It won't be much use,
 but I shall try.  I certainly would rather have you easily than have
 to fight for you."
 
 "Don't talk about fighting; we shall not fight."
 
 "Ah, we must be prepared," Morris rejoined; "you especially, because
 for you it must come hardest.  Do you know the first thing your
 father will say to you?"
 
 "No, Morris; please tell me."
 
 "He will tell you I am mercenary."
 
 "Mercenary?"
 
 "It's a big word; but it means a low thing.  It means that I am after
 your money."
 
 "Oh!" murmured Catherine softly.
 
 The exclamation was so deprecating and touching that Morris indulged
 in another little demonstration of affection.  "But he will be sure
 to say it," he added.
 
 "It will be easy to be prepared for that," Catherine said.  "I shall
 simply say that he is mistaken--that other men may be that way, but
 that you are not."
 
 "You must make a great point of that, for it will be his own great
 point."
 
 Catherine looked at her lover a minute, and then she said, "I shall
 persuade him.  But I am glad we shall be rich," she added.
--**--**--
 
 "When was this arrangement made?" the Doctor asked.
 
 "This afternoon--two hours ago."
 
 "Was Mr. Townsend here?"
 
 "Yes, father; in the front parlour."  She was very glad that she was
 not obliged to tell him that the ceremony of their betrothal had
 taken place out there under the bare ailantus-trees.
 
 "Is it serious?" said the Doctor.
 
 "Very serious, father."
 
 Her father was silent a moment.  "Mr. Townsend ought to have told
 me."
 
 "He means to tell you to-morrow."
 
 "After I know all about it from you?  He ought to have told me
 before.  Does he think I didn't care--because I left you so much
 liberty?"
 
 "Oh no," said Catherine; "he knew you would care.  And we have been
 so much obliged to you for--for the liberty."
 
 The Doctor gave a short laugh.  "You might have made a better use of
 it, Catherine."
 
 "Please don't say that, father," the girl urged softly, fixing her
 dull and gentle eyes upon him.
 
 He puffed his cigar awhile, meditatively.  "You have gone very fast,"
 he said at last.
 
 "Yes," Catherine answered simply; "I think we have."
 
 Her father glanced at her an instant, removing his eyes from the
 fire.  "I don't wonder Mr. Townsend likes you.  You are so simple and
 so good."
 
 "I don't know why it is--but he DOES like me.  I am sure of that."
 
 "And are you very fond of Mr. Townsend?"
 
 "I like him very much, of course--or I shouldn't consent to marry
 him."
 
 "But you have known him a very short time, my dear."
 
 "Oh," said Catherine, with some eagerness, "it doesn't take long to
 like a person--when once you begin."
 
 "You must have begun very quickly.  Was it the first time you saw
 him--that night at your aunt's party?"
 
 "I don't know, father," the girl answered.  "I can't tell you about
--**--**--
 "Whatever it may be.  There is sure to be plenty of it."
 
 "I know what you mean," said Catherine, remembering how Morris had
 forewarned her.  "You mean that he is mercenary."
 
 Her father looked up at her still, with his cold, quiet reasonable
 eye.  "If I meant it, my dear, I should say it!  But there is an
 error I wish particularly to avoid--that of rendering Mr. Townsend
 more interesting to you by saying hard things about him."
 
 "I won't think them hard if they are true," said Catherine.
 
 "If you don't, you will be a remarkably sensible young woman!"
 
 "They will be your reasons, at any rate, and you will want me to hear
 your reasons."
 
 The Doctor smiled a little.  "Very true.  You have a perfect right to
 ask for them."  And he puffed his cigar a few moments.  "Very well,
 then, without accusing Mr. Townsend of being in love only with your
 fortune--and with the fortune that you justly expect--I will say that
 there is every reason to suppose that these good things have entered
 into his calculation more largely than a tender solicitude for your
 happiness strictly requires.  There is, of course, nothing impossible
 in an intelligent young man entertaining a disinterested affection
 for you.  You are an honest, amiable girl, and an intelligent young
 man might easily find it out.  But the principal thing that we know
 about this young man--who is, indeed, very intelligent--leads us to
 suppose that, however much he may value your personal merits, he
 values your money more.  The principal thing we know about him is
 that he has led a life of dissipation, and has spent a fortune of his
 own in doing so.  That is enough for me, my dear.  I wish you to
 marry a young man with other antecedents--a young man who could give
--**--**--
 Meanwhile, and for the present, be so good as to mention to no one
 that you are engaged."
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XII
 
 
 
 On the morrow, in the afternoon, he stayed at home, awaiting Mr.
 Townsend's call--a proceeding by which it appeared to him (justly
 perhaps, for he was a very busy man) that he paid Catherine's suitor
 great honour, and gave both these young people so much the less to
 complain of.  Morris presented himself with a countenance
 sufficiently serene--he appeared to have forgotten the "insult" for
 which he had solicited Catherine's sympathy two evenings before, and
 Dr. Sloper lost no time in letting him know that he had been prepared
 for his visit.
 
 "Catherine told me yesterday what has been going on between you," he
 said.  "You must allow me to say that it would have been becoming of
 you to give me notice of your intentions before they had gone so
 far."
 
 "I should have done so," Morris answered, "if you had not had so much
 the appearance of leaving your daughter at liberty.  She seems to me
 quite her own mistress."
 
 "Literally, she is.  But she has not emancipated herself morally
 quite so far, I trust, as to choose a husband without consulting me.
 I have left her at liberty, but I have not been in the least
 indifferent.  The truth is that your little affair has come to a head
 with a rapidity that surprises me.  It was only the other day that
 Catherine made your acquaintance."
 
 "It was not long ago, certainly," said Morris, with great gravity.
 "I admit that we have not been slow to--to arrive at an
 understanding.  But that was very natural, from the moment we were
 sure of ourselves--and of each other.  My interest in Miss Sloper
 began the first time I saw her."
--**--**--
 "It doesn't matter what I think, when once I have told you I don't
 think of you as a son-in-law."
 
 But Morris persisted.  "You think I would squander her money."
 
 The Doctor smiled.  "It doesn't matter, as I say; but I plead guilty
 to that."
 
 "That's because I spent my own, I suppose," said Morris.  "I frankly
 confess that.  I have been wild.  I have been foolish.  I will tell
 you every crazy thing I ever did, if you like.  There were some great
 follies among the number--I have never concealed that.  But I have
 sown my wild oats.  Isn't there some proverb about a reformed rake?
 I was not a rake, but I assure you I have reformed.  It is better to
 have amused oneself for a while and have done with it.  Your daughter
 would never care for a milksop; and I will take the liberty of saying
 that you would like one quite as little.  Besides, between my money
 and hers there is a great difference.  I spent my own; it was because
 it was my own that I spent it.  And I made no debts; when it was gone
 I stopped.  I don't owe a penny in the world."
 
 "Allow me to inquire what you are living on now--though I admit," the
 Doctor added, "that the question, on my part, is inconsistent."
 
 "I am living on the remnants of my property," said Morris Townsend.
 
 "Thank you!" the Doctor gravely replied.
 
 Yes, certainly, Morris's self-control was laudable.  "Even admitting
 I attach an undue importance to Miss Sloper's fortune," he went on,
 "would not that be in itself an assurance that I should take much
 care of it?"
 
 "That you should take too much care would be quite as bad as that you
 should take too little.  Catherine might suffer as much by your
--**--**--
 
 Morris gave a laugh.  "Your opposition to my marriage is all the more
 cruel, then!  Do you intend to forbid your daughter to see me again?"
 
 "She is past the age at which people are forbidden, and I am not a
 father in an old-fashioned novel.  But I shall strongly urge her to
 break with you."
 
 "I don't think she will," said Morris Townsend.
 
 "Perhaps not.  But I shall have done what I could."
 
 "She has gone too far," Morris went on.
 
 "To retreat?  Then let her stop where she is."
 
 "Too far to stop, I mean."
 
 The Doctor looked at him a moment; Morris had his hand on the door.
 "There is a great deal of impertinence in your saying it."
 
 "I will say no more, sir!" Morris answered; and, making his bow, he
 left the room.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XIII
 
 
 
 It may be thought the Doctor was too positive, and Mrs. Almond
 intimated as much.  But, as he said, he had his impression; it seemed
 to him sufficient, and he had no wish to modify it.  He had passed
 his life in estimating people (it was part of the medical trade), and
 in nineteen cases out of twenty he was right.
 
 "Perhaps Mr. Townsend is the twentieth case," Mrs. Almond suggested.
 
 "Perhaps he is, though he doesn't look to me at all like a twentieth
 case.  But I will give him the benefit of the doubt, and, to make
 sure, I will go and talk with Mrs. Montgomery.  She will almost
 certainly tell me I have done right; but it is just possible that she
 will prove to me that I have made the greatest mistake of my life.
 If she does, I will beg Mr. Townsend's pardon.  You needn't invite
 her to meet me, as you kindly proposed; I will write her a frank
--**--**--
 
 "I thought a love-lorn maiden was always scenic."
 
 "A fantastic widow is more so.  Lavinia has made me a speech; she
 thinks me very arbitrary."
 
 "She has a talent for being in the wrong," said Mrs. Almond.  "But I
 am very sorry for Catherine, all the same."
 
 "So am I.  But she will get over it."
 
 "You believe she will give him up?"
 
 "I count upon it.  She has such an admiration for her father."
 
 "Oh, we know all about that!  But it only makes me pity her the more.
 It makes her dilemma the more painful, and the effort of choosing
 between you and her lover almost impossible."
 
 "If she can't choose, all the better."
 
 "Yes, but he will stand there entreating her to choose, and Lavinia
 will pull on that side."
 
 "I am glad she is not on my side; she is capable of ruining an
 excellent cause.  The day Lavinia gets into your boat it capsizes.
 But she had better be careful," said the Doctor.  "I will have no
 treason in my house!"
 
 "I suspect she will be careful; for she is at bottom very much afraid
 of you."
 
 "They are both afraid of me--harmless as I am!" the Doctor answered.
 "And it is on that that I build--on the salutary terror I inspire!"
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XIV
 
 
 
 He wrote his frank letter to Mrs. Montgomery, who punctually answered
 it, mentioning an hour at which he might present himself in the
 Second Avenue.  She lived in a neat little house of red brick, which
 had been freshly painted, with the edges of the bricks very sharply
 marked out in white.  It has now disappeared, with its companions, to
 make room for a row of structures more majestic.  There were green
 shutters upon the windows, without slats, but pierced with little
--**--**--
 He, on the other hand, if he should not be all that we desire, might
 make her very miserable.  That is why I want you to throw some light
 upon his character, you know.  Of course you are not bound to do it.
 My daughter, whom you have never seen, is nothing to you; and I,
 possibly, am only an indiscreet and impertinent old man.  It is
 perfectly open to you to tell me that my visit is in very bad taste
 and that I had better go about my business.  But I don't think you
 will do this; because I think we shall interest you, my poor girl and
 I.  I am sure that if you were to see Catherine, she would interest
 you very much.  I don't mean because she is interesting in the usual
 sense of the word, but because you would feel sorry for her.  She is
 so soft, so simple-minded, she would be such an easy victim!  A bad
 husband would have remarkable facilities for making her miserable;
 for she would have neither the intelligence nor the resolution to get
 the better of him, and yet she would have an exaggerated power of
 suffering.  I see," added the Doctor, with his most insinuating, his
 most professional laugh, "you are already interested!"
 
 "I have been interested from the moment he told me he was engaged,"
 said Mrs. Montgomery.
 
 "Ah! he says that--he calls it an engagement?"
 
 "Oh, he has told me you didn't like it."
 
 "Did he tell you that I don't like HIM?"
 
 "Yes, he told me that too.  I said I couldn't help it!" added Mrs.
 Montgomery.
 
 "Of course you can't.  But what you can do is to tell me I am right--
 to give me an attestation, as it were."  And the Doctor accompanied
--**--**--
 and you were made to be its handmaids and victims.  The sign of the
 type in question is the determination--sometimes terrible in its
 quiet intensity--to accept nothing of life but its pleasures, and to
 secure these pleasures chiefly by the aid of your complaisant sex.
 Young men of this class never do anything for themselves that they
 can get other people to do for them, and it is the infatuation, the
 devotion, the superstition of others that keeps them going.  These
 others in ninety-nine cases out of a hundred are women.  What our
 young friends chiefly insist upon is that some one else shall suffer
 for them; and women do that sort of thing, as you must know,
 wonderfully well."  The Doctor paused a moment, and then he added
 abruptly, "You have suffered immensely for your brother!"
 
 This exclamation was abrupt, as I say, but it was also perfectly
 calculated.  The Doctor had been rather disappointed at not finding
 his compact and comfortable little hostess surrounded in a more
 visible degree by the ravages of Morris Townsend's immorality; but he
 had said to himself that this was not because the young man had
 spared her, but because she had contrived to plaster up her wounds.
 They were aching there, behind the varnished stove, the festooned
 engravings, beneath her own neat little poplin bosom; and if he could
 only touch the tender spot, she would make a movement that would
 betray her.  The words I have just quoted were an attempt to put his
 finger suddenly upon the place; and they had some of the success that
 he looked for.  The tears sprang for a moment to Mrs. Montgomery's
 eyes, and she indulged in a proud little jerk of the head.
 
 "I don't know how you have found that out!" she exclaimed.
--**--**--
 Mrs. Montgomery stared a moment, and then quickly--"Oh yes; he
 teaches them Spanish."
 
 The Doctor laughed out.  "That must take a great deal off your hands!
 Your brother also knows, of course, that you have very little money."
 
 "I have often told him so!" Mrs. Montgomery exclaimed, more
 unreservedly than she had yet spoken.  She was apparently taking some
 comfort in the Doctor's clairvoyancy.
 
 "Which means that you have often occasion to, and that he often
 sponges on you.  Excuse the crudity of my language; I simply express
 a fact.  I don't ask you how much of your money he has had, it is
 none of my business.  I have ascertained what I suspected--what I
 wished."  And the Doctor got up, gently smoothing his hat.  "Your
 brother lives on you," he said as he stood there.
 
 Mrs. Montgomery quickly rose from her chair, following her visitor's
 movements with a look of fascination.  But then, with a certain
 inconsequence--"I have never complained of him!" she said.
 
 "You needn't protest--you have not betrayed him.  But I advise you
 not to give him any more money."
 
 "Don't you see it is in my interest that he should marry a rich
 person?" she asked.  "If, as you say, he lives on me, I can only wish
 to get rid of him, and to put obstacles in the way of his marrying is
 to increase my own difficulties."
 
 "I wish very much you would come to me with your difficulties," said
 the Doctor.  "Certainly, if I throw him back on your hands, the least
 I can do is to help you to bear the burden.  If you will allow me to
 say so, then, I shall take the liberty of placing in your hands, for
 the present, a certain fund for your brother's support."
--**--**--
 in it that appealed for pity, and he was even a little disappointed
 at her not giving him an opportunity to make up for his harshness by
 some manifestation of liberality which should operate as a
 compensation.  He thought a little of offering to take her for a tour
 in Europe; but he was determined to do this only in case she should
 seem mutely to reproach him.  He had an idea that she would display a
 talent for mute reproaches, and he was surprised at not finding
 himself exposed to these silent batteries.  She said nothing, either
 tacitly or explicitly, and as she was never very talkative, there was
 now no especial eloquence in her reserve.  And poor Catherine was not
 sulky--a style of behaviour for which she had too little histrionic
 talent; she was simply very patient.  Of course she was thinking over
 her situation, and she was apparently doing so in a deliberate and
 unimpassioned manner, with a view of making the best of it.
 
 "She will do as I have bidden her," said the Doctor, and he made the
 further reflexion that his daughter was not a woman of a great
 spirit.  I know not whether he had hoped for a little more resistance
 for the sake of a little more entertainment; but he said to himself,
 as he had said before, that though it might have its momentary
 alarms, paternity was, after all, not an exciting vocation.
 
 Catherine, meanwhile, had made a discovery of a very different sort;
 it had become vivid to her that there was a great excitement in
 trying to be a good daughter.  She had an entirely new feeling, which
 may be described as a state of expectant suspense about her own
 actions.  She watched herself as she would have watched another
--**--**--
 her niece tended, in her own imagination, to produce this result.  It
 was rather incoherent counsel, and from one day to another it
 contradicted itself; but it was pervaded by an earnest desire that
 Catherine should do something striking.  "You must ACT, my dear; in
 your situation the great thing is to act," said Mrs. Penniman, who
 found her niece altogether beneath her opportunities.  Mrs.
 Penniman's real hope was that the girl would make a secret marriage,
 at which she should officiate as brideswoman or duenna.  She had a
 vision of this ceremony being performed in some subterranean chapel--
 subterranean chapels in New York were not frequent, but Mrs.
 Penniman's imagination was not chilled by trifles--and of the guilty
 couple--she liked to think of poor Catherine and her suitor as the
 guilty couple--being shuffled away in a fast-whirling vehicle to some
 obscure lodging in the suburbs, where she would pay them (in a thick
 veil) clandestine visits, where they would endure a period of
 romantic privation, and where ultimately, after she should have been
 their earthly providence, their intercessor, their advocate, and
 their medium of communication with the world, they should be
 reconciled to her brother in an artistic tableau, in which she
 herself should be somehow the central figure.  She hesitated as yet
 to recommend this course to Catherine, but she attempted to draw an
 attractive picture of it to Morris Townsend.  She was in daily
 communication with the young man, whom she kept informed by letters
 of the state of affairs in Washington Square.  As he had been
 banished, as she said, from the house, she no longer saw him; but she
 ended by writing to him that she longed for an interview.  This
 interview could take place only on neutral ground, and she bethought
 herself greatly before selecting a place of meeting.  She had an
--**--**--
 will be vanquished only by the accomplished fact."
 
 "The accomplished fact?"
 
 "He will come round afterwards," said Mrs. Penniman, with extreme
 significance.  "He cares for nothing but facts; he must be met by
 facts!"
 
 "Well," rejoined Morris, "it is a fact that I wish to marry his
 daughter.  I met him with that the other day, but he was not at all
 vanquished."
 
 Mrs. Penniman was silent a little, and her smile beneath the shadow
 of her capacious bonnet, on the edge of which her black veil was
 arranged curtain-wise, fixed itself upon Morris's face with a still
 more tender brilliancy.  "Marry Catherine first and meet him
 afterwards!" she exclaimed.
 
 "Do you recommend that?" asked the young man, frowning heavily.
 
 She was a little frightened, but she went on with considerable
 boldness.  "That is the way I see it:  a private marriage--a private
 marriage."  She repeated the phrase because she liked it.
 
 "Do you mean that I should carry Catherine off?  What do they call
 it--elope with her?"
 
 "It is not a crime when you are driven to it," said Mrs. Penniman.
 "My husband, as I have told you, was a distinguished clergyman; one
 of the most eloquent men of his day.  He once married a young couple
 that had fled from the house of the young lady's father.  He was so
 interested in their story.  He had no hesitation, and everything came
 out beautifully.  The father was afterwards reconciled, and thought
 everything of the young man.  Mr. Penniman married them in the
 evening, about seven o'clock.  The church was so dark, you could
 scarcely see; and Mr. Penniman was intensely agitated; he was so
 sympathetic.  I don't believe he could have done it again."
 
 "Unfortunately Catherine and I have not Mr. Penniman to marry us,"
 said Morris.
 
 "No, but you have me!" rejoined Mrs. Penniman expressively.  "I can't
--**--**--
 engaged she had an inspiration.  She found the phrase that she could
 boldly offer as a vindication of the step she had taken.  "If you
 marry Catherine at all risks" she said, "you will give my brother a
 proof of your being what he pretends to doubt."
 
 "What he pretends to doubt?"
 
 "Don't you know what that is?" Mrs. Penniman asked almost playfully.
 
 "It does not concern me to know," said Morris grandly.
 
 "Of course it makes you angry."
 
 "I despise it," Morris declared.
 
 "Ah, you know what it is, then?" said Mrs. Penniman, shaking her
 finger at him.  "He pretends that you like--you like the money."
 
 Morris hesitated a moment; and then, as if he spoke advisedly--"I DO
 like the money!"
 
 "Ah, but not--but not as he means it.  You don't like it more than
 Catherine?"
 
 He leaned his elbows on the table and buried his head in his hands.
 "You torture me!" he murmured.  And, indeed, this was almost the
 effect of the poor lady's too importunate interest in his situation.
 
 But she insisted on making her point.  "If you marry her in spite of
 him, he will take for granted that you expect nothing of him, and are
 prepared to do without it.  And so he will see that you are
 disinterested."
 
 Morris raised his head a little, following this argument, "And what
 shall I gain by that?"
 
 "Why, that he will see that he has been wrong in thinking that you
 wished to get his money."
 
 "And seeing that I wish he would go to the deuce with it, he will
 leave it to a hospital.  Is that what you mean?" asked Morris.
 
 "No, I don't mean that; though that would be very grand!" Mrs.
 Penniman quickly added.  "I mean that having done you such an
--**--**--
 She hesitated a moment.  "I think this manner would be pleasant," she
 said; and she continued to let him feel the value of his support.
 
 So he walked with her through the devious ways of the west side of
 the town, and through the bustle of gathering nightfall in populous
 streets, to the quiet precinct of Washington Square.  They lingered a
 moment at the foot of Dr. Sloper's white marble steps, above which a
 spotless white door, adorned with a glittering silver plate, seemed
 to figure, for Morris, the closed portal of happiness; and then Mrs.
 Penniman's companion rested a melancholy eye upon a lighted window in
 the upper part of the house.
 
 "That is my room--my dear little room!" Mrs. Penniman remarked.
 
 Morris started.  "Then I needn't come walking round the Square to
 gaze at it."
 
 "That's as you please.  But Catherine's is behind; two noble windows
 on the second floor.  I think you can see them from the other
 street."
 
 "I don't want to see them, ma'am!"  And Morris turned his back to the
 house.
 
 "I will tell her you have been HERE, at any rate," said Mrs.
 Penniman, pointing to the spot where they stood; "and I will give her
 your message--that she is to hold fast!"
 
 "Oh, yes! of course.  You know I write her all that."
 
 "It seems to say more when it is spoken!  And remember, if you need
 me, that I am THERE"; and Mrs. Penniman glanced at the third floor.
 
 On this they separated, and Morris, left to himself, stood looking at
 the house a moment; after which he turned away, and took a gloomy
 walk round the Square, on the opposite side, close to the wooden
 fence.  Then he came back, and paused for a minute in front of Dr.
--**--**--
 "Afraid of your father."
 
 Catherine turned back to the fire again, and then, after a pause, she
 said--"I AM afraid of my father."
 
 Mrs. Penniman got quickly up from her chair and approached her niece.
 "Do you mean to give him up, then?"
 
 Catherine for some time never moved; she kept her eyes on the coals.
 At last she raised her head and looked at her aunt.  "Why do you push
 me so?" she asked.
 
 "I don't push you.  When have I spoken to you before?"
 
 "It seems to me that you have spoken to me several times."
 
 "I am afraid it is necessary, then, Catherine," said Mrs. Penniman,
 with a good deal of solemnity.  "I am afraid you don't feel the
 importance--"  She paused a little; Catherine was looking at her.
 "The importance of not disappointing that gallant young heart!"  And
 Mrs. Penniman went back to her chair, by the lamp, and, with a little
 jerk, picked up the evening paper again.
 
 Catherine stood there before the fire, with her hands behind her,
 looking at her aunt, to whom it seemed that the girl had never had
 just this dark fixedness in her gaze.  "I don't think you understand-
 -or that you know me," she said.
 
 "If I don't, it is not wonderful; you trust me so little."
 
 Catherine made no attempt to deny this charge, and for some time more
 nothing was said.  But Mrs. Penniman's imagination was restless, and
 the evening paper failed on this occasion to enchain it.
 
 "If you succumb to the dread of your father's wrath," she said, "I
 don't know what will become of us."
 
 "Did HE tell you to say these things to me?"
 
 "He told me to use my influence."
 
 "You must be mistaken," said Catherine.  "He trusts me."
 
 "I hope he may never repent of it!"  And Mrs. Penniman gave a little
--**--**--
 should like to do so."
 
 "To bid him good-bye?" asked the Doctor.
 
 The girl hesitated a moment.  "He is not going away."
 
 The Doctor wheeled slowly round in his chair, with a smile that
 seemed to accuse her of an epigram; but extremes meet, and Catherine
 had not intended one.  "It is not to bid him good-bye, then?" her
 father said.
 
 "No, father, not that; at least, not for ever.  I have not seen him
 again, but I should like to see him," Catherine repeated.
 
 The Doctor slowly rubbed his under lip with the feather of his quill.
 
 "Have you written to him?"
 
 "Yes, four times."
 
 "You have not dismissed him, then.  Once would have done that."
 
 "No," said Catherine; "I have asked him--asked him to wait."
 
 Her father sat looking at her, and she was afraid he was going to
 break out into wrath; his eyes were so fine and cold.
 
 "You are a dear, faithful child," he said at last.  "Come here to
 your father."  And he got up, holding out his hands toward her.
 
 The words were a surprise, and they gave her an exquisite joy.  She
 went to him, and he put his arm round her tenderly, soothingly; and
 then he kissed her.  After this he said:
 
 "Do you wish to make me very happy?"
 
 "I should like to--but I am afraid I can't," Catherine answered.
 
 "You can if you will.  It all depends on your will."
 
 "Is it to give him up?" said Catherine.
 
 "Yes, it is to give him up."
 
 And he held her still, with the same tenderness, looking into her
 face and resting his eyes on her averted eyes.  There was a long
 silence; she wished he would release her.
 
 "You are happier than I, father," she said, at last.
 
 "I have no doubt you are unhappy just now.  But it is better to be
--**--**--
 perception of poor Morris's character.  But the means of effecting
 such a change were at present shrouded in mystery, and she felt
 miserably helpless and hopeless.  She had exhausted all arguments,
 all replies.  Her father might have pitied her, and in fact he did
 so; but he was sure he was right.
 
 "There is one thing you can tell Mr. Townsend when you see him
 again," he said:  "that if you marry without my consent, I don't
 leave you a farthing of money.  That will interest him more than
 anything else you can tell him."
 
 "That would be very right," Catherine answered.  "I ought not in that
 case to have a farthing of your money."
 
 "My dear child," the Doctor observed, laughing, "your simplicity is
 touching.  Make that remark, in that tone, and with that expression
 of countenance, to Mr. Townsend, and take a note of his answer.  It
 won't be polite--it will, express irritation; and I shall be glad of
 that, as it will put me in the right; unless, indeed--which is
 perfectly possible--you should like him the better for being rude to
 you."
 
 "He will never be rude to me," said Catherine gently.
 
 "Tell him what I say, all the same."
 
 She looked at her father, and her quiet eyes filled with tears.
 
 "I think I will see him, then," she murmured, in her timid voice.
 
 "Exactly as you choose!"  And he went to the door and opened it for
 her to go out.  The movement gave her a terrible sense of his turning
 her off.
 
 "It will be only once, for the present," she added, lingering a
 moment.
 
 "Exactly as you choose," he repeated, standing there with his hand on
 the door.  "I have told you what I think.  If you see him, you will
 be an ungrateful, cruel child; you will have given your old father
--**--**--
 merit was at her command, and repaired to Catherine's room, where the
 poor girl was closeted.  She knew all about her dreadful night, for
 the two had met again, the evening before, after Catherine left her
 father.  Mrs. Penniman was on the landing of the second floor when
 her niece came upstairs.  It was not remarkable that a person of so
 much subtlety should have discovered that Catherine had been shut up
 with the Doctor.  It was still less remarkable that she should have
 felt an extreme curiosity to learn the result of this interview, and
 that this sentiment, combined with her great amiability and
 generosity, should have prompted her to regret the sharp words lately
 exchanged between her niece and herself.  As the unhappy girl came
 into sight, in the dusky corridor, she made a lively demonstration of
 sympathy.  Catherine's bursting heart was equally oblivious.  She
 only knew that her aunt was taking her into her arms.  Mrs. Penniman
 drew her into Catherine's own room, and the two women sat there
 together, far into the small hours; the younger one with her head on
 the other's lap, sobbing and sobbing at first in a soundless, stifled
 manner, and then at last perfectly still.  It gratified Mrs. Penniman
 to be able to feel conscientiously that this scene virtually removed
 the interdict which Catherine had placed upon her further communion
 with Morris Townsend.  She was not gratified, however, when, in
 coming back to her niece's room before breakfast, she found that
 Catherine had risen and was preparing herself for this meal.
 
 "You should not go to breakfast," she said; "you are not well enough,
 after your fearful night."
 
 "Yes, I am very well, and I am only afraid of being late."
 
 "I can't understand you!" Mrs. Penniman cried.  "You should stay in
--**--**--
 
 CHAPTER XX
 
 
 
 On the morrow, in the afternoon, she heard his voice at the door, and
 his step in the hall.  She received him in the big, bright front
 parlour, and she instructed the servant that if any one should call
 she was particularly engaged.  She was not afraid of her father's
 coming in, for at that hour he was always driving about town.  When
 Morris stood there before her, the first thing that she was conscious
 of was that he was even more beautiful to look at than fond
 recollection had painted him; the next was that he had pressed her in
 his arms.  When she was free again it appeared to her that she had
 now indeed thrown herself into the gulf of defiance, and even, for an
 instant, that she had been married to him.
 
 He told her that she had been very cruel, and had made him very
 unhappy; and Catherine felt acutely the difficulty of her destiny,
 which forced her to give pain in such opposite quarters.  But she
 wished that, instead of reproaches, however tender, he would give her
 help; he was certainly wise enough, and clever enough, to invent some
 issue from their troubles.  She expressed this belief, and Morris
 received the assurance as if he thought it natural; but he
 interrogated, at first--as was natural too--rather than committed
 himself to marking out a course.
 
 "You should not have made me wait so long," he said.  "I don't know
 how I have been living; every hour seemed like years.  You should
 have decided sooner."
 
 "Decided?" Catherine asked.
 
 "Decided whether you would keep me or give me up."
 
 "Oh, Morris," she cried, with a long tender murmur, "I never thought
 of giving you up!"
 
 "What, then, were you waiting for?"  The young man was ardently
--**--**--
 "Then you don't love me--not as I love you.  If you fear your father
 more than you love me, then your love is not what I hoped it was."
 
 "Ah, my friend!" she said, going to him.
 
 "Do _I_ fear anything?" he demanded, turning round on her.  "For your
 sake what am I not ready to face?"
 
 "You are noble--you are brave!" she answered, stopping short at a
 distance that was almost respectful.
 
 "Small good it does me, if you are so timid."
 
 "I don't think that I am--REALLY," said Catherine.
 
 "I don't know what you mean by 'really.'  It is really enough to make
 us miserable."
 
 "I should be strong enough to wait--to wait a long time."
 
 "And suppose after a long time your father should hate me worse than
 ever?"
 
 "He wouldn't--he couldn't!"
 
 "He would be touched by my fidelity?  Is that what you mean?  If he
 is so easily touched, then why should you be afraid of him?"
 
 This was much to the point, and Catherine was struck by it.  "I will
 try not to be," she said.  And she stood there submissively, the
 image, in advance, of a dutiful and responsible wife.  This image
 could not fail to recommend itself to Morris Townsend, and he
 continued to give proof of the high estimation in which he held her.
 It could only have been at the prompting of such a sentiment that he
 presently mentioned to her that the course recommended by Mrs.
 Penniman was an immediate union, regardless of consequences.
 
 "Yes, Aunt Penniman would like that," Catherine said simply--and yet
 with a certain shrewdness.  It must, however, have been in pure
 simplicity, and from motives quite untouched by sarcasm, that, a few
 moments after, she went on to say to Morris that her father had given
--**--**--
 
 
 
 Dr. Sloper very soon imparted his conviction to Mrs. Almond, in the
 same terms in which he had announced it to himself.  "She's going to
 stick, by Jove! she's going to stick."
 
 "Do you mean that she is going to marry him?" Mrs. Almond inquired.
 
 "I don't know that; but she is not going to break down.  She is going
 to drag out the engagement, in the hope of making me relent."
 
 "And shall you not relent?"
 
 "Shall a geometrical proposition relent?  I am not so superficial."
 
 "Doesn't geometry treat of surfaces?" asked Mrs. Almond, who, as we
 know, was clever, smiling.
 
 "Yes; but it treats of them profoundly.  Catherine and her young man
 are my surfaces; I have taken their measure."
 
 "You speak as if it surprised you."
 
 "It is immense; there will be a great deal to observe."
 
 "You are shockingly cold-blooded!" said Mrs. Almond.
 
 "I need to be with all this hot blood about me.  Young Townsend
 indeed is cool; I must allow him that merit."
 
 "I can't judge him," Mrs. Almond answered; "but I am not at all
 surprised at Catherine."
 
 "I confess I am a little; she must have been so deucedly divided and
 bothered."
 
 "Say it amuses you outright!  I don't see why it should be such a
 joke that your daughter adores you."
 
 "It is the point where the adoration stops that I find it interesting
 to fix."
 
 "It stops where the other sentiment begins."
 
 "Not at all--that would be simple enough.  The two things are
 extremely mixed up, and the mixture is extremely odd.  It will
 produce some third element, and that's what I am waiting to see.  I
 wait with suspense--with positive excitement; and that is a sort of
 emotion that I didn't suppose Catherine would ever provide for me.  I
--**--**--
 "But you make your brother out a regular Turk."
 
 Mrs. Penniman hesitated a little.
 
 "I certainly do not regard Austin as a satisfactory Christian."
 
 "And am I to wait till he is converted?"
 
 "Wait, at any rate, till he is less violent.  Bide your time, Mr.
 Townsend; remember the prize is great!"
 
 Morris walked along some time in silence, tapping the railings and
 gateposts very sharply with his stick.
 
 "You certainly are devilish inconsistent!" he broke out at last.  "I
 have already got Catherine to consent to a private marriage."
 
 Mrs. Penniman was indeed inconsistent, for at this news she gave a
 little jump of gratification.
 
 "Oh! when and where?" she cried.  And then she stopped short.
 
 Morris was a little vague about this.
 
 "That isn't fixed; but she consents.  It's deuced awkward, now, to
 back out."
 
 Mrs. Penniman, as I say, had stopped short; and she stood there with
 her eyes fixed brilliantly on her companion.
 
 "Mr. Townsend," she proceeded, "shall I tell you something?
 Catherine loves you so much that you may do anything."
 
 This declaration was slightly ambiguous, and Morris opened his eyes.
 
 "I am happy to hear it!  But what do you mean by 'anything'?"
 
 "You may postpone--you may change about; she won't think the worse of
 you."
 
 Morris stood there still, with his raised eyebrows; then he said
 simply and rather dryly--"Ah!"  After this he remarked to Mrs.
 Penniman that if she walked so slowly she would attract notice, and
 he succeeded, after a fashion, in hurrying her back to the domicile
 of which her tenure had become so insecure.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXII
 
 
 
 He had slightly misrepresented the matter in saying that Catherine
 had consented to take the great step.  We left her just now declaring
 that she would burn her ships behind her; but Morris, after having
--**--**--
 natural way to work it out was by marrying Catherine; but in
 mathematics there are many short cuts, and Morris was not without a
 hope that he should yet discover one.  When Catherine took him at his
 word and consented to renounce the attempt to mollify her father, he
 drew back skilfully enough, as I have said, and kept the wedding-day
 still an open question.  Her faith in his sincerity was so complete
 that she was incapable of suspecting that he was playing with her;
 her trouble just now was of another kind.  The poor girl had an
 admirable sense of honour; and from the moment she had brought
 herself to the point of violating her father's wish, it seemed to her
 that she had no right to enjoy his protection.  It was on her
 conscience that she ought to live under his roof only so long as she
 conformed to his wisdom.  There was a great deal of glory in such a
 position, but poor Catherine felt that she had forfeited her claim to
 it.  She had cast her lot with a young man against whom he had
 solemnly warned her, and broken the contract under which he provided
 her with a happy home.  She could not give up the young man, so she
 must leave the home; and the sooner the object of her preference
 offered her another the sooner her situation would lose its awkward
 twist.  This was close reasoning; but it was commingled with an
 infinite amount of merely instinctive penitence.  Catherine's days at
 this time were dismal, and the weight of some of her hours was almost
 more than she could bear.  Her father never looked at her, never
 spoke to her.  He knew perfectly what he was about, and this was part
 of a plan.  She looked at him as much as she dared (for she was
--**--**--
 
 "If that's your theory, it's certainly mine," said the Doctor, with a
 dry laugh.
 
 "But if I don't obey you, I ought not to live with you--to enjoy your
 kindness and protection."
 
 This striking argument gave the Doctor a sudden sense of having
 underestimated his daughter; it seemed even more than worthy of a
 young woman who had revealed the quality of unaggressive obstinacy.
 But it displeased him--displeased him deeply, and he signified as
 much.  "That idea is in very bad taste," he said.  "Did you get it
 from Mr. Townsend?"
 
 "Oh no; it's my own!" said Catherine eagerly.
 
 "Keep it to yourself, then," her father answered, more than ever
 determined she should go to Europe.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXIII
 
 
 
 If Morris Townsend was not to be included in this journey, no more
 was Mrs. Penniman, who would have been thankful for an invitation,
 but who (to do her justice) bore her disappointment in a perfectly
 ladylike manner.  "I should enjoy seeing the works of Raphael and the
 ruins--the ruins of the Pantheon," she said to Mrs. Almond; "but, on
 the other hand, I shall not be sorry to be alone and at peace for the
 next few months in Washington Square.  I want rest; I have been
 through so much in the last four months."  Mrs. Almond thought it
 rather cruel that her brother should not take poor Lavinia abroad;
 but she easily understood that, if the purpose of his expedition was
 to make Catherine forget her lover, it was not in his interest to
 give his daughter this young man's best friend as a companion.  "If
 Lavinia had not been so foolish, she might visit the ruins of the
 Pantheon," she said to herself; and she continued to regret her
 sister's folly, even though the latter assured her that she had often
--**--**--
 "He thinks I will forget you," said Catherine:  "that all these
 things will drive you out of my mind."
 
 "Well, my dear, perhaps they will!"
 
 "Please don't say that," Catherine answered gently, as they walked
 along.  "Poor father will be disappointed."
 
 Morris gave a little laugh.  "Yes, I verily believe that your poor
 father will be disappointed!  But you will have seen Europe," he
 added humorously.  "What a take-in!"
 
 "I don't care for seeing Europe," Catherine said.
 
 "You ought to care, my dear.  And it may mollify your father."
 
 Catherine, conscious of her obstinacy, expected little of this, and
 could not rid herself of the idea that in going abroad and yet
 remaining firm, she should play her father a trick.  "Don't you think
 it would be a kind of deception?" she asked.
 
 "Doesn't he want to deceive you?" cried Morris.  "It will serve him
 right!  I really think you had better go."
 
 "And not be married for so long?"
 
 "Be married when you come back.  You can buy your wedding clothes in
 Paris."  And then Morris, with great kindness of tone, explained his
 view of the matter.  It would be a good thing that she should go; it
 would put them completely in the right.  It would show they were
 reasonable and willing to wait.  Once they were so sure of each
 other, they could afford to wait--what had they to fear?  If there
 was a particle of chance that her father would be favourably affected
 by her going, that ought to settle it; for, after all, Morris was
 very unwilling to be the cause of her being disinherited.  It was not
 for himself, it was for her and for her children.  He was willing to
 wait for her; it would be hard, but he could do it.  And over there,
--**--**--
 not presuming to examine this analogy.
 
 "It is my pride that keeps me up," said Mrs. Penniman, tapping the
 body of her dress, which always gave forth a sort of metallic ring.
 
 Catherine's parting with her lover was short, and few words were
 exchanged.
 
 "Shall I find you just the same when I come back?" she asked; though
 the question was not the fruit of scepticism.
 
 "The same--only more so!" said Morris, smiling.
 
 It does not enter into our scheme to narrate in detail Dr. Sloper's
 proceedings in the eastern hemisphere.  He made the grand tour of
 Europe, travelled in considerable splendour, and (as was to have been
 expected in a man of his high cultivation) found so much in art and
 antiquity to interest him, that he remained abroad, not for six
 months, but for twelve.  Mrs. Penniman, in Washington Square,
 accommodated herself to his absence.  She enjoyed her uncontested
 dominion in the empty house, and flattered herself that she made it
 more attractive to their friends than when her brother was at home.
 To Morris Townsend, at least, it would have appeared that she made it
 singularly attractive.  He was altogether her most frequent visitor,
 and Mrs. Penniman was very fond of asking him to tea.  He had his
 chair--a very easy one at the fireside in the back parlour (when the
 great mahogany sliding-doors, with silver knobs and hinges, which
 divided this apartment from its more formal neighbour, were closed),
 and he used to smoke cigars in the Doctor's study, where he often
 spent an hour in turning over the curious collections of its absent
 proprietor.  He thought Mrs. Penniman a goose, as we know; but he was
 no goose himself, and, as a young man of luxurious tastes and scanty
 resources, he found the house a perfect castle of indolence.  It
--**--**--
 way again.  She read her lover's letters in secret.
 
 One day at the end of the summer, the two travellers found themselves
 in a lonely valley of the Alps.  They were crossing one of the
 passes, and on the long ascent they had got out of the carriage and
 had wandered much in advance.  After a while the Doctor descried a
 footpath which, leading through a transverse valley, would bring them
 out, as he justly supposed, at a much higher point of the ascent.
 They followed this devious way, and finally lost the path; the valley
 proved very wild and rough, and their walk became rather a scramble.
 They were good walkers, however, and they took their adventure
 easily; from time to time they stopped, that Catherine might rest;
 and then she sat upon a stone and looked about her at the hard-
 featured rocks and the glowing sky.  It was late in the afternoon, in
 the last of August; night was coming on, and, as they had reached a
 great elevation, the air was cold and sharp.  In the west there was a
 great suffusion of cold, red light, which made the sides of the
 little valley look only the more rugged and dusky.  During one of
 their pauses, her father left her and wandered away to some high
 place, at a distance, to get a view.  He was out of sight; she sat
 there alone, in the stillness, which was just touched by the vague
 murmur, somewhere, of a mountain brook.  She thought of Morris
 Townsend, and the place was so desolate and lonely that he seemed
 very far away.  Her father remained absent a long time; she began to
 wonder what had become of him.  But at last he reappeared, coming
 towards her in the clear twilight, and she got up, to go on.  He made
--**--**--
 did, the place was well chosen; this hard, melancholy dell, abandoned
 by the summer light, made her feel her loneliness.  She looked around
 her, and her heart grew cold; for a moment her fear was great.  But
 she could think of nothing to say, save to murmur gently, "I am
 sorry."
 
 "You try my patience," her father went on, "and you ought to know
 what I am, I am not a very good man.  Though I am very smooth
 externally, at bottom I am very passionate; and I assure you I can be
 very hard."
 
 She could not think why he told her these things.  Had he brought her
 there on purpose, and was it part of a plan?  What was the plan?
 Catherine asked herself.  Was it to startle her suddenly into a
 retractation--to take an advantage of her by dread?  Dread of what?
 The place was ugly and lonely, but the place could do her no harm.
 There was a kind of still intensity about her father, which made him
 dangerous, but Catherine hardly went so far as to say to herself that
 it might be part of his plan to fasten his hand--the neat, fine,
 supple hand of a distinguished physician--in her throat.
 Nevertheless, she receded a step.  "I am sure you can be anything you
 please," she said.  And it was her simple belief.
 
 "I am very angry," he replied, more sharply.
 
 "Why has it taken you so suddenly?"
 
 "It has not taken me suddenly.  I have been raging inwardly for the
 last six months.  But just now this seemed a good place to flare out.
 It's so quiet, and we are alone."
 
 "Yes, it's very quiet," said Catherine vaguely, looking about her.
 "Won't you come back to the carriage?"
 
 "In a moment.  Do you mean that in all this time you have not yielded
--**--**--
 think him less complete.  Such a saying as that was a part of his
 great subtlety--men so clever as he might say anything and mean
 anything.  And as to his being hard, that surely, in a man, was a
 virtue.
 
 He let her alone for six months more--six months during which she
 accommodated herself without a protest to the extension of their
 tour.  But he spoke again at the end of this time; it was at the very
 last, the night before they embarked for New York, in the hotel at
 Liverpool.  They had been dining together in a great dim, musty
 sitting-room; and then the cloth had been removed, and the Doctor
 walked slowly up and down.  Catherine at last took her candle to go
 to bed, but her father motioned her to stay.
 
 "What do you mean to do when you get home?" he asked, while she stood
 there with her candle in her hand.
 
 "Do you mean about Mr. Townsend?"
 
 "About Mr. Townsend."
 
 "We shall probably marry."
 
 The Doctor took several turns again while she waited.  "Do you hear
 from him as much as ever?"
 
 "Yes; twice a month," said Catherine promptly.
 
 "And does he always talk about marriage?"
 
 "Oh yes!  That is, he talks about other things too, but he always
 says something about that."
 
 "I am glad to hear he varies his subjects; his letters might
 otherwise be monotonous."
 
 "He writes beautifully," said Catherine, who was very glad of a
 chance to say it.
 
 "They always write beautifully.  However, in a given case that
 doesn't diminish the merit.  So, as soon as you arrive, you are going
 off with him?"
 
 This seemed a rather gross way of putting it, and something that
 there was of dignity in Catherine resented it.  "I cannot tell you
--**--**--
 and energy, and just as true!"
 
 Catherine listened with a mixture of interest and apprehension.  Aunt
 Lavinia was intensely sympathetic, and Catherine, for the past year,
 while she wandered through foreign galleries and churches, and rolled
 over the smoothness of posting roads, nursing the thoughts that never
 passed her lips, had often longed for the company of some intelligent
 person of her own sex.  To tell her story to some kind woman--at
 moments it seemed to her that this would give her comfort, and she
 had more than once been on the point of taking the landlady, or the
 nice young person from the dressmaker's, into her confidence.  If a
 woman had been near her she would on certain occasions have treated
 such a companion to a fit of weeping; and she had an apprehension
 that, on her return, this would form her response to Aunt Lavinia's
 first embrace.  In fact, however, the two ladies had met, in
 Washington Square, without tears, and when they found themselves
 alone together a certain dryness fell upon the girl's emotion.  It
 came over her with a greater force that Mrs. Penniman had enjoyed a
 whole year of her lover's society, and it was not a pleasure to her
 to hear her aunt explain and interpret the young man, speaking of him
 as if her own knowledge of him were supreme.  It was not that
 Catherine was jealous; but her sense of Mrs. Penniman's innocent
 falsity, which had lain dormant, began to haunt her again, and she
 was glad that she was safely at home.  With this, however, it was a
 blessing to be able to talk of Morris, to sound his name, to be with
 a person who was not unjust to him.
 
 "You have been very kind to him," said Catherine.  "He has written me
--**--**--
 "What little project?"
 
 "Morris told me all about it.  The idea of turning the tables on him,
 in Europe; of watching him, when he was agreeably impressed by some
 celebrated sight--he pretends to be so artistic, you know--and then
 just pleading with him and bringing him round."
 
 "I never tried it.  It was Morris's idea; but if he had been with us,
 in Europe, he would have seen that father was never impressed in that
 way.  He IS artistic--tremendously artistic; but the more celebrated
 places we visited, and the more he admired them, the less use it
 would have been to plead with him.  They seemed only to make him more
 determined--more terrible," said poor Catherine.  "I shall never
 bring him round, and I expect nothing now."
 
 "Well, I must say," Mrs. Penniman answered, "I never supposed you
 were going to give it up."
 
 "I have given it up.  I don't care now."
 
 "You have grown very brave," said Mrs. Penniman, with a short laugh.
 "I didn't advise you to sacrifice your property."
 
 "Yes, I am braver than I was.  You asked me if I had changed; I have
 changed in that way.  Oh," the girl went on, "I have changed very
 much.  And it isn't my property.  If HE doesn't care for it, why
 should I?"
 
 Mrs. Penniman hesitated.  "Perhaps he does care for it."
 
 "He cares for it for my sake, because he doesn't want to injure me.
 But he will know--he knows already--how little he need be afraid
 about that.  Besides," said Catherine, "I have got plenty of money of
 my own.  We shall be very well off; and now hasn't he got his
 business?  I am delighted about that business."  She went on talking,
 showing a good deal of excitement as she proceeded.  Her aunt had
--**--**--
 and resolution left her nothing to reply.  She was easily frightened,
 and she always carried off her discomfiture by a concession; a
 concession which was often accompanied, as in the present case, by a
 little nervous laugh.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXVI
 
 
 
 If she had disturbed her niece's temper--she began from this moment
 forward to talk a good deal about Catherine's temper, an article
 which up to that time had never been mentioned in connexion with our
 heroine--Catherine had opportunity, on the morrow, to recover her
 serenity.  Mrs. Penniman had given her a message from Morris
 Townsend, to the effect that he would come and welcome her home on
 the day after her arrival.  He came in the afternoon; but, as may be
 imagined, he was not on this occasion made free of Dr. Sloper's
 study.  He had been coming and going, for the past year, so
 comfortably and irresponsibly, that he had a certain sense of being
 wronged by finding himself reminded that he must now limit his
 horizon to the front parlour, which was Catherine's particular
 province.
 
 "I am very glad you have come back," he said; "it makes me very happy
 to see you again."  And he looked at her, smiling, from head to foot;
 though it did not appear, afterwards, that he agreed with Mrs.
 Penniman (who, womanlike, went more into details) in thinking her
 embellished.
 
 To Catherine he appeared resplendent; it was some time before she
 could believe again that this beautiful young man was her own
 exclusive property.  They had a great deal of characteristic lovers'
 talk--a soft exchange of inquiries and assurances.  In these matters
 Morris had an excellent grace, which flung a picturesque interest
 even over the account of his debut in the commission business--a
 subject as to which his companion earnestly questioned him.  From
--**--**--
 "Of course, I am not beaten on the main issue; but I am, don't you
 see, on all the rest of it--on the question of my reputation, of my
 relations with your father, of my relations with my own children, if
 we should have any."
 
 "We shall have enough for our children--we shall have enough for
 everything.  Don't you expect to succeed in business?"
 
 "Brilliantly, and we shall certainly be very comfortable.  But it
 isn't of the mere material comfort I speak; it is of the moral
 comfort," said Morris--"of the intellectual satisfaction!"
 
 "I have great moral comfort now," Catherine declared, very simply.
 
 "Of course you have.  But with me it is different.  I have staked my
 pride on proving to your father that he is wrong; and now that I am
 at the head of a flourishing business, I can deal with him as an
 equal.  I have a capital plan--do let me go at him!"
 
 He stood before her with his bright face, his jaunty air, his hands
 in his pockets; and she got up, with her eyes resting on his own.
 "Please don't, Morris; please don't," she said; and there was a
 certain mild, sad firmness in her tone which he heard for the first
 time.  "We must ask no favours of him--we must ask nothing more.  He
 won't relent, and nothing good will come of it.  I know it now--I
 have a very good reason."
 
 "And pray; what is your reason?"
 
 She hesitated to bring it out, but at last it came.  "He is not very
 fond of me!"
 
 "Oh, bother!" cried Morris angrily.
 
 "I wouldn't say such a thing without being sure.  I saw it, I felt
 it, in England, just before he came away.  He talked to me one night-
 -the last night; and then it came over me.  You can tell when a
--**--**--
 
 "He will hang on long enough to make you very uncomfortable, then."
 
 "My dear Lavinia," exclaimed the Doctor, "do you call that irony?  I
 call it pugilism."
 
 Mrs. Penniman, however, in spite of her pugilism, was a good deal
 frightened, and she took counsel of her fears.  Her brother meanwhile
 took counsel, with many reservations, of Mrs. Almond, to whom he was
 no less generous than to Lavinia, and a good deal more communicative.
 
 "I suppose she has had him there all the while," he said.  "I must
 look into the state of my wine!  You needn't mind telling me now; I
 have already said all I mean to say to her on the subject."
 
 "I believe he was in the house a good deal," Mrs. Almond answered.
 "But you must admit that your leaving Lavinia quite alone was a great
 change for her, and that it was natural she should want some
 society."
 
 "I do admit that, and that is why I shall make no row about the wine;
 I shall set it down as compensation to Lavinia.  She is capable of
 telling me that she drank it all herself.  Think of the inconceivable
 bad taste, in the circumstances, of that fellow making free with the
 house--or coming there at all!  If that doesn't describe him, he is
 indescribable."
 
 "His plan is to get what he can.  Lavinia will have supported him for
 a year," said Mrs. Almond.  "It's so much gained."
 
 "She will have to support him for the rest of his life, then!" cried
 the Doctor.  "But without wine, as they say at the tables d'hote."
 
 "Catherine tells me he has set up a business, and is making a great
 deal of money."
 
 The Doctor stared.  "She has not told me that--and Lavinia didn't
 deign.  Ah!" he cried, "Catherine has given me up.  Not that it
--**--**--
 that Catherine would supply him with all the information he needed on
 this point; but we know that Mrs. Penniman's reflexions were rarely
 just; and, moreover, she felt that it was not for her to depend on
 what Catherine might do.  She was to do her duty, quite irrespective
 of Catherine.  I have said that her young friend took his ease with
 her, and it is an illustration of the fact that he made no answer to
 her letter.  He took note of it, amply; but he lighted his cigar with
 it, and he waited, in tranquil confidence that he should receive
 another.  "His state of mind really freezes my blood," Mrs. Penniman
 had written, alluding to her brother; and it would have seemed that
 upon this statement she could hardly improve.  Nevertheless, she
 wrote again, expressing herself with the aid of a different figure.
 "His hatred of you burns with a lurid flame--the flame that never
 dies," she wrote.  "But it doesn't light up the darkness of your
 future.  If my affection could do so, all the years of your life
 would be an eternal sunshine.  I can extract nothing from C.; she is
 so terribly secretive, like her father.  She seems to expect to be
 married very soon, and has evidently made preparations in Europe--
 quantities of clothing, ten pairs of shoes, etc.  My dear friend, you
 cannot set up in married life simply with a few pairs of shoes, can
 you?  Tell me what you think of this.  I am intensely anxious to see
 you; I have so much to say.  I miss you dreadfully; the house seems
 so empty without you.  What is the news down town?  Is the business
 extending?  That dear little business--I think it's so brave of you!
 Couldn't I come to your office?--just for three minutes?  I might
--**--**--
 between them as in the form that Morris had just given it, had
 nevertheless been implied so often, in certain easy intervals of
 talk, as he sat stretching his legs in the Doctor's well-stuffed
 armchairs, that she had grown first to regard it with an emotion
 which she flattered herself was philosophic, and then to have a
 secret tenderness for it.  The fact that she kept her tenderness
 secret proves, of course, that she was ashamed of it; but she managed
 to blink her shame by reminding herself that she was, after all, the
 official protector of her niece's marriage.  Her logic would scarcely
 have passed muster with the Doctor.  In the first place, Morris MUST
 get the money, and she would help him to it.  In the second, it was
 plain it would never come to him, and it would be a grievous pity he
 should marry without it--a young man who might so easily find
 something better.  After her brother had delivered himself, on his
 return from Europe, of that incisive little address that has been
 quoted, Morris's cause seemed so hopeless that Mrs. Penniman fixed
 her attention exclusively upon the latter branch of her argument.  If
 Morris had been her son, she would certainly have sacrificed
 Catherine to a superior conception of his future; and to be ready to
 do so as the case stood was therefore even a finer degree of
 devotion.  Nevertheless, it checked her breath a little to have the
 sacrificial knife, as it were, suddenly thrust into her hand.
 
 Morris walked along a moment, and then he repeated harshly:  "I must
 give her up!"
 
 "I think I understand you," said Mrs. Penniman gently.
 
 "I certainly say it distinctly enough--brutally and vulgarly enough."
 
 He was ashamed of himself, and his shame was uncomfortable; and as he
--**--**--
 
 "Should you like me to tell her?" she asked.  "You mustn't tell her,
 but you can--you can--"  And he hesitated, trying to think what Mrs.
 Penniman could do.  "You can explain to her why it is.  It's because
 I can't bring myself to step in between her and her father--to give
 him the pretext he grasps at--so eagerly (it's a hideous sight) for
 depriving her of her rights."
 
 Mrs. Penniman felt with remarkable promptitude the charm of this
 formula.
 
 "That's so like you," she said; "it's so finely felt."
 
 Morris gave his stick an angry swing.
 
 "Oh, botheration!" he exclaimed perversely.
 
 Mrs. Penniman, however, was not discouraged.
 
 "It may turn out better than you think.  Catherine is, after all, so
 very peculiar."  And she thought she might take it upon herself to
 assure him that, whatever happened, the girl would be very quiet--she
 wouldn't make a noise.  They extended their walk, and, while they
 proceeded, Mrs. Penniman took upon herself other things besides, and
 ended by having assumed a considerable burden; Morris being ready
 enough, as may be imagined, to put everything off upon her.  But he
 was not for a single instant the dupe of her blundering alacrity; he
 knew that of what she promised she was competent to perform but an
 insignificant fraction, and the more she professed her willingness to
 serve him, the greater fool he thought her.
 
 "What will you do if you don't marry her?" she ventured to inquire in
 the course of this conversation.
 
 "Something brilliant," said Morris.  "Shouldn't you like me to do
 something brilliant?"
 
 The idea gave Mrs. Penniman exceeding pleasure.
 
 "I shall feel sadly taken in if you don't."
 
 "I shall have to, to make up for this.  This isn't at all brilliant,
 you know."
 
 Mrs. Penniman mused a little, as if there might be some way of making
--**--**--
 pave the path of retreat with flowers.  It was devilish awkward, as
 he said, and he felt a lively animosity for Catherine's aunt, who, as
 he had now quite formed the habit of saying to himself, had dragged
 him into the mess and was bound in common charity to get him out of
 it.  Mrs. Penniman, to tell the truth, had, in the seclusion of her
 own apartment--and, I may add, amid the suggestiveness of
 Catherine's, which wore in those days the appearance of that of a
 young lady laying out her trousseau--Mrs. Penniman had measured her
 responsibilities, and taken fright at their magnitude.  The task of
 preparing Catherine and easing off Morris presented difficulties
 which increased in the execution, and even led the impulsive Lavinia
 to ask herself whether the modification of the young man's original
 project had been conceived in a happy spirit.  A brilliant future, a
 wider career, a conscience exempt from the reproach of interference
 between a young lady and her natural rights--these excellent things
 might be too troublesomely purchased.  From Catherine herself Mrs.
 Penniman received no assistance whatever; the poor girl was
 apparently without suspicion of her danger.  She looked at her lover
 with eyes of undiminished trust, and though she had less confidence
 in her aunt than in a young man with whom she had exchanged so many
 tender vows, she gave her no handle for explaining or confessing.
 Mrs. Penniman, faltering and wavering, declared Catherine was very
 stupid, put off the great scene, as she would have called it, from
 day to day, and wandered about very uncomfortably, primed, to
 repletion, with her apology, but unable to bring it to the light.
 Morris's own scenes were very small ones just now; but even these
 were beyond his strength.  He made his visits as brief as possible,
--**--**--
 She was on the point of asking him whether it were not a compensation
 for this annoyance that the poor girl who had the misfortune to bring
 it upon him, loved him so dearly and believed in him so truly; but
 she hesitated, thinking that this would perhaps seem an exacting
 speech, and while she hesitated, he suddenly left her.
 
 The next time he came, however, she brought it out, and she told him
 again that he was too proud.  He repeated that he couldn't change,
 and this time she felt the impulse to say that with a little effort
 he might change.
 
 Sometimes he thought that if he could only make a quarrel with her it
 might help him; but the question was how to quarrel with a young
 woman who had such treasures of concession.  "I suppose you think the
 effort is all on your side!" he was reduced to exclaiming.  "Don't
 you believe that I have my own effort to make?"
 
 "It's all yours now," she said.  "My effort is finished and done
 with!"
 
 "Well, mine is not."
 
 "We must bear things together," said Catherine.  "That's what we
 ought to do."
 
 Morris attempted a natural smile.  "There are some things which we
 can't very well bear together--for instance, separation."
 
 "Why do you speak of separation?"
 
 "Ah! you don't like it; I knew you wouldn't!"
 
 "Where are you going, Morris?" she suddenly asked.
 
 He fixed his eye on her for a moment, and for a part of that moment
 she was afraid of it.  "Will you promise not to make a scene?"
 
 "A scene!--do I make scenes?"
 
 "All women do!" said Morris, with the tone of large experience.
 
 "I don't.  Where are you going?"
 
 "If I should say I was going away on business, should you think it
--**--**--
 about it any more.  I will transact my business by letter."  And he
 began to smooth his hat, as if to take leave.
 
 "You won't go?"  And she stood looking up at him.
 
 He could not give up his idea of provoking a quarrel; it was so much
 the simplest way!  He bent his eyes on her upturned face, with the
 darkest frown he could achieve.  "You are not discreet.  You mustn't
 bully me!"
 
 But, as usual, she conceded everything.  "No, I am not discreet; I
 know I am too pressing.  But isn't it natural?  It is only for a
 moment."
 
 "In a moment you may do a great deal of harm.  Try and be calmer the
 next time I come."
 
 "When will you come?"
 
 "Do you want to make conditions?" Morris asked.  "I will come next
 Saturday."
 
 "Come to-morrow," Catherine begged; "I want you to come to-morrow.  I
 will be very quiet," she added; and her agitation had by this time
 become so great that the assurance was not becoming.  A sudden fear
 had come over her; it was like the solid conjunction of a dozen
 disembodied doubts, and her imagination, at a single bound, had
 traversed an enormous distance.  All her being, for the moment,
 centred in the wish to keep him in the room.
 
 Morris bent his head and kissed her forehead.  "When you are quiet,
 you are perfection," he said; "but when you are violent, you are not
 in character."
 
 It was Catherine's wish that there should be no violence about her
 save the beating of her heart, which she could not help; and she went
 on, as gently as possible, "Will you promise to come to-morrow?"
 
 "I said Saturday!" Morris answered, smiling.  He tried a frown at one
 moment, a smile at another; he was at his wit's end.
--**--**--
 he was mistaken, she was jealous; people didn't change like that from
 one day to another.  Then she knew that she had had doubts before--
 strange suspicions, that were at once vague and acute--and that he
 had been different ever since her return from Europe:  whereupon she
 tried again to listen to her father, who told a story so remarkably
 well.  Afterwards she went straight to her own room; it was beyond
 her strength to undertake to spend the evening with her aunt.  All
 the evening, alone, she questioned herself.  Her trouble was
 terrible; but was it a thing of her imagination, engendered by an
 extravagant sensibility, or did it represent a clear-cut reality, and
 had the worst that was possible actually come to pass?  Mrs.
 Penniman, with a degree of tact that was as unusual as it was
 commendable, took the line of leaving her alone.  The truth is, that
 her suspicions having been aroused, she indulged a desire, natural to
 a timid person, that the explosion should be localised.  So long as
 the air still vibrated she kept out of the way.
 
 She passed and repassed Catherine's door several times in the course
 of the evening, as if she expected to hear a plaintive moan behind
 it.  But the room remained perfectly still; and accordingly, the last
 thing before retiring to her own couch, she applied for admittance.
 Catherine was sitting up, and had a book that she pretended to be
 reading.  She had no wish to go to bed, for she had no expectation of
 sleeping.  After Mrs. Penniman had left her she sat up half the
 night, and she offered her visitor no inducement to remain.  Her aunt
 came stealing in very gently, and approached her with great
 solemnity.
 
 "I am afraid you are in trouble, my dear.  Can I do anything to help
--**--**--
 she could take refuge from her excitement, which had now become
 intense, in her determination that her father should see nothing of
 it.  How well she deceived her father we shall have occasion to
 learn; but her innocent arts were of little avail before a person of
 the rare perspicacity of Mrs. Penniman.  This lady easily saw that
 she was agitated, and if there was any agitation going forward, Mrs.
 Penniman was not a person to forfeit her natural share in it.  She
 returned to the charge the next evening, and requested her niece to
 lean upon her--to unburden her heart.  Perhaps she should be able to
 explain certain things that now seemed dark, and that she knew more
 about than Catherine supposed.  If Catherine had been frigid the
 night before, to-day she was haughty.
 
 "You are completely mistaken, and I have not the least idea what you
 mean.  I don't know what you are trying to fasten on me, and I have
 never had less need of any one's explanations in my life."
 
 In this way the girl delivered herself, and from hour to hour kept
 her aunt at bay.  From hour to hour Mrs. Penniman's curiosity grew.
 She would have given her little finger to know what Morris had said
 and done, what tone he had taken, what pretext he had found.  She
 wrote to him, naturally, to request an interview; but she received,
 as naturally, no answer to her petition.  Morris was not in a writing
 mood; for Catherine had addressed him two short notes which met with
 no acknowledgment.  These notes were so brief that I may give them
 entire.  "Won't you give me some sign that you didn't mean to be so
 cruel as you seemed on Tuesday?"--that was the first; the other was a
--**--**--
 door--she has burst upon him in his own apartment!"  It was in these
 terms that Mrs. Penniman depicted to herself her niece's errand,
 which, viewed in this light, gratified her sense of the picturesque
 only a shade less strongly than the idea of a clandestine marriage.
 To visit one's lover, with tears and reproaches, at his own
 residence, was an image so agreeable to Mrs. Penniman's mind that she
 felt a sort of aesthetic disappointment at its lacking, in this case,
 the harmonious accompaniments of darkness and storm.  A quiet Sunday
 afternoon appeared an inadequate setting for it; and, indeed, Mrs.
 Penniman was quite out of humour with the conditions of the time,
 which passed very slowly as she sat in the front parlour in her
 bonnet and her cashmere shawl, awaiting Catherine's return.
 
 This event at last took place.  She saw her--at the window--mount the
 steps, and she went to await her in the hall, where she pounced upon
 her as soon as she had entered the house, and drew her into the
 parlour, closing the door with solemnity.  Catherine was flushed, and
 her eye was bright.  Mrs. Penniman hardly knew what to think.
 
 "May I venture to ask where you have been?" she demanded.
 
 "I have been to take a walk," said Catherine.  "I thought you had
 gone to church."
 
 "I did go to church; but the service was shorter than usual.  And
 pray, where did you walk?"
 
 "I don't know!" said Catherine.
 
 "Your ignorance is most extraordinary!  Dear Catherine, you can trust
 me."
 
 "What am I to trust you with?"
 
 "With your secret--your sorrow."
 
 "I have no sorrow!" said Catherine fiercely.
 
 "My poor child," Mrs. Penniman insisted, "you can't deceive me.  I
 know everything.  I have been requested to--a--to converse with you."
 
 "I don't want to converse!"
--**--**--
 you went to see him this afternoon."
 
 Catherine flushed as if she had been struck.  "Yes, I did go to see
 him!  But that's my own business."
 
 "Very well, then; we won't talk about it."  And Mrs. Penniman moved
 towards the door again.  But she was stopped by a sudden imploring
 cry from the girl.
 
 "Aunt Lavinia, WHERE has he gone?"
 
 "Ah, you admit, then, that he has gone away?  Didn't they know at his
 house?"
 
 "They said he had left town.  I asked no more questions; I was
 ashamed," said Catherine, simply enough.
 
 "You needn't have taken so compromising a step if you had had a
 little more confidence in me," Mrs. Penniman observed, with a good
 deal of grandeur.
 
 "Is it to New Orleans?" Catherine went on irrelevantly.
 
 It was the first time Mrs. Penniman had heard of New Orleans in this
 connexion; but she was averse to letting Catherine know that she was
 in the dark.  She attempted to strike an illumination from the
 instructions she had received from Morris.  "My dear Catherine," she
 said, "when a separation has been agreed upon, the farther he goes
 away the better."
 
 "Agreed upon?  Has he agreed upon it with you?"  A consummate sense
 of her aunt's meddlesome folly had come over her during the last five
 minutes, and she was sickened at the thought that Mrs. Penniman had
 been let loose, as it were, upon her happiness.
 
 "He certainly has sometimes advised with me," said Mrs. Penniman.
 
 "Is it you, then, that have changed him and made him so unnatural?"
 Catherine cried.  "Is it you that have worked on him and taken him
 from me?  He doesn't belong to you, and I don't see how you have
 anything to do with what is between us!  Is it you that have made
--**--**--
 the room.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXXI
 
 
 
 Though she had forced herself to be calm, she preferred practising
 this virtue in private, and she forbore to show herself at tea--a
 repast which, on Sundays, at six o'clock, took the place of dinner.
 Dr. Sloper and his sister sat face to face, but Mrs. Penniman never
 met her brother's eye.  Late in the evening she went with him, but
 without Catherine, to their sister Almond's, where, between the two
 ladies, Catherine's unhappy situation was discussed with a frankness
 that was conditioned by a good deal of mysterious reticence on Mrs.
 Penniman's part.
 
 "I am delighted he is not to marry her," said Mrs. Almond, "but he
 ought to be horsewhipped all the same."
 
 Mrs. Penniman, who was shocked at her sister's coarseness, replied
 that he had been actuated by the noblest of motives--the desire not
 to impoverish Catherine.
 
 "I am very happy that Catherine is not to be impoverished--but I hope
 he may never have a penny too much!  And what does the poor girl say
 to YOU?" Mrs. Almond asked.
 
 "She says I have a genius for consolation," said Mrs. Penniman.
 
 This was the account of the matter that she gave to her sister, and
 it was perhaps with the consciousness of genius that, on her return
 that evening to Washington Square, she again presented herself for
 admittance at Catherine's door.  Catherine came and opened it; she
 was apparently very quiet.
 
 "I only want to give you a little word of advice," she said.  "If
 your father asks you, say that everything is going on."
 
 Catherine stood there, with her hand on the knob looking at her aunt,
 but not asking her to come in.  "Do you think he will ask me?"
 
 "I am sure he will.  He asked me just now, on our way home from your
--**--**--
 "I don't know what I have done," Catherine answered, with her eyes on
 her work.
 
 "You have apparently quite banished from your mind the request I made
 you at Liverpool, before we sailed; the request that you would notify
 me in advance before leaving my house."
 
 "I have not left your house!" said Catherine.
 
 "But you intend to leave it, and by what you gave me to understand,
 your departure must be impending.  In fact, though you are still here
 in body, you are already absent in spirit.  Your mind has taken up
 its residence with your prospective husband, and you might quite as
 well be lodged under the conjugal roof, for all the benefit we get
 from your society."
 
 "I will try and be more cheerful!" said Catherine.
 
 "You certainly ought to be cheerful, you ask a great deal if you are
 not.  To the pleasure of marrying a brilliant young man, you add that
 of having your own way; you strike me as a very lucky young lady!"
 
 Catherine got up; she was suffocating.  But she folded her work,
 deliberately and correctly, bending her burning face upon it.  Her
 father stood where he had planted himself; she hoped he would go, but
 he smoothed and buttoned his gloves, and then he rested his hands
 upon his hips.
 
 "It would be a convenience to me to know when I may expect to have an
 empty house," he went on.  "When you go, your aunt marches."
 
 She looked at him at last, with a long silent gaze, which, in spite
 of her pride and her resolution, uttered part of the appeal she had
 tried not to make.  Her father's cold grey eye sounded her own, and
 he insisted on his point.
 
 "Is it to-morrow?  Is it next week, or the week after?"
--**--**--
 young woman going about in search of a moral poultice.  In fact, she
 seems to me much better than while the fellow was hanging about.  She
 is perfectly comfortable and blooming; she eats and sleeps, takes her
 usual exercise, and overloads herself, as usual, with finery.  She is
 always knitting some purse or embroidering some handkerchief, and it
 seems to me she turns these articles out about as fast as ever.  She
 hasn't much to say; but when had she anything to say?  She had her
 little dance, and now she is sitting down to rest.  I suspect that,
 on the whole, she enjoys it."
 
 "She enjoys it as people enjoy getting rid of a leg that has been
 crushed.  The state of mind after amputation is doubtless one of
 comparative repose."
 
 "If your leg is a metaphor for young Townsend, I can assure you he
 has never been crushed.  Crushed?  Not he!  He is alive and perfectly
 intact, and that's why I am not satisfied."
 
 "Should you have liked to kill him?" asked Mrs. Almond.
 
 "Yes, very much.  I think it is quite possible that it is all a
 blind."
 
 "A blind?"
 
 "An arrangement between them.  Il fait le mort, as they say in
 France; but he is looking out of the corner of his eye.  You can
 depend upon it he has not burned his ships; he has kept one to come
 back in.  When I am dead, he will set sail again, and then she will
 marry him."
 
 "It is interesting to know that you accuse your only daughter of
 being the vilest of hypocrites," said Mrs. Almond.
 
 "I don't see what difference her being my only daughter makes.  It is
 better to accuse one than a dozen.  But I don't accuse any one.
 There is not the smallest hypocrisy about Catherine, and I deny that
--**--**--
 failed to establish relations as intimate as those which had given
 her so many interesting hours in the society of Morris Townsend.
 These gentlemen had an indefinable mistrust of her good offices, and
 they never talked to her about Catherine's charms.  Her ringlets, her
 buckles and bangles, glistened more brightly with each succeeding
 year, and she remained quite the same officious and imaginative Mrs.
 Penniman, and the odd mixture of impetuosity and circumspection, that
 we have hitherto known.  As regards one point, however, her
 circumspection prevailed, and she must be given due credit for it.
 For upwards of seventeen years she never mentioned Morris Townsend's
 name to her niece.  Catherine was grateful to her, but this
 consistent silence, so little in accord with her aunt's character,
 gave her a certain alarm, and she could never wholly rid herself of a
 suspicion that Mrs. Penniman sometimes had news of him.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXXIII
 
 
 
 Little by little Dr. Sloper had retired from his profession; he
 visited only those patients in whose symptoms he recognised a certain
 originality.  He went again to Europe, and remained two years;
 Catherine went with him, and on this occasion Mrs. Penniman was of
 the party.  Europe apparently had few surprises for Mrs. Penniman,
 who frequently remarked, in the most romantic sites--"You know I am
 very familiar with all this."  It should be added that such remarks
 were usually not addressed to her brother, or yet to her niece, but
 to fellow-tourists who happened to be at hand, or even to the
 cicerone or the goat-herd in the foreground.
 
 One day, after his return from Europe, the Doctor said something to
 his daughter that made her start--it seemed to come from so far out
 of the past.
 
 "I should like you to promise me something before I die."
--**--**--
 I can see Douglas there before the fire, to which he had got up to
 present his back, looking down at his interlocutor with his hands in
 his pockets. "Nobody but me, till now, has ever heard. It's quite too
 horrible." This, naturally, was declared by several voices to give the
 thing the utmost price, and our friend, with quiet art, prepared his
 triumph by turning his eyes over the rest of us and going on: "It's
 beyond everything. Nothing at all that I know touches it."
 
 "For sheer terror?" I remember asking.
 
 He seemed to say it was not so simple as that; to be really at a loss
 how to qualify it. He passed his hand over his eyes, made a little
 wincing grimace. "For dreadful--dreadfulness!"
 
 "Oh, how delicious!" cried one of the women.
 
 He took no notice of her; he looked at me, but as if, instead of me,
 he saw what he spoke of. "For general uncanny ugliness and horror and
 pain."
 
 "Well then," I said, "just sit right down and begin."
 
 He turned round to the fire, gave a kick to a log, watched it an
 instant. Then as he faced us again: "I can't begin. I shall have to send
 to town." There was a unanimous groan at this, and much reproach; after
 which, in his preoccupied way, he explained. "The story's written. It's
 in a locked drawer--it has not been out for years. I could write to my
 man and enclose the key; he could send down the packet as he finds it."
 It was to me in particular that he appeared to propound this--appeared
 almost to appeal for aid not to hesitate. He had broken a thickness
 of ice, the formation of many a winter; had had his reasons for a long
--**--**--
 she hadn't. I was sure; I could see. You'll easily judge why when you
 hear."
 
 "Because the thing had been such a scare?"
 
 He continued to fix me. "You'll easily judge," he repeated: "YOU will."
 
 I fixed him, too. "I see. She was in love."
 
 He laughed for the first time. "You ARE acute. Yes, she was in love.
 That is, she had been. That came out--she couldn't tell her story
 without its coming out. I saw it, and she saw I saw it; but neither of
 us spoke of it. I remember the time and the place--the corner of the
 lawn, the shade of the great beeches and the long, hot summer afternoon.
 It wasn't a scene for a shudder; but oh--!" He quitted the fire and
 dropped back into his chair.
 
 "You'll receive the packet Thursday morning?" I inquired.
 
 "Probably not till the second post."
 
 "Well then; after dinner--"
 
 "You'll all meet me here?" He looked us round again. "Isn't anybody
 going?" It was almost the tone of hope.
 
 "Everybody will stay!"
 
 "_I_ will"--and "_I_ will!" cried the ladies whose departure had been
 fixed. Mrs. Griffin, however, expressed the need for a little more
 light. "Who was it she was in love with?"
 
 "The story will tell," I took upon myself to reply.
 
 "Oh, I can't wait for the story!"
 
 "The story WON'T tell," said Douglas; "not in any literal, vulgar way."
 
 "More's the pity, then. That's the only way I ever understand."
 
 "Won't YOU tell, Douglas?" somebody else inquired.
 
 He sprang to his feet again. "Yes--tomorrow. Now I must go to bed.
 Good night." And quickly catching up a candlestick, he left us slightly
 bewildered. From our end of the great brown hall we heard his step on
 the stair; whereupon Mrs. Griffin spoke. "Well, if I don't know who she
--**--**--
 spoils of travel and the trophies of the chase; but it was to his
 country home, an old family place in Essex, that he wished her
 immediately to proceed.
 
 He had been left, by the death of their parents in India, guardian to
 a small nephew and a small niece, children of a younger, a military
 brother, whom he had lost two years before. These children were, by the
 strangest of chances for a man in his position--a lone man without the
 right sort of experience or a grain of patience--very heavily on his
 hands. It had all been a great worry and, on his own part doubtless, a
 series of blunders, but he immensely pitied the poor chicks and had done
 all he could; had in particular sent them down to his other house, the
 proper place for them being of course the country, and kept them there,
 from the first, with the best people he could find to look after them,
 parting even with his own servants to wait on them and going down
 himself, whenever he might, to see how they were doing. The awkward
 thing was that they had practically no other relations and that his
 own affairs took up all his time. He had put them in possession of Bly,
 which was healthy and secure, and had placed at the head of their little
 establishment--but below stairs only--an excellent woman, Mrs. Grose,
 whom he was sure his visitor would like and who had formerly been maid
 to his mother. She was now housekeeper and was also acting for the time
 as superintendent to the little girl, of whom, without children of her
 own, she was, by good luck, extremely fond. There were plenty of people
 to help, but of course the young lady who should go down as governess
--**--**--
 a stir to a log with his foot, then stood a moment with his back to us.
 "She saw him only twice."
 
 "Yes, but that's just the beauty of her passion."
 
 A little to my surprise, on this, Douglas turned round to me. "It WAS
 the beauty of it. There were others," he went on, "who hadn't succumbed.
 He told her frankly all his difficulty--that for several applicants the
 conditions had been prohibitive. They were, somehow, simply afraid. It
 sounded dull--it sounded strange; and all the more so because of his
 main condition."
 
 "Which was--?"
 
 "That she should never trouble him--but never, never: neither appeal
 nor complain nor write about anything; only meet all questions herself,
 receive all moneys from his solicitor, take the whole thing over and let
 him alone. She promised to do this, and she mentioned to me that when,
 for a moment, disburdened, delighted, he held her hand, thanking her for
 the sacrifice, she already felt rewarded."
 
 "But was that all her reward?" one of the ladies asked.
 
 "She never saw him again."
 
 "Oh!" said the lady; which, as our friend immediately left us again, was
 the only other word of importance contributed to the subject till, the
 next night, by the corner of the hearth, in the best chair, he opened
 the faded red cover of a thin old-fashioned gilt-edged album. The whole
 thing took indeed more nights than one, but on the first occasion the
 same lady put another question. "What is your title?"
 
 "I haven't one."
 
 "Oh, _I_ have!" I said. But Douglas, without heeding me, had begun to
 read with a fine clearness that was like a rendering to the ear of the
 beauty of his author's hand.
 
 
 
 
 I
 
 
 I remember the whole beginning as a succession of flights and drops, a
--**--**--
 might of course have made me uneasy.
 
 But it was a comfort that there could be no uneasiness in a connection
 with anything so beatific as the radiant image of my little girl, the
 vision of whose angelic beauty had probably more than anything else to
 do with the restlessness that, before morning, made me several times
 rise and wander about my room to take in the whole picture and prospect;
 to watch, from my open window, the faint summer dawn, to look at such
 portions of the rest of the house as I could catch, and to listen,
 while, in the fading dusk, the first birds began to twitter, for the
 possible recurrence of a sound or two, less natural and not without,
 but within, that I had fancied I heard. There had been a moment when I
 believed I recognized, faint and far, the cry of a child; there had been
 another when I found myself just consciously starting as at the passage,
 before my door, of a light footstep. But these fancies were not marked
 enough not to be thrown off, and it is only in the light, or the gloom,
 I should rather say, of other and subsequent matters that they now come
 back to me. To watch, teach, "form" little Flora would too evidently
 be the making of a happy and useful life. It had been agreed between us
 downstairs that after this first occasion I should have her as a matter
 of course at night, her small white bed being already arranged, to that
 end, in my room. What I had undertaken was the whole care of her, and
 she had remained, just this last time, with Mrs. Grose only as an effect
 of our consideration for my inevitable strangeness and her natural
--**--**--
 care of the guard, and is to be met by the same carriage."
 
 I forthwith expressed that the proper as well as the pleasant and
 friendly thing would be therefore that on the arrival of the public
 conveyance I should be in waiting for him with his little sister; an
 idea in which Mrs. Grose concurred so heartily that I somehow took
 her manner as a kind of comforting pledge--never falsified, thank
 heaven!--that we should on every question be quite at one. Oh, she was
 glad I was there!
 
 What I felt the next day was, I suppose, nothing that could be fairly
 called a reaction from the cheer of my arrival; it was probably at the
 most only a slight oppression produced by a fuller measure of the
 scale, as I walked round them, gazed up at them, took them in, of my new
 circumstances. They had, as it were, an extent and mass for which I had
 not been prepared and in the presence of which I found myself, freshly,
 a little scared as well as a little proud. Lessons, in this agitation,
 certainly suffered some delay; I reflected that my first duty was, by
 the gentlest arts I could contrive, to win the child into the sense of
 knowing me. I spent the day with her out-of-doors; I arranged with her,
 to her great satisfaction, that it should be she, she only, who might
 show me the place. She showed it step by step and room by room and
 secret by secret, with droll, delightful, childish talk about it and
 with the result, in half an hour, of our becoming immense friends.
 Young as she was, I was struck, throughout our little tour, with
 her confidence and courage with the way, in empty chambers and dull
--**--**--
 pocket. "Is he really BAD?"
 
 The tears were still in her eyes. "Do the gentlemen say so?"
 
 "They go into no particulars. They simply express their regret that it
 should be impossible to keep him. That can have only one meaning."
 Mrs. Grose listened with dumb emotion; she forbore to ask me what
 this meaning might be; so that, presently, to put the thing with some
 coherence and with the mere aid of her presence to my own mind, I went
 on: "That he's an injury to the others."
 
 At this, with one of the quick turns of simple folk, she suddenly flamed
 up. "Master Miles! HIM an injury?"
 
 There was such a flood of good faith in it that, though I had not yet
 seen the child, my very fears made me jump to the absurdity of the idea.
 I found myself, to meet my friend the better, offering it, on the spot,
 sarcastically. "To his poor little innocent mates!"
 
 "It's too dreadful," cried Mrs. Grose, "to say such cruel things! Why,
 he's scarce ten years old."
 
 "Yes, yes; it would be incredible."
 
 She was evidently grateful for such a profession. "See him, miss, first.
 THEN believe it!" I felt forthwith a new impatience to see him; it was
 the beginning of a curiosity that, for all the next hours, was to deepen
 almost to pain. Mrs. Grose was aware, I could judge, of what she had
 produced in me, and she followed it up with assurance. "You might as
 well believe it of the little lady. Bless her," she added the next
 moment--"LOOK at her!"
 
 I turned and saw that Flora, whom, ten minutes before, I had established
 in the schoolroom with a sheet of white paper, a pencil, and a copy of
 nice "round o's," now presented herself to view at the open door.
--**--**--
 I held her tighter. "You like them with the spirit to be naughty?" Then,
 keeping pace with her answer, "So do I!" I eagerly brought out. "But not
 to the degree to contaminate--"
 
 "To contaminate?"--my big word left her at a loss. I explained it. "To
 corrupt."
 
 She stared, taking my meaning in; but it produced in her an odd laugh.
 "Are you afraid he'll corrupt YOU?" She put the question with such a
 fine bold humor that, with a laugh, a little silly doubtless, to match
 her own, I gave way for the time to the apprehension of ridicule.
 
 But the next day, as the hour for my drive approached, I cropped up in
 another place. "What was the lady who was here before?"
 
 "The last governess? She was also young and pretty--almost as young and
 almost as pretty, miss, even as you."
 
 "Ah, then, I hope her youth and her beauty helped her!" I recollect
 throwing off. "He seems to like us young and pretty!"
 
 "Oh, he DID," Mrs. Grose assented: "it was the way he liked everyone!"
 She had no sooner spoken indeed than she caught herself up. "I mean
 that's HIS way--the master's."
 
 I was struck. "But of whom did you speak first?"
 
 She looked blank, but she colored. "Why, of HIM."
 
 "Of the master?"
 
 "Of who else?"
 
 There was so obviously no one else that the next moment I had lost my
 impression of her having accidentally said more than she meant; and I
 merely asked what I wanted to know. "Did SHE see anything in the boy--?"
 
 "That wasn't right? She never told me."
 
 I had a scruple, but I overcame it. "Was she careful--particular?"
 
 Mrs. Grose appeared to try to be conscientious. "About some
 things--yes."
 
 "But not about all?"
 
 Again she considered. "Well, miss--she's gone. I won't tell tales."
--**--**--
 She promptly understood me. "You mean the cruel charge--?"
 
 "It doesn't live an instant. My dear woman, LOOK at him!"
 
 She smiled at my pretention to have discovered his charm. "I assure
 you, miss, I do nothing else! What will you say, then?" she immediately
 added.
 
 "In answer to the letter?" I had made up my mind. "Nothing."
 
 "And to his uncle?"
 
 I was incisive. "Nothing."
 
 "And to the boy himself?"
 
 I was wonderful. "Nothing."
 
 She gave with her apron a great wipe to her mouth. "Then I'll stand by
 you. We'll see it out."
 
 "We'll see it out!" I ardently echoed, giving her my hand to make it a
 vow.
 
 She held me there a moment, then whisked up her apron again with her
 detached hand. "Would you mind, miss, if I used the freedom--"
 
 "To kiss me? No!" I took the good creature in my arms and, after we had
 embraced like sisters, felt still more fortified and indignant.
 
 This, at all events, was for the time: a time so full that, as I recall
 the way it went, it reminds me of all the art I now need to make it a
 little distinct. What I look back at with amazement is the situation I
 accepted. I had undertaken, with my companion, to see it out, and I was
 under a charm, apparently, that could smooth away the extent and the
 far and difficult connections of such an effort. I was lifted aloft on a
 great wave of infatuation and pity. I found it simple, in my ignorance,
 my confusion, and perhaps my conceit, to assume that I could deal with
 a boy whose education for the world was all on the point of beginning.
 I am unable even to remember at this day what proposal I framed for the
--**--**--
 first morning, little Flora had conducted me. This tower was one of
 a pair--square, incongruous, crenelated structures--that were
 distinguished, for some reason, though I could see little difference,
 as the new and the old. They flanked opposite ends of the house and were
 probably architectural absurdities, redeemed in a measure indeed by
 not being wholly disengaged nor of a height too pretentious, dating, in
 their gingerbread antiquity, from a romantic revival that was already a
 respectable past. I admired them, had fancies about them, for we could
 all profit in a degree, especially when they loomed through the dusk,
 by the grandeur of their actual battlements; yet it was not at such an
 elevation that the figure I had so often invoked seemed most in place.
 
 It produced in me, this figure, in the clear twilight, I remember, two
 distinct gasps of emotion, which were, sharply, the shock of my first
 and that of my second surprise. My second was a violent perception of
 the mistake of my first: the man who met my eyes was not the person
 I had precipitately supposed. There came to me thus a bewilderment of
 vision of which, after these years, there is no living view that I can
 hope to give. An unknown man in a lonely place is a permitted object
 of fear to a young woman privately bred; and the figure that faced me
 was--a few more seconds assured me--as little anyone else I knew as
 it was the image that had been in my mind. I had not seen it in
 Harley Street--I had not seen it anywhere. The place, moreover, in the
 strangest way in the world, had, on the instant, and by the very fact of
 its appearance, become a solitude. To me at least, making my statement
--**--**--
 part of it, in fact--singular as the rest had been--was the part I
 became, in the hall, aware of in meeting Mrs. Grose. This picture comes
 back to me in the general train--the impression, as I received it on my
 return, of the wide white panelled space, bright in the lamplight and
 with its portraits and red carpet, and of the good surprised look of
 my friend, which immediately told me she had missed me. It came to
 me straightway, under her contact, that, with plain heartiness, mere
 relieved anxiety at my appearance, she knew nothing whatever that could
 bear upon the incident I had there ready for her. I had not suspected
 in advance that her comfortable face would pull me up, and I somehow
 measured the importance of what I had seen by my thus finding myself
 hesitate to mention it. Scarce anything in the whole history seems to
 me so odd as this fact that my real beginning of fear was one, as I
 may say, with the instinct of sparing my companion. On the spot,
 accordingly, in the pleasant hall and with her eyes on me, I, for
 a reason that I couldn't then have phrased, achieved an inward
 resolution--offered a vague pretext for my lateness and, with the plea
 of the beauty of the night and of the heavy dew and wet feet, went as
 soon as possible to my room.
 
 Here it was another affair; here, for many days after, it was a queer
 affair enough. There were hours, from day to day--or at least there were
 moments, snatched even from clear duties--when I had to shut myself up
 to think. It was not so much yet that I was more nervous than I could
 bear to be as that I was remarkably afraid of becoming so; for the truth
--**--**--
 the schoolroom. I don't mean by this, of course, that we studied
 only fiction and verse; I mean I can express no otherwise the sort
 of interest my companions inspired. How can I describe that except by
 saying that instead of growing used to them--and it's a marvel for a
 governess: I call the sisterhood to witness!--I made constant fresh
 discoveries. There was one direction, assuredly, in which these
 discoveries stopped: deep obscurity continued to cover the region of the
 boy's conduct at school. It had been promptly given me, I have noted,
 to face that mystery without a pang. Perhaps even it would be nearer the
 truth to say that--without a word--he himself had cleared it up. He had
 made the whole charge absurd. My conclusion bloomed there with the
 real rose flush of his innocence: he was only too fine and fair for the
 little horrid, unclean school world, and he had paid a price for it. I
 reflected acutely that the sense of such differences, such superiorities
 of quality, always, on the part of the majority--which could include
 even stupid, sordid headmasters--turn infallibly to the vindictive.
 
 Both the children had a gentleness (it was their only fault, and it
 never made Miles a muff) that kept them--how shall I express it?--almost
 impersonal and certainly quite unpunishable. They were like the cherubs
 of the anecdote, who had--morally, at any rate--nothing to whack! I
 remember feeling with Miles in especial as if he had had, as it were, no
 history. We expect of a small child a scant one, but there was in
 this beautiful little boy something extraordinarily sensitive, yet
 extraordinarily happy, that, more than in any creature of his age I have
 seen, struck me as beginning anew each day. He had never for a second
--**--**--
 happened this time that had not happened before; his stare into my face,
 through the glass and across the room, was as deep and hard as then, but
 it quitted me for a moment during which I could still watch it, see it
 fix successively several other things. On the spot there came to me the
 added shock of a certitude that it was not for me he had come there. He
 had come for someone else.
 
 The flash of this knowledge--for it was knowledge in the midst of
 dread--produced in me the most extraordinary effect, started as I stood
 there, a sudden vibration of duty and courage. I say courage because
 I was beyond all doubt already far gone. I bounded straight out of the
 door again, reached that of the house, got, in an instant, upon the
 drive, and, passing along the terrace as fast as I could rush, turned
 a corner and came full in sight. But it was in sight of nothing now--my
 visitor had vanished. I stopped, I almost dropped, with the real relief
 of this; but I took in the whole scene--I gave him time to reappear. I
 call it time, but how long was it? I can't speak to the purpose today
 of the duration of these things. That kind of measure must have left me:
 they couldn't have lasted as they actually appeared to me to last. The
 terrace and the whole place, the lawn and the garden beyond it, all I
 could see of the park, were empty with a great emptiness. There were
 shrubberies and big trees, but I remember the clear assurance I felt
 that none of them concealed him. He was there or was not there: not
 there if I didn't see him. I got hold of this; then, instinctively,
--**--**--
 but I can't go."
 
 "Has anything happened?"
 
 "Yes. You must know now. Did I look very queer?"
 
 "Through this window? Dreadful!"
 
 "Well," I said, "I've been frightened." Mrs. Grose's eyes expressed
 plainly that SHE had no wish to be, yet also that she knew too well her
 place not to be ready to share with me any marked inconvenience. Oh,
 it was quite settled that she MUST share! "Just what you saw from the
 dining room a minute ago was the effect of that. What _I_ saw--just
 before--was much worse."
 
 Her hand tightened. "What was it?"
 
 "An extraordinary man. Looking in."
 
 "What extraordinary man?"
 
 "I haven't the least idea."
 
 Mrs. Grose gazed round us in vain. "Then where is he gone?"
 
 "I know still less."
 
 "Have you seen him before?"
 
 "Yes--once. On the old tower."
 
 She could only look at me harder. "Do you mean he's a stranger?"
 
 "Oh, very much!"
 
 "Yet you didn't tell me?"
 
 "No--for reasons. But now that you've guessed--"
 
 Mrs. Grose's round eyes encountered this charge. "Ah, I haven't
 guessed!" she said very simply. "How can I if YOU don't imagine?"
 
 "I don't in the very least."
 
 "You've seen him nowhere but on the tower?"
 
 "And on this spot just now."
 
 Mrs. Grose looked round again. "What was he doing on the tower?"
 
 "Only standing there and looking down at me."
 
 She thought a minute. "Was he a gentleman?"
 
 I found I had no need to think. "No." She gazed in deeper wonder. "No."
 
 "Then nobody about the place? Nobody from the village?"
 
 "Nobody--nobody. I didn't tell you, but I made sure."
 
 She breathed a vague relief: this was, oddly, so much to the good. It
 only went indeed a little way. "But if he isn't a gentleman--"
 
 "What IS he? He's a horror."
 
 "A horror?"
--**--**--
 
 "About the middle of the month. At this same hour."
 
 "Almost at dark," said Mrs. Grose.
 
 "Oh, no, not nearly. I saw him as I see you."
 
 "Then how did he get in?"
 
 "And how did he get out?" I laughed. "I had no opportunity to ask him!
 This evening, you see," I pursued, "he has not been able to get in."
 
 "He only peeps?"
 
 "I hope it will be confined to that!" She had now let go my hand; she
 turned away a little. I waited an instant; then I brought out: "Go to
 church. Goodbye. I must watch."
 
 Slowly she faced me again. "Do you fear for them?"
 
 We met in another long look. "Don't YOU?" Instead of answering she came
 nearer to the window and, for a minute, applied her face to the glass.
 "You see how he could see," I meanwhile went on.
 
 She didn't move. "How long was he here?"
 
 "Till I came out. I came to meet him."
 
 Mrs. Grose at last turned round, and there was still more in her face.
 "_I_ couldn't have come out."
 
 "Neither could I!" I laughed again. "But I did come. I have my duty."
 
 "So have I mine," she replied; after which she added: "What is he like?"
 
 "I've been dying to tell you. But he's like nobody."
 
 "Nobody?" she echoed.
 
 "He has no hat." Then seeing in her face that she already, in this, with
 a deeper dismay, found a touch of picture, I quickly added stroke to
 stroke. "He has red hair, very red, close-curling, and a pale face, long
 in shape, with straight, good features and little, rather queer whiskers
 that are as red as his hair. His eyebrows are, somehow, darker; they
 look particularly arched and as if they might move a good deal. His eyes
--**--**--
 
 Her expression, at this, became extraordinary. "God knows where! He
 died."
 
 "Died?" I almost shrieked.
 
 She seemed fairly to square herself, plant herself more firmly to utter
 the wonder of it. "Yes. Mr. Quint is dead."
 
 
 
 
 VI
 
 
 It took of course more than that particular passage to place us together
 in presence of what we had now to live with as we could--my dreadful
 liability to impressions of the order so vividly exemplified, and my
 companion's knowledge, henceforth--a knowledge half consternation and
 half compassion--of that liability. There had been, this evening, after
 the revelation left me, for an hour, so prostrate--there had been, for
 either of us, no attendance on any service but a little service of tears
 and vows, of prayers and promises, a climax to the series of mutual
 challenges and pledges that had straightway ensued on our retreating
 together to the schoolroom and shutting ourselves up there to have
 everything out. The result of our having everything out was simply to
 reduce our situation to the last rigor of its elements. She herself had
 seen nothing, not the shadow of a shadow, and nobody in the house but
 the governess was in the governess's plight; yet she accepted without
 directly impugning my sanity the truth as I gave it to her, and ended by
 showing me, on this ground, an awestricken tenderness, an expression
 of the sense of my more than questionable privilege, of which the very
 breath has remained with me as that of the sweetest of human charities.
 
 What was settled between us, accordingly, that night, was that we
 thought we might bear things together; and I was not even sure that,
 in spite of her exemption, it was she who had the best of the burden. I
 knew at this hour, I think, as well as I knew later, what I was capable
--**--**--
 "Oh, it wasn't HIM!" Mrs. Grose with emphasis declared. "It was Quint's
 own fancy. To play with him, I mean--to spoil him." She paused a moment;
 then she added: "Quint was much too free."
 
 This gave me, straight from my vision of his face--SUCH a face!--a
 sudden sickness of disgust. "Too free with MY boy?"
 
 "Too free with everyone!"
 
 I forbore, for the moment, to analyze this description further than by
 the reflection that a part of it applied to several of the members of
 the household, of the half-dozen maids and men who were still of our
 small colony. But there was everything, for our apprehension, in the
 lucky fact that no discomfortable legend, no perturbation of scullions,
 had ever, within anyone's memory attached to the kind old place. It had
 neither bad name nor ill fame, and Mrs. Grose, most apparently, only
 desired to cling to me and to quake in silence. I even put her, the very
 last thing of all, to the test. It was when, at midnight, she had her
 hand on the schoolroom door to take leave. "I have it from you then--for
 it's of great importance--that he was definitely and admittedly bad?"
 
 "Oh, not admittedly. _I_ knew it--but the master didn't."
 
 "And you never told him?"
 
 "Well, he didn't like tale-bearing--he hated complaints. He was terribly
 short with anything of that kind, and if people were all right to HIM--"
 
 "He wouldn't be bothered with more?" This squared well enough with my
 impressions of him: he was not a trouble-loving gentleman, nor so very
 particular perhaps about some of the company HE kept. All the same, I
 pressed my interlocutress. "I promise you _I_ would have told!"
 
 She felt my discrimination. "I daresay I was wrong. But, really, I was
 afraid."
 
 "Afraid of what?"
--**--**--
 long, have turned to something like madness. What saved me, as I now
 see, was that it turned to something else altogether. It didn't last as
 suspense--it was superseded by horrible proofs. Proofs, I say, yes--from
 the moment I really took hold.
 
 This moment dated from an afternoon hour that I happened to spend in the
 grounds with the younger of my pupils alone. We had left Miles indoors,
 on the red cushion of a deep window seat; he had wished to finish a
 book, and I had been glad to encourage a purpose so laudable in a young
 man whose only defect was an occasional excess of the restless. His
 sister, on the contrary, had been alert to come out, and I strolled with
 her half an hour, seeking the shade, for the sun was still high and the
 day exceptionally warm. I was aware afresh, with her, as we went, of
 how, like her brother, she contrived--it was the charming thing in both
 children--to let me alone without appearing to drop me and to accompany
 me without appearing to surround. They were never importunate and yet
 never listless. My attention to them all really went to seeing them
 amuse themselves immensely without me: this was a spectacle they seemed
 actively to prepare and that engaged me as an active admirer. I walked
 in a world of their invention--they had no occasion whatever to draw
 upon mine; so that my time was taken only with being, for them, some
 remarkable person or thing that the game of the moment required and that
 was merely, thanks to my superior, my exalted stamp, a happy and highly
 distinguished sinecure. I forget what I was on the present occasion;
 I only remember that I was something very important and very quiet and
--**--**--
 that these things should be the other things that they absolutely were
 not.
 
 Of the positive identity of the apparition I would assure myself as
 soon as the small clock of my courage should have ticked out the right
 second; meanwhile, with an effort that was already sharp enough, I
 transferred my eyes straight to little Flora, who, at the moment, was
 about ten yards away. My heart had stood still for an instant with the
 wonder and terror of the question whether she too would see; and I
 held my breath while I waited for what a cry from her, what some sudden
 innocent sign either of interest or of alarm, would tell me. I waited,
 but nothing came; then, in the first place--and there is something
 more dire in this, I feel, than in anything I have to relate--I was
 determined by a sense that, within a minute, all sounds from her had
 previously dropped; and, in the second, by the circumstance that, also
 within the minute, she had, in her play, turned her back to the water.
 This was her attitude when I at last looked at her--looked with the
 confirmed conviction that we were still, together, under direct personal
 notice. She had picked up a small flat piece of wood, which happened to
 have in it a little hole that had evidently suggested to her the idea
 of sticking in another fragment that might figure as a mast and make
 the thing a boat. This second morsel, as I watched her, she was
 very markedly and intently attempting to tighten in its place. My
 apprehension of what she was doing sustained me so that after some
 seconds I felt I was ready for more. Then I again shifted my eyes--I
 faced what I had to face.
--**--**--
 "Oh, for the effect and the feeling, she might have been as close as
 you!"
 
 My friend, with an odd impulse, fell back a step. "Was she someone
 you've never seen?"
 
 "Yes. But someone the child has. Someone YOU have." Then, to show how I
 had thought it all out: "My predecessor--the one who died."
 
 "Miss Jessel?"
 
 "Miss Jessel. You don't believe me?" I pressed.
 
 She turned right and left in her distress. "How can you be sure?"
 
 This drew from me, in the state of my nerves, a flash of impatience.
 "Then ask Flora--SHE'S sure!" But I had no sooner spoken than I caught
 myself up. "No, for God's sake, DON'T! She'll say she isn't--she'll
 lie!"
 
 Mrs. Grose was not too bewildered instinctively to protest. "Ah, how CAN
 you?"
 
 "Because I'm clear. Flora doesn't want me to know."
 
 "It's only then to spare you."
 
 "No, no--there are depths, depths! The more I go over it, the more I see
 in it, and the more I see in it, the more I fear. I don't know what I
 DON'T see--what I DON'T fear!"
 
 Mrs. Grose tried to keep up with me. "You mean you're afraid of seeing
 her again?"
 
 "Oh, no; that's nothing--now!" Then I explained. "It's of NOT seeing
 her."
 
 But my companion only looked wan. "I don't understand you."
 
 "Why, it's that the child may keep it up--and that the child assuredly
 WILL--without my knowing it."
 
 At the image of this possibility Mrs. Grose for a moment collapsed, yet
 presently to pull herself together again, as if from the positive force
 of the sense of what, should we yield an inch, there would really be to
 give way to. "Dear, dear--we must keep our heads! And after all, if she
 doesn't mind it--!" She even tried a grim joke. "Perhaps she likes it!"
--**--**--
 She stared at mine as if they might really have resembled them. "Do you
 mean of dislike?"
 
 "God help us, no. Of something much worse."
 
 "Worse than dislike?--this left her indeed at a loss.
 
 "With a determination--indescribable. With a kind of fury of intention."
 
 I made her turn pale. "Intention?"
 
 "To get hold of her." Mrs. Grose--her eyes just lingering on mine--gave
 a shudder and walked to the window; and while she stood there looking
 out I completed my statement. "THAT'S what Flora knows."
 
 After a little she turned round. "The person was in black, you say?"
 
 "In mourning--rather poor, almost shabby. But--yes--with extraordinary
 beauty." I now recognized to what I had at last, stroke by stroke,
 brought the victim of my confidence, for she quite visibly weighed
 this. "Oh, handsome--very, very," I insisted; "wonderfully handsome. But
 infamous."
 
 She slowly came back to me. "Miss Jessel--WAS infamous." She once more
 took my hand in both her own, holding it as tight as if to fortify me
 against the increase of alarm I might draw from this disclosure. "They
 were both infamous," she finally said.
 
 So, for a little, we faced it once more together; and I found absolutely
 a degree of help in seeing it now so straight. "I appreciate," I said,
 "the great decency of your not having hitherto spoken; but the time has
 certainly come to give me the whole thing." She appeared to assent to
 this, but still only in silence; seeing which I went on: "I must have it
 now. Of what did she die? Come, there was something between them."
 
 "There was everything."
 
 "In spite of the difference--?"
 
 "Oh, of their rank, their condition"--she brought it woefully out. "SHE
 was a lady."
 
 I turned it over; I again saw. "Yes--she was a lady."
 
 "And he so dreadfully below," said Mrs. Grose.
--**--**--
 perfectly in the pinch of that, I found I had only to ask her how, if
 I had "made it up," I came to be able to give, of each of the persons
 appearing to me, a picture disclosing, to the last detail, their
 special marks--a portrait on the exhibition of which she had instantly
 recognized and named them. She wished of course--small blame to her!--to
 sink the whole subject; and I was quick to assure her that my own
 interest in it had now violently taken the form of a search for the way
 to escape from it. I encountered her on the ground of a probability that
 with recurrence--for recurrence we took for granted--I should get
 used to my danger, distinctly professing that my personal exposure had
 suddenly become the least of my discomforts. It was my new suspicion
 that was intolerable; and yet even to this complication the later hours
 of the day had brought a little ease.
 
 On leaving her, after my first outbreak, I had of course returned to my
 pupils, associating the right remedy for my dismay with that sense of
 their charm which I had already found to be a thing I could positively
 cultivate and which had never failed me yet. I had simply, in other
 words, plunged afresh into Flora's special society and there become
 aware--it was almost a luxury!--that she could put her little conscious
 hand straight upon the spot that ached. She had looked at me in sweet
 speculation and then had accused me to my face of having "cried." I had
 supposed I had brushed away the ugly signs: but I could literally--for
 the time, at all events--rejoice, under this fathomless charity, that
 they had not entirely disappeared. To gaze into the depths of blue of
 the child's eyes and pronounce their loveliness a trick of premature
--**--**--
 good--that _I_ at least had not betrayed myself. I should not have been
 prompted, by stress of need, by desperation of mind--I scarce know what
 to call it--to invoke such further aid to intelligence as might spring
 from pushing my colleague fairly to the wall. She had told me, bit by
 bit, under pressure, a great deal; but a small shifty spot on the wrong
 side of it all still sometimes brushed my brow like the wing of a bat;
 and I remember how on this occasion--for the sleeping house and the
 concentration alike of our danger and our watch seemed to help--I felt
 the importance of giving the last jerk to the curtain. "I don't
 believe anything so horrible," I recollect saying; "no, let us put it
 definitely, my dear, that I don't. But if I did, you know, there's
 a thing I should require now, just without sparing you the least bit
 more--oh, not a scrap, come!--to get out of you. What was it you had in
 mind when, in our distress, before Miles came back, over the letter from
 his school, you said, under my insistence, that you didn't pretend for
 him that he had not literally EVER been 'bad'? He has NOT literally
 'ever,' in these weeks that I myself have lived with him and so closely
 watched him; he has been an imperturbable little prodigy of delightful,
 lovable goodness. Therefore you might perfectly have made the claim for
 him if you had not, as it happened, seen an exception to take. What was
 your exception, and to what passage in your personal observation of him
 did you refer?"
 
 It was a dreadfully austere inquiry, but levity was not our note, and,
 at any rate, before the gray dawn admonished us to separate I had got
--**--**--
 
 "I don't know--I don't know!" the poor woman groaned.
 
 "You do know, you dear thing," I replied; "only you haven't my dreadful
 boldness of mind, and you keep back, out of timidity and modesty and
 delicacy, even the impression that, in the past, when you had, without
 my aid, to flounder about in silence, most of all made you miserable.
 But I shall get it out of you yet! There was something in the boy that
 suggested to you," I continued, "that he covered and concealed their
 relation."
 
 "Oh, he couldn't prevent--"
 
 "Your learning the truth? I daresay! But, heavens," I fell, with
 vehemence, athinking, "what it shows that they must, to that extent,
 have succeeded in making of him!"
 
 "Ah, nothing that's not nice NOW!" Mrs. Grose lugubriously pleaded.
 
 "I don't wonder you looked queer," I persisted, "when I mentioned to you
 the letter from his school!"
 
 "I doubt if I looked as queer as you!" she retorted with homely force.
 "And if he was so bad then as that comes to, how is he such an angel
 now?"
 
 "Yes, indeed--and if he was a fiend at school! How, how, how? Well,"
 I said in my torment, "you must put it to me again, but I shall not be
 able to tell you for some days. Only, put it to me again!" I cried in a
 way that made my friend stare. "There are directions in which I must
 not for the present let myself go." Meanwhile I returned to her first
 example--the one to which she had just previously referred--of the boy's
 happy capacity for an occasional slip. "If Quint--on your remonstrance
 at the time you speak of--was a base menial, one of the things Miles
 said to you, I find myself guessing, was that you were another." Again
--**--**--
 
 IX
 
 
 I waited and waited, and the days, as they elapsed, took something from
 my consternation. A very few of them, in fact, passing, in constant
 sight of my pupils, without a fresh incident, sufficed to give to
 grievous fancies and even to odious memories a kind of brush of the
 sponge. I have spoken of the surrender to their extraordinary childish
 grace as a thing I could actively cultivate, and it may be imagined if
 I neglected now to address myself to this source for whatever it
 would yield. Stranger than I can express, certainly, was the effort to
 struggle against my new lights; it would doubtless have been, however,
 a greater tension still had it not been so frequently successful. I
 used to wonder how my little charges could help guessing that I thought
 strange things about them; and the circumstances that these things only
 made them more interesting was not by itself a direct aid to keeping
 them in the dark. I trembled lest they should see that they WERE so
 immensely more interesting. Putting things at the worst, at all events,
 as in meditation I so often did, any clouding of their innocence could
 only be--blameless and foredoomed as they were--a reason the more for
 taking risks. There were moments when, by an irresistible impulse, I
 found myself catching them up and pressing them to my heart. As soon as
 I had done so I used to say to myself: "What will they think of that?
 Doesn't it betray too much?" It would have been easy to get into a sad,
 wild tangle about how much I might betray; but the real account, I feel,
 of the hours of peace that I could still enjoy was that the immediate
 charm of my companions was a beguilement still effective even under the
--**--**--
 
 If it was easy to reflect, however, that such a boy could postpone
 school, it was at least as marked that for such a boy to have been
 "kicked out" by a schoolmaster was a mystification without end. Let me
 add that in their company now--and I was careful almost never to be out
 of it--I could follow no scent very far. We lived in a cloud of music
 and love and success and private theatricals. The musical sense in each
 of the children was of the quickest, but the elder in especial had a
 marvelous knack of catching and repeating. The schoolroom piano
 broke into all gruesome fancies; and when that failed there were
 confabulations in corners, with a sequel of one of them going out in
 the highest spirits in order to "come in" as something new. I had had
 brothers myself, and it was no revelation to me that little girls could
 be slavish idolaters of little boys. What surpassed everything was that
 there was a little boy in the world who could have for the inferior age,
 sex, and intelligence so fine a consideration. They were extraordinarily
 at one, and to say that they never either quarreled or complained is
 to make the note of praise coarse for their quality of sweetness.
 Sometimes, indeed, when I dropped into coarseness, I perhaps came across
 traces of little understandings between them by which one of them should
 keep me occupied while the other slipped away. There is a naive side,
 I suppose, in all diplomacy; but if my pupils practiced upon me, it was
 surely with the minimum of grossness. It was all in the other quarter
 that, after a lull, the grossness broke out.
 
 I find that I really hang back; but I must take my plunge. In going on
--**--**--
 and, taking a candle, went straight out of the room and, from the
 passage, on which my light made little impression, noiselessly closed
 and locked the door.
 
 I can say now neither what determined nor what guided me, but I went
 straight along the lobby, holding my candle high, till I came within
 sight of the tall window that presided over the great turn of the
 staircase. At this point I precipitately found myself aware of three
 things. They were practically simultaneous, yet they had flashes of
 succession. My candle, under a bold flourish, went out, and I perceived,
 by the uncovered window, that the yielding dusk of earliest morning
 rendered it unnecessary. Without it, the next instant, I saw that there
 was someone on the stair. I speak of sequences, but I required no lapse
 of seconds to stiffen myself for a third encounter with Quint. The
 apparition had reached the landing halfway up and was therefore on the
 spot nearest the window, where at sight of me, it stopped short and
 fixed me exactly as it had fixed me from the tower and from the garden.
 He knew me as well as I knew him; and so, in the cold, faint twilight,
 with a glimmer in the high glass and another on the polish of the
 oak stair below, we faced each other in our common intensity. He was
 absolutely, on this occasion, a living, detestable, dangerous presence.
 But that was not the wonder of wonders; I reserve this distinction for
 quite another circumstance: the circumstance that dread had unmistakably
 quitted me and that there was nothing in me there that didn't meet and
 measure him.
 
 I had plenty of anguish after that extraordinary moment, but I had,
 thank God, no terror. And he knew I had not--I found myself at the end
--**--**--
 at her on the spot and have it all over?--give it to her straight in her
 lovely little lighted face? "You see, you see, you KNOW that you do and
 that you already quite suspect I believe it; therefore, why not frankly
 confess it to me, so that we may at least live with it together and
 learn perhaps, in the strangeness of our fate, where we are and what
 it means?" This solicitation dropped, alas, as it came: if I could
 immediately have succumbed to it I might have spared myself--well,
 you'll see what. Instead of succumbing I sprang again to my feet,
 looked at her bed, and took a helpless middle way. "Why did you pull the
 curtain over the place to make me think you were still there?"
 
 Flora luminously considered; after which, with her little divine smile:
 "Because I don't like to frighten you!"
 
 "But if I had, by your idea, gone out--?"
 
 She absolutely declined to be puzzled; she turned her eyes to the flame
 of the candle as if the question were as irrelevant, or at any rate as
 impersonal, as Mrs. Marcet or nine-times-nine. "Oh, but you know," she
 quite adequately answered, "that you might come back, you dear, and that
 you HAVE!" And after a little, when she had got into bed, I had, for a
 long time, by almost sitting on her to hold her hand, to prove that I
 recognized the pertinence of my return.
 
 You may imagine the general complexion, from that moment, of my nights.
 I repeatedly sat up till I didn't know when; I selected moments when my
 roommate unmistakably slept, and, stealing out, took noiseless turns in
 the passage and even pushed as far as to where I had last met Quint. But
 I never met him there again; and I may as well say at once that I on no
--**--**--
 portentously be; I wondered if his bed were also empty and he too were
 secretly at watch. It was a deep, soundless minute, at the end of which
 my impulse failed. He was quiet; he might be innocent; the risk was
 hideous; I turned away. There was a figure in the grounds--a figure
 prowling for a sight, the visitor with whom Flora was engaged; but it
 was not the visitor most concerned with my boy. I hesitated afresh, but
 on other grounds and only for a few seconds; then I had made my choice.
 There were empty rooms at Bly, and it was only a question of choosing
 the right one. The right one suddenly presented itself to me as the
 lower one--though high above the gardens--in the solid corner of the
 house that I have spoken of as the old tower. This was a large, square
 chamber, arranged with some state as a bedroom, the extravagant size of
 which made it so inconvenient that it had not for years, though kept by
 Mrs. Grose in exemplary order, been occupied. I had often admired it and
 I knew my way about in it; I had only, after just faltering at the first
 chill gloom of its disuse, to pass across it and unbolt as quietly as I
 could one of the shutters. Achieving this transit, I uncovered the
 glass without a sound and, applying my face to the pane, was able, the
 darkness without being much less than within, to see that I commanded
 the right direction. Then I saw something more. The moon made the
 night extraordinarily penetrable and showed me on the lawn a person,
 diminished by distance, who stood there motionless and as if fascinated,
 looking up to where I had appeared--looking, that is, not so much
--**--**--
 engage that, to the world, my face should tell no tales, but it would
 have been, in the conditions, an immense added strain to find myself
 anxious about hers.
 
 At the hour I now speak of she had joined me, under pressure, on the
 terrace, where, with the lapse of the season, the afternoon sun was now
 agreeable; and we sat there together while, before us, at a distance,
 but within call if we wished, the children strolled to and fro in one
 of their most manageable moods. They moved slowly, in unison, below us,
 over the lawn, the boy, as they went, reading aloud from a storybook and
 passing his arm round his sister to keep her quite in touch. Mrs. Grose
 watched them with positive placidity; then I caught the suppressed
 intellectual creak with which she conscientiously turned to take from me
 a view of the back of the tapestry. I had made her a receptacle of
 lurid things, but there was an odd recognition of my superiority--my
 accomplishments and my function--in her patience under my pain. She
 offered her mind to my disclosures as, had I wished to mix a witch's
 broth and proposed it with assurance, she would have held out a large
 clean saucepan. This had become thoroughly her attitude by the time
 that, in my recital of the events of the night, I reached the point of
 what Miles had said to me when, after seeing him, at such a monstrous
 hour, almost on the very spot where he happened now to be, I had gone
 down to bring him in; choosing then, at the window, with a concentrated
 need of not alarming the house, rather that method than a signal more
 resonant. I had left her meanwhile in little doubt of my small hope of
--**--**--
 it?"
 
 "Oh, I arranged that with Flora." His answers rang out with a readiness!
 "She was to get up and look out."
 
 "Which is what she did do." It was I who fell into the trap!
 
 "So she disturbed you, and, to see what she was looking at, you also
 looked--you saw."
 
 "While you," I concurred, "caught your death in the night air!"
 
 He literally bloomed so from this exploit that he could afford radiantly
 to assent. "How otherwise should I have been bad enough?" he asked.
 Then, after another embrace, the incident and our interview closed on my
 recognition of all the reserves of goodness that, for his joke, he had
 been able to draw upon.
 
 
 
 
 XII
 
 
 The particular impression I had received proved in the morning light,
 I repeat, not quite successfully presentable to Mrs. Grose, though I
 reinforced it with the mention of still another remark that he had made
 before we separated. "It all lies in half a dozen words," I said to her,
 "words that really settle the matter. 'Think, you know, what I MIGHT
 do!' He threw that off to show me how good he is. He knows down to
 the ground what he 'might' do. That's what he gave them a taste of at
 school."
 
 "Lord, you do change!" cried my friend.
 
 "I don't change--I simply make it out. The four, depend upon it,
 perpetually meet. If on either of these last nights you had been with
 either child, you would clearly have understood. The more I've watched
 and waited the more I've felt that if there were nothing else to make it
 sure it would be made so by the systematic silence of each. NEVER, by a
 slip of the tongue, have they so much as alluded to either of their old
--**--**--
 distance, paused an instant in their walk and looked at us. "Don't
 they do enough?" I demanded in a lower tone, while the children, having
 smiled and nodded and kissed hands to us, resumed their exhibition. We
 were held by it a minute; then I answered: "They can destroy them!" At
 this my companion did turn, but the inquiry she launched was a silent
 one, the effect of which was to make me more explicit. "They don't know,
 as yet, quite how--but they're trying hard. They're seen only across,
 as it were, and beyond--in strange places and on high places, the top of
 towers, the roof of houses, the outside of windows, the further edge
 of pools; but there's a deep design, on either side, to shorten the
 distance and overcome the obstacle; and the success of the tempters is
 only a question of time. They've only to keep to their suggestions of
 danger."
 
 "For the children to come?"
 
 "And perish in the attempt!" Mrs. Grose slowly got up, and I
 scrupulously added: "Unless, of course, we can prevent!"
 
 Standing there before me while I kept my seat, she visibly turned things
 over. "Their uncle must do the preventing. He must take them away."
 
 "And who's to make him?"
 
 She had been scanning the distance, but she now dropped on me a foolish
 face. "You, miss."
 
 "By writing to him that his house is poisoned and his little nephew and
 niece mad?"
 
 "But if they ARE, miss?"
 
 "And if I am myself, you mean? That's charming news to be sent him by a
 governess whose prime undertaking was to give him no worry."
 
 Mrs. Grose considered, following the children again. "Yes, he do hate
 worry. That was the great reason--"
 
 "Why those fiends took him in so long? No doubt, though his indifference
--**--**--
 when I thought of such occasions afterward, gave me so the suspicion
 of being watched from under cover. It was in any case over MY life, MY
 past, and MY friends alone that we could take anything like our ease--a
 state of affairs that led them sometimes without the least pertinence
 to break out into sociable reminders. I was invited--with no visible
 connection--to repeat afresh Goody Gosling's celebrated mot or to
 confirm the details already supplied as to the cleverness of the
 vicarage pony.
 
 It was partly at such junctures as these and partly at quite different
 ones that, with the turn my matters had now taken, my predicament, as I
 have called it, grew most sensible. The fact that the days passed for
 me without another encounter ought, it would have appeared, to have done
 something toward soothing my nerves. Since the light brush, that second
 night on the upper landing, of the presence of a woman at the foot of
 the stair, I had seen nothing, whether in or out of the house, that one
 had better not have seen. There was many a corner round which I expected
 to come upon Quint, and many a situation that, in a merely sinister way,
 would have favored the appearance of Miss Jessel. The summer had turned,
 the summer had gone; the autumn had dropped upon Bly and had blown out
 half our lights. The place, with its gray sky and withered garlands,
 its bared spaces and scattered dead leaves, was like a theater after
 the performance--all strewn with crumpled playbills. There were exactly
 states of the air, conditions of sound and of stillness, unspeakable
 impressions of the KIND of ministering moment, that brought back to me,
 long enough to catch it, the feeling of the medium in which, that June
--**--**--
 greater than the injury to be averted, my exultation would have broken
 out. "They're here, they're here, you little wretches," I would have
 cried, "and you can't deny it now!" The little wretches denied it with
 all the added volume of their sociability and their tenderness, in just
 the crystal depths of which--like the flash of a fish in a stream--the
 mockery of their advantage peeped up. The shock, in truth, had sunk into
 me still deeper than I knew on the night when, looking out to see either
 Quint or Miss Jessel under the stars, I had beheld the boy over
 whose rest I watched and who had immediately brought in with him--had
 straightway, there, turned it on me--the lovely upward look with which,
 from the battlements above me, the hideous apparition of Quint had
 played. If it was a question of a scare, my discovery on this occasion
 had scared me more than any other, and it was in the condition of nerves
 produced by it that I made my actual inductions. They harassed me so
 that sometimes, at odd moments, I shut myself up audibly to rehearse--it
 was at once a fantastic relief and a renewed despair--the manner in
 which I might come to the point. I approached it from one side and the
 other while, in my room, I flung myself about, but I always broke down
 in the monstrous utterance of names. As they died away on my lips, I
 said to myself that I should indeed help them to represent something
 infamous, if, by pronouncing them, I should violate as rare a little
 case of instinctive delicacy as any schoolroom, probably, had ever
 known. When I said to myself: "THEY have the manners to be silent, and
 you, trusted as you are, the baseness to speak!" I felt myself crimson
--**--**--
 side and his sister, in advance of us and at Mrs. Grose's, well in
 sight. It was a crisp, clear day, the first of its order for some time;
 the night had brought a touch of frost, and the autumn air, bright
 and sharp, made the church bells almost gay. It was an odd accident of
 thought that I should have happened at such a moment to be particularly
 and very gratefully struck with the obedience of my little charges. Why
 did they never resent my inexorable, my perpetual society? Something or
 other had brought nearer home to me that I had all but pinned the boy to
 my shawl and that, in the way our companions were marshaled before me,
 I might have appeared to provide against some danger of rebellion. I
 was like a gaoler with an eye to possible surprises and escapes. But all
 this belonged--I mean their magnificent little surrender--just to the
 special array of the facts that were most abysmal. Turned out for Sunday
 by his uncle's tailor, who had had a free hand and a notion of
 pretty waistcoats and of his grand little air, Miles's whole title to
 independence, the rights of his sex and situation, were so stamped upon
 him that if he had suddenly struck for freedom I should have had nothing
 to say. I was by the strangest of chances wondering how I should meet
 him when the revolution unmistakably occurred. I call it a revolution
 because I now see how, with the word he spoke, the curtain rose on the
 last act of my dreadful drama, and the catastrophe was precipitated.
 "Look here, my dear, you know," he charmingly said, "when in the world,
 please, am I going back to school?"
 
 Transcribed here the speech sounds harmless enough, particularly
--**--**--
 "Why, when I went down--went out of the house."
 
 "Oh, yes. But I forget what you did it for."
 
 "You forget?"--he spoke with the sweet extravagance of childish
 reproach. "Why, it was to show you I could!"
 
 "Oh, yes, you could."
 
 "And I can again."
 
 I felt that I might, perhaps, after all, succeed in keeping my wits
 about me. "Certainly. But you won't."
 
 "No, not THAT again. It was nothing."
 
 "It was nothing," I said. "But we must go on."
 
 He resumed our walk with me, passing his hand into my arm. "Then when AM
 I going back?"
 
 I wore, in turning it over, my most responsible air. "Were you very
 happy at school?"
 
 He just considered. "Oh, I'm happy enough anywhere!"
 
 "Well, then," I quavered, "if you're just as happy here--!"
 
 "Ah, but that isn't everything! Of course YOU know a lot--"
 
 "But you hint that you know almost as much?" I risked as he paused.
 
 "Not half I want to!" Miles honestly professed. "But it isn't so much
 that."
 
 "What is it, then?"
 
 "Well--I want to see more life."
 
 "I see; I see." We had arrived within sight of the church and of various
 persons, including several of the household of Bly, on their way to it
 and clustered about the door to see us go in. I quickened our step;
 I wanted to get there before the question between us opened up much
 further; I reflected hungrily that, for more than an hour, he would have
 to be silent; and I thought with envy of the comparative dusk of the pew
 and of the almost spiritual help of the hassock on which I might bend
 my knees. I seemed literally to be running a race with some confusion
 to which he was about to reduce me, but I felt that he had got in first
--**--**--
 of it, for him, would be just this awkward collapse. He had got out
 of me that there was something I was much afraid of and that he should
 probably be able to make use of my fear to gain, for his own purpose,
 more freedom. My fear was of having to deal with the intolerable
 question of the grounds of his dismissal from school, for that was
 really but the question of the horrors gathered behind. That his uncle
 should arrive to treat with me of these things was a solution that,
 strictly speaking, I ought now to have desired to bring on; but I
 could so little face the ugliness and the pain of it that I simply
 procrastinated and lived from hand to mouth. The boy, to my deep
 discomposure, was immensely in the right, was in a position to say
 to me: "Either you clear up with my guardian the mystery of this
 interruption of my studies, or you cease to expect me to lead with you
 a life that's so unnatural for a boy." What was so unnatural for the
 particular boy I was concerned with was this sudden revelation of a
 consciousness and a plan.
 
 That was what really overcame me, what prevented my going in. I walked
 round the church, hesitating, hovering; I reflected that I had already,
 with him, hurt myself beyond repair. Therefore I could patch up nothing,
 and it was too extreme an effort to squeeze beside him into the pew: he
 would be so much more sure than ever to pass his arm into mine and make
 me sit there for an hour in close, silent contact with his commentary
 on our talk. For the first minute since his arrival I wanted to get away
 from him. As I paused beneath the high east window and listened to the
--**--**--
 
 
 XVI
 
 
 I had so perfectly expected that the return of my pupils would be marked
 by a demonstration that I was freshly upset at having to take into
 account that they were dumb about my absence. Instead of gaily
 denouncing and caressing me, they made no allusion to my having failed
 them, and I was left, for the time, on perceiving that she too said
 nothing, to study Mrs. Grose's odd face. I did this to such purpose that
 I made sure they had in some way bribed her to silence; a silence that,
 however, I would engage to break down on the first private opportunity.
 This opportunity came before tea: I secured five minutes with her in the
 housekeeper's room, where, in the twilight, amid a smell of lately baked
 bread, but with the place all swept and garnished, I found her sitting
 in pained placidity before the fire. So I see her still, so I see her
 best: facing the flame from her straight chair in the dusky, shining
 room, a large clean image of the "put away"--of drawers closed and
 locked and rest without a remedy.
 
 "Oh, yes, they asked me to say nothing; and to please them--so long as
 they were there--of course I promised. But what had happened to you?"
 
 "I only went with you for the walk," I said. "I had then to come back to
 meet a friend."
 
 She showed her surprise. "A friend--YOU?"
 
 "Oh, yes, I have a couple!" I laughed. "But did the children give you a
 reason?"
 
 "For not alluding to your leaving us? Yes; they said you would like it
 better. Do you like it better?"
 
 My face had made her rueful. "No, I like it worse!" But after an instant
 I added: "Did they say why I should like it better?"
--**--**--
 It was this, of a truth, that made her, as she filled out my picture,
 gape. "Do you mean," she faltered, "--of the lost?"
 
 "Of the lost. Of the damned. And that's why, to share them-" I faltered
 myself with the horror of it.
 
 But my companion, with less imagination, kept me up. "To share them--?"
 
 "She wants Flora." Mrs. Grose might, as I gave it to her, fairly have
 fallen away from me had I not been prepared. I still held her there, to
 show I was. "As I've told you, however, it doesn't matter."
 
 "Because you've made up your mind? But to what?"
 
 "To everything."
 
 "And what do you call 'everything'?"
 
 "Why, sending for their uncle."
 
 "Oh, miss, in pity do," my friend broke out. "ah, but I will, I WILL! I
 see it's the only way. What's 'out,' as I told you, with Miles is that
 if he thinks I'm afraid to--and has ideas of what he gains by that--he
 shall see he's mistaken. Yes, yes; his uncle shall have it here from me
 on the spot (and before the boy himself, if necessary) that if I'm to be
 reproached with having done nothing again about more school--"
 
 "Yes, miss--" my companion pressed me.
 
 "Well, there's that awful reason."
 
 There were now clearly so many of these for my poor colleague that she
 was excusable for being vague. "But--a--which?"
 
 "Why, the letter from his old place."
 
 "You'll show it to the master?"
 
 "I ought to have done so on the instant."
 
 "Oh, no!" said Mrs. Grose with decision.
 
 "I'll put it before him," I went on inexorably, "that I can't undertake
 to work the question on behalf of a child who has been expelled--"
 
 "For we've never in the least known what!" Mrs. Grose declared.
 
 "For wickedness. For what else--when he's so clever and beautiful and
--**--**--
 "Not much! I lie awake and think."
 
 I had put my candle, designedly, a short way off, and then, as he held
 out his friendly old hand to me, had sat down on the edge of his bed.
 "What is it," I asked, "that you think of?"
 
 "What in the world, my dear, but YOU?"
 
 "Ah, the pride I take in your appreciation doesn't insist on that! I had
 so far rather you slept."
 
 "Well, I think also, you know, of this queer business of ours."
 
 I marked the coolness of his firm little hand. "Of what queer business,
 Miles?"
 
 "Why, the way you bring me up. And all the rest!"
 
 I fairly held my breath a minute, and even from my glimmering taper
 there was light enough to show how he smiled up at me from his pillow.
 "What do you mean by all the rest?"
 
 "Oh, you know, you know!"
 
 I could say nothing for a minute, though I felt, as I held his hand and
 our eyes continued to meet, that my silence had all the air of admitting
 his charge and that nothing in the whole world of reality was perhaps at
 that moment so fabulous as our actual relation. "Certainly you shall go
 back to school," I said, "if it be that that troubles you. But not to
 the old place--we must find another, a better. How could I know it did
 trouble you, this question, when you never told me so, never spoke of it
 at all?" His clear, listening face, framed in its smooth whiteness, made
 him for the minute as appealing as some wistful patient in a children's
 hospital; and I would have given, as the resemblance came to me, all I
 possessed on earth really to be the nurse or the sister of charity who
--**--**--
 
 "Oh, YOU know what a boy wants!"
 
 I felt that I didn't know so well as Miles, and I took temporary refuge.
 "You want to go to your uncle?"
 
 Again, at this, with his sweet ironic face, he made a movement on the
 pillow. "Ah, you can't get off with that!"
 
 I was silent a little, and it was I, now, I think, who changed color.
 "My dear, I don't want to get off!"
 
 "You can't, even if you do. You can't, you can't!"--he lay beautifully
 staring. "My uncle must come down, and you must completely settle
 things."
 
 "If we do," I returned with some spirit, "you may be sure it will be to
 take you quite away."
 
 "Well, don't you understand that that's exactly what I'm working for?
 You'll have to tell him--about the way you've let it all drop: you'll
 have to tell him a tremendous lot!"
 
 The exultation with which he uttered this helped me somehow, for the
 instant, to meet him rather more. "And how much will YOU, Miles, have to
 tell him? There are things he'll ask you!"
 
 He turned it over. "Very likely. But what things?"
 
 "The things you've never told me. To make up his mind what to do with
 you. He can't send you back--"
 
 "Oh, I don't want to go back!" he broke in. "I want a new field."
 
 He said it with admirable serenity, with positive unimpeachable
 gaiety; and doubtless it was that very note that most evoked for me the
 poignancy, the unnatural childish tragedy, of his probable reappearance
 at the end of three months with all this bravado and still more
 dishonor. It overwhelmed me now that I should never be able to bear
 that, and it made me let myself go. I threw myself upon him and in the
--**--**--
 The next day, after lessons, Mrs. Grose found a moment to say to me
 quietly: "Have you written, miss?"
 
 "Yes--I've written." But I didn't add--for the hour--that my letter,
 sealed and directed, was still in my pocket. There would be time enough
 to send it before the messenger should go to the village. Meanwhile
 there had been, on the part of my pupils, no more brilliant, more
 exemplary morning. It was exactly as if they had both had at heart to
 gloss over any recent little friction. They performed the dizziest feats
 of arithmetic, soaring quite out of MY feeble range, and perpetrated,
 in higher spirits than ever, geographical and historical jokes. It was
 conspicuous of course in Miles in particular that he appeared to wish to
 show how easily he could let me down. This child, to my memory, really
 lives in a setting of beauty and misery that no words can translate;
 there was a distinction all his own in every impulse he revealed; never
 was a small natural creature, to the uninitiated eye all frankness and
 freedom, a more ingenious, a more extraordinary little gentleman. I had
 perpetually to guard against the wonder of contemplation into which my
 initiated view betrayed me; to check the irrelevant gaze and discouraged
 sigh in which I constantly both attacked and renounced the enigma of
 what such a little gentleman could have done that deserved a penalty.
 Say that, by the dark prodigy I knew, the imagination of all evil HAD
 been opened up to him: all the justice within me ached for the proof
 that it could ever have flowered into an act.
 
 He had never, at any rate, been such a little gentleman as when, after
 our early dinner on this dreadful day, he came round to me and asked if
--**--**--
 sight without some special provision. Of course now indeed she might be
 with the maids, so that the immediate thing was to look for her without
 an air of alarm. This we promptly arranged between us; but when, ten
 minutes later and in pursuance of our arrangement, we met in the hall,
 it was only to report on either side that after guarded inquiries we
 had altogether failed to trace her. For a minute there, apart from
 observation, we exchanged mute alarms, and I could feel with what high
 interest my friend returned me all those I had from the first given her.
 
 "She'll be above," she presently said--"in one of the rooms you haven't
 searched."
 
 "No; she's at a distance." I had made up my mind. "She has gone out."
 
 Mrs. Grose stared. "Without a hat?"
 
 I naturally also looked volumes. "Isn't that woman always without one?"
 
 "She's with HER?"
 
 "She's with HER!" I declared. "We must find them."
 
 My hand was on my friend's arm, but she failed for the moment,
 confronted with such an account of the matter, to respond to my
 pressure. She communed, on the contrary, on the spot, with her
 uneasiness. "And where's Master Miles?"
 
 "Oh, HE'S with Quint. They're in the schoolroom."
 
 "Lord, miss!" My view, I was myself aware--and therefore I suppose my
 tone--had never yet reached so calm an assurance.
 
 "The trick's played," I went on; "they've successfully worked their
 plan. He found the most divine little way to keep me quiet while she
 went off."
 
 "'Divine'?" Mrs. Grose bewilderedly echoed.
 
 "Infernal, then!" I almost cheerfully rejoined. "He has provided for
 himself as well. But come!"
 
 She had helplessly gloomed at the upper regions. "You leave him--?"
 
 "So long with Quint? Yes--I don't mind that now."
 
 She always ended, at these moments, by getting possession of my hand,
--**--**--
 steps so marked a direction--a direction that made her, when she
 perceived it, oppose a resistance that showed me she was freshly
 mystified. "You're going to the water, Miss?--you think she's IN--?"
 
 "She may be, though the depth is, I believe, nowhere very great. But
 what I judge most likely is that she's on the spot from which, the other
 day, we saw together what I told you."
 
 "When she pretended not to see--?"
 
 "With that astounding self-possession? I've always been sure she wanted
 to go back alone. And now her brother has managed it for her."
 
 Mrs. Grose still stood where she had stopped. "You suppose they really
 TALK of them?"
 
 "I could meet this with a confidence! They say things that, if we heard
 them, would simply appall us."
 
 "And if she IS there--"
 
 "Yes?"
 
 "Then Miss Jessel is?"
 
 "Beyond a doubt. You shall see."
 
 "Oh, thank you!" my friend cried, planted so firm that, taking it in, I
 went straight on without her. By the time I reached the pool, however,
 she was close behind me, and I knew that, whatever, to her apprehension,
 might befall me, the exposure of my society struck her as her least
 danger. She exhaled a moan of relief as we at last came in sight of the
 greater part of the water without a sight of the child. There was no
 trace of Flora on that nearer side of the bank where my observation of
 her had been most startling, and none on the opposite edge, where, save
 for a margin of some twenty yards, a thick copse came down to the water.
 The pond, oblong in shape, had a width so scant compared to its length
 that, with its ends out of view, it might have been taken for a scant
--**--**--
 far enough to have made the child prefer not to walk. She went straight
 over."
 
 "Laws!" cried my friend again; the chain of my logic was ever too
 much for her. It dragged her at my heels even now, and when we had got
 halfway round--a devious, tiresome process, on ground much broken and by
 a path choked with overgrowth--I paused to give her breath. I sustained
 her with a grateful arm, assuring her that she might hugely help me; and
 this started us afresh, so that in the course of but few minutes more we
 reached a point from which we found the boat to be where I had supposed
 it. It had been intentionally left as much as possible out of sight and
 was tied to one of the stakes of a fence that came, just there, down to
 the brink and that had been an assistance to disembarking. I recognized,
 as I looked at the pair of short, thick oars, quite safely drawn up, the
 prodigious character of the feat for a little girl; but I had lived, by
 this time, too long among wonders and had panted to too many livelier
 measures. There was a gate in the fence, through which we passed, and
 that brought us, after a trifling interval, more into the open. Then,
 "There she is!" we both exclaimed at once.
 
 Flora, a short way off, stood before us on the grass and smiled as if
 her performance was now complete. The next thing she did, however, was
 to stoop straight down and pluck--quite as if it were all she was there
 for--a big, ugly spray of withered fern. I instantly became sure she
 had just come out of the copse. She waited for us, not herself taking a
 step, and I was conscious of the rare solemnity with which we presently
--**--**--
 received it fairly likened my breach of the silence to the smash of a
 pane of glass. It added to the interposing cry, as if to stay the blow,
 that Mrs. Grose, at the same instant, uttered over my violence--the
 shriek of a creature scared, or rather wounded, which, in turn, within a
 few seconds, was completed by a gasp of my own. I seized my colleague's
 arm. "She's there, she's there!"
 
 Miss Jessel stood before us on the opposite bank exactly as she had
 stood the other time, and I remember, strangely, as the first feeling
 now produced in me, my thrill of joy at having brought on a proof. She
 was there, and I was justified; she was there, and I was neither cruel
 nor mad. She was there for poor scared Mrs. Grose, but she was there
 most for Flora; and no moment of my monstrous time was perhaps so
 extraordinary as that in which I consciously threw out to her--with
 the sense that, pale and ravenous demon as she was, she would catch and
 understand it--an inarticulate message of gratitude. She rose erect on
 the spot my friend and I had lately quitted, and there was not, in all
 the long reach of her desire, an inch of her evil that fell short. This
 first vividness of vision and emotion were things of a few seconds,
 during which Mrs. Grose's dazed blink across to where I pointed struck
 me as a sovereign sign that she too at last saw, just as it carried my
 own eyes precipitately to the child. The revelation then of the manner
 in which Flora was affected startled me, in truth, far more than it
 would have done to find her also merely agitated, for direct dismay
 was of course not what I had expected. Prepared and on her guard as our
--**--**--
 propriety, and they were again, with Mrs. Grose on her feet, united, as
 it were, in pained opposition to me. Flora continued to fix me with
 her small mask of reprobation, and even at that minute I prayed God to
 forgive me for seeming to see that, as she stood there holding tight
 to our friend's dress, her incomparable childish beauty had suddenly
 failed, had quite vanished. I've said it already--she was literally,
 she was hideously, hard; she had turned common and almost ugly. "I don't
 know what you mean. I see nobody. I see nothing. I never HAVE. I think
 you're cruel. I don't like you!" Then, after this deliverance, which
 might have been that of a vulgarly pert little girl in the street, she
 hugged Mrs. Grose more closely and buried in her skirts the dreadful
 little face. In this position she produced an almost furious wail. "Take
 me away, take me away--oh, take me away from HER!"
 
 "From ME?" I panted.
 
 "From you--from you!" she cried.
 
 Even Mrs. Grose looked across at me dismayed, while I had nothing to
 do but communicate again with the figure that, on the opposite bank,
 without a movement, as rigidly still as if catching, beyond the
 interval, our voices, was as vividly there for my disaster as it was not
 there for my service. The wretched child had spoken exactly as if she
 had got from some outside source each of her stabbing little words, and
 I could therefore, in the full despair of all I had to accept, but sadly
 shake my head at her. "If I had ever doubted, all my doubt would at
 present have gone. I've been living with the miserable truth, and now
 it has only too much closed round me. Of course I've lost you: I've
--**--**--
 as it were, her respectability. 'Miss Jessel indeed--SHE!' Ah, she's
 'respectable,' the chit! The impression she gave me there yesterday was,
 I assure you, the very strangest of all; it was quite beyond any of the
 others. I DID put my foot in it! She'll never speak to me again."
 
 Hideous and obscure as it all was, it held Mrs. Grose briefly silent;
 then she granted my point with a frankness which, I made sure, had more
 behind it. "I think indeed, miss, she never will. She do have a grand
 manner about it!"
 
 "And that manner"--I summed it up--"is practically what's the matter
 with her now!"
 
 Oh, that manner, I could see in my visitor's face, and not a little else
 besides! "She asks me every three minutes if I think you're coming in."
 
 "I see--I see." I, too, on my side, had so much more than worked it
 out. "Has she said to you since yesterday--except to repudiate her
 familiarity with anything so dreadful--a single other word about Miss
 Jessel?"
 
 "Not one, miss. And of course you know," my friend added, "I took it
 from her, by the lake, that, just then and there at least, there WAS
 nobody."
 
 "Rather! and, naturally, you take it from her still."
 
 "I don't contradict her. What else can I do?"
 
 "Nothing in the world! You've the cleverest little person to deal with.
 They've made them--their two friends, I mean--still cleverer even than
 nature did; for it was wondrous material to play on! Flora has now her
 grievance, and she'll work it to the end."
 
 "Yes, miss; but to WHAT end?"
 
 "Why, that of dealing with me to her uncle. She'll make me out to him
 the lowest creature--!"
 
 I winced at the fair show of the scene in Mrs. Grose's face; she looked
--**--**--
 
 "Your loyalty, to begin with. And then Miles's."
 
 She looked at me hard. "Do you think he--?"
 
 "Won't, if he has the chance, turn on me? Yes, I venture still to think
 it. At all events, I want to try. Get off with his sister as soon as
 possible and leave me with him alone." I was amazed, myself, at the
 spirit I had still in reserve, and therefore perhaps a trifle the more
 disconcerted at the way in which, in spite of this fine example of it,
 she hesitated. "There's one thing, of course," I went on: "they mustn't,
 before she goes, see each other for three seconds." Then it came over me
 that, in spite of Flora's presumable sequestration from the instant of
 her return from the pool, it might already be too late. "Do you mean," I
 anxiously asked, "that they HAVE met?"
 
 At this she quite flushed. "Ah, miss, I'm not such a fool as that! If
 I've been obliged to leave her three or four times, it has been each
 time with one of the maids, and at present, though she's alone, she's
 locked in safe. And yet--and yet!" There were too many things.
 
 "And yet what?"
 
 "Well, are you so sure of the little gentleman?"
 
 "I'm not sure of anything but YOU. But I have, since last evening, a new
 hope. I think he wants to give me an opening. I do believe that--poor
 little exquisite wretch!--he wants to speak. Last evening, in the
 firelight and the silence, he sat with me for two hours as if it were
 just coming."
 
 Mrs. Grose looked hard, through the window, at the gray, gathering day.
 "And did it come?"
 
 "No, though I waited and waited, I confess it didn't, and it was without
 a breach of the silence or so much as a faint allusion to his sister's
--**--**--
 "From that child--horrors! There!" she sighed with tragic relief. "On my
 honor, miss, she says things--!" But at this evocation she broke down;
 she dropped, with a sudden sob, upon my sofa and, as I had seen her do
 before, gave way to all the grief of it.
 
 It was quite in another manner that I, for my part, let myself go. "Oh,
 thank God!"
 
 She sprang up again at this, drying her eyes with a groan. "'Thank
 God'?"
 
 "It so justifies me!"
 
 "It does that, miss!"
 
 I couldn't have desired more emphasis, but I just hesitated. "She's so
 horrible?"
 
 I saw my colleague scarce knew how to put it. "Really shocking."
 
 "And about me?"
 
 "About you, miss--since you must have it. It's beyond everything, for a
 young lady; and I can't think wherever she must have picked up--"
 
 "The appalling language she applied to me? I can, then!" I broke in with
 a laugh that was doubtless significant enough.
 
 It only, in truth, left my friend still more grave. "Well, perhaps I
 ought to also--since I've heard some of it before! Yet I can't bear it,"
 the poor woman went on while, with the same movement, she glanced, on my
 dressing table, at the face of my watch. "But I must go back."
 
 I kept her, however. "Ah, if you can't bear it--!"
 
 "How can I stop with her, you mean? Why, just FOR that: to get her away.
 Far from this," she pursued, "far from THEM-"
 
 "She may be different? She may be free?" I seized her almost with joy.
 "Then, in spite of yesterday, you BELIEVE--"
 
 "In such doings?" Her simple description of them required, in the light
 of her expression, to be carried no further, and she gave me the whole
 thing as she had never done. "I believe."
--**--**--
 containing Mrs. Grose and my younger pupil had already rolled out of the
 gates. Now I WAS, I said to myself, face to face with the elements, and
 for much of the rest of the day, while I fought my weakness, I could
 consider that I had been supremely rash. It was a tighter place still
 than I had yet turned round in; all the more that, for the first time,
 I could see in the aspect of others a confused reflection of the crisis.
 What had happened naturally caused them all to stare; there was too
 little of the explained, throw out whatever we might, in the suddenness
 of my colleague's act. The maids and the men looked blank; the effect
 of which on my nerves was an aggravation until I saw the necessity of
 making it a positive aid. It was precisely, in short, by just clutching
 the helm that I avoided total wreck; and I dare say that, to bear up
 at all, I became, that morning, very grand and very dry. I welcomed the
 consciousness that I was charged with much to do, and I caused it to be
 known as well that, left thus to myself, I was quite remarkably firm. I
 wandered with that manner, for the next hour or two, all over the place
 and looked, I have no doubt, as if I were ready for any onset. So, for
 the benefit of whom it might concern, I paraded with a sick heart.
 
 The person it appeared least to concern proved to be, till dinner,
 little Miles himself. My perambulations had given me, meanwhile, no
 glimpse of him, but they had tended to make more public the change
 taking place in our relation as a consequence of his having at the
 piano, the day before, kept me, in Flora's interest, so beguiled and
--**--**--
 in my little companion. It was indeed as if he had found even now--as he
 had so often found at lessons--still some other delicate way to ease me
 off. Wasn't there light in the fact which, as we shared our solitude,
 broke out with a specious glitter it had never yet quite worn?--the fact
 that (opportunity aiding, precious opportunity which had now come) it
 would be preposterous, with a child so endowed, to forego the help one
 might wrest from absolute intelligence? What had his intelligence been
 given him for but to save him? Mightn't one, to reach his mind, risk the
 stretch of an angular arm over his character? It was as if, when we were
 face to face in the dining room, he had literally shown me the way.
 The roast mutton was on the table, and I had dispensed with attendance.
 Miles, before he sat down, stood a moment with his hands in his pockets
 and looked at the joint, on which he seemed on the point of passing some
 humorous judgment. But what he presently produced was: "I say, my dear,
 is she really very awfully ill?"
 
 "Little Flora? Not so bad but that she'll presently be better. London
 will set her up. Bly had ceased to agree with her. Come here and take
 your mutton."
 
 He alertly obeyed me, carried the plate carefully to his seat, and,
 when he was established, went on. "Did Bly disagree with her so terribly
 suddenly?"
 
 "Not so suddenly as you might think. One had seen it coming on."
 
 "Then why didn't you get her off before?"
 
 "Before what?"
 
 "Before she became too ill to travel."
 
 I found myself prompt. "She's NOT too ill to travel: she only might
 have become so if she had stayed. This was just the moment to seize. The
--**--**--
 glad Bly agrees with ME!"
 
 "You would certainly seem to have seen, these twenty-four hours, a good
 deal more of it than for some time before. I hope," I went on bravely,
 "that you've been enjoying yourself."
 
 "Oh, yes, I've been ever so far; all round about--miles and miles away.
 I've never been so free."
 
 He had really a manner of his own, and I could only try to keep up with
 him. "Well, do you like it?"
 
 He stood there smiling; then at last he put into two words--"Do
 YOU?"--more discrimination than I had ever heard two words contain.
 Before I had time to deal with that, however, he continued as if with
 the sense that this was an impertinence to be softened. "Nothing could
 be more charming than the way you take it, for of course if we're alone
 together now it's you that are alone most. But I hope," he threw in,
 "you don't particularly mind!"
 
 "Having to do with you?" I asked. "My dear child, how can I help
 minding? Though I've renounced all claim to your company--you're so
 beyond me--I at least greatly enjoy it. What else should I stay on for?"
 
 He looked at me more directly, and the expression of his face, graver
 now, struck me as the most beautiful I had ever found in it. "You stay
 on just for THAT?"
 
 "Certainly. I stay on as your friend and from the tremendous interest
 I take in you till something can be done for you that may be more worth
 your while. That needn't surprise you." My voice trembled so that I felt
 it impossible to suppress the shake. "Don't you remember how I told you,
 when I came and sat on your bed the night of the storm, that there was
--**--**--
 someone who had frankly to be reckoned with was waiting. "I have to see
 Luke."
 
 I had not yet reduced him to quite so vulgar a lie, and I felt
 proportionately ashamed. But, horrible as it was, his lies made up my
 truth. I achieved thoughtfully a few loops of my knitting. "Well, then,
 go to Luke, and I'll wait for what you promise. Only, in return for
 that, satisfy, before you leave me, one very much smaller request."
 
 He looked as if he felt he had succeeded enough to be able still a
 little to bargain. "Very much smaller--?"
 
 "Yes, a mere fraction of the whole. Tell me"--oh, my work preoccupied
 me, and I was offhand!--"if, yesterday afternoon, from the table in the
 hall, you took, you know, my letter."
 
 
 
 
 XXIV
 
 
 My sense of how he received this suffered for a minute from something
 that I can describe only as a fierce split of my attention--a stroke
 that at first, as I sprang straight up, reduced me to the mere blind
 movement of getting hold of him, drawing him close, and, while I just
 fell for support against the nearest piece of furniture, instinctively
 keeping him with his back to the window. The appearance was full upon us
 that I had already had to deal with here: Peter Quint had come into view
 like a sentinel before a prison. The next thing I saw was that, from
 outside, he had reached the window, and then I knew that, close to the
 glass and glaring in through it, he offered once more to the room his
 white face of damnation. It represents but grossly what took place
 within me at the sight to say that on the second my decision was made;
 yet I believe that no woman so overwhelmed ever in so short a time
--**--**--
 that reached him only through the pressure of his anxiety. Yet it did
 reach him. "Did I STEAL?"
 
 I felt myself redden to the roots of my hair as well as wonder if it
 were more strange to put to a gentleman such a question or to see him
 take it with allowances that gave the very distance of his fall in the
 world. "Was it for that you mightn't go back?"
 
 The only thing he felt was rather a dreary little surprise. "Did you
 know I mightn't go back?"
 
 "I know everything."
 
 He gave me at this the longest and strangest look. "Everything?"
 
 "Everything. Therefore DID you--?" But I couldn't say it again.
 
 Miles could, very simply. "No. I didn't steal."
 
 My face must have shown him I believed him utterly; yet my hands--but it
 was for pure tenderness--shook him as if to ask him why, if it was all
 for nothing, he had condemned me to months of torment. "What then did
 you do?"
 
 He looked in vague pain all round the top of the room and drew his
 breath, two or three times over, as if with difficulty. He might have
 been standing at the bottom of the sea and raising his eyes to some
 faint green twilight. "Well--I said things."
 
 "Only that?"
 
 "They thought it was enough!"
 
 "To turn you out for?"
 
 Never, truly, had a person "turned out" shown so little to explain it
 as this little person! He appeared to weigh my question, but in a manner
 quite detached and almost helpless. "Well, I suppose I oughtn't."
 
 "But to whom did you say them?"
 
 He evidently tried to remember, but it dropped--he had lost it. "I don't
 know!"
 
 He almost smiled at me in the desolation of his surrender, which was
 indeed practically, by this time, so complete that I ought to have left
--**--**--
 
 At this, after a second in which his head made the movement of a baffled
 dog's on a scent and then gave a frantic little shake for air and light,
 he was at me in a white rage, bewildered, glaring vainly over the place
 and missing wholly, though it now, to my sense, filled the room like the
 taste of poison, the wide, overwhelming presence. "It's HE?"
 
 I was so determined to have all my proof that I flashed into ice to
 challenge him. "Whom do you mean by 'he'?"
 
 "Peter Quint--you devil!" His face gave again, round the room, its
 convulsed supplication. "WHERE?"
 
 They are in my ears still, his supreme surrender of the name and his
 tribute to my devotion. "What does he matter now, my own?--what will he
 EVER matter? _I_ have you," I launched at the beast, "but he has lost
 you forever!" Then, for the demonstration of my work, "There, THERE!" I
 said to Miles.
 
 But he had already jerked straight round, stared, glared again, and
 seen but the quiet day. With the stroke of the loss I was so proud of he
 uttered the cry of a creature hurled over an abyss, and the grasp with
 which I recovered him might have been that of catching him in his fall.
 I caught him, yes, I held him--it may be imagined with what a passion;
 but at the end of a minute I began to feel what it truly was that
 I held. We were alone with the quiet day, and his little heart,
 dispossessed, had stopped.
 